
<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43198 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000003094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   20 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-009--UKRAINE 
<H3> <TI>      UKRAINE'S BRAIN DRAIN: PROLIFERATION, NUCLEAR SAFETY IMPLICATIONS </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
According     to recent press reports, the Ukraine's brain drain is 
massive and  critical, especially for the nation's nuclear industry. 
Both Ukrainian and Western governments hope that the establishment 
of an S&amp;T center funded by the West will keep nuclear weapons 
specialists busy and at home. 
   Actual figures for Ukraine's brain drain were given in the UkAS's 
monthly bulletin in July 1993. Over the past three years, the 
Academy has lost about 17,000 employees or about 20 percent of its 
workforce. However, only about 1,000 of these, or 6 percent, were 
scientific workers. When 300 scientists went abroad for sabbaticals 
of six months or more, 80 percent did not return when the sabbatical 
ended. Recruitment levels for the Academy have declined to half that 
of pre-independence years (Kiev VISNYK AKADEMIYI NAUK UKRAYINY Jul 
93). 
   Comparable losses have also been experienced by the numerous 
engineering centers and R&amp;D enterprises operated by the Ukrainian 
Academy of Sciences--about 18,000 workers or 15 percent of the work 
force. (Kiev VISNYK AKADEMIYI NAUK UKRAYINY Jul 93). 
   In a recent newspaper article, President of the Ukrainian Academy 
of Sciences (UkAS) Boris Paton said that the Ukraine's brain drain 
was "massive" and that it is an "unquestionable threat to the 
country's national interests" (Kiev PRAVDA UKRAINY 14 Dec 93). 
   It is the Ukraine's nuclear power industry, however, that has 
been most seriously affected by the brain drain. Ukraine is facing a 
25 percent shortfall in electric power generation this winter 
because of fuel shortages at conventional power plants and cannot 
afford to close down its nuclear power facilities, which are 
responsible for about 40 percent of Ukraine's winter electric power 
production. They cost about half as much to operate as conventional 
power plants as well (Kiev DEMOKRATYCHNA UKRAYINA, 27 Oct 93). 
According to Deputy Minister of the Power Industry and 
Electrification B.V. Korotya, the situation is "close to critical." 
Coal supplies have been exhausted at many power plants and others 
are operating at only half capacity. Power plants that burn fuel oil 
are now receiving far less than the 20,000 tons per day promised by 
the chairman of the Oil and Gas Committee, which is about 9,000 tons 
per day less than what they actually need (Kiev Ukrayinske 
Telebachennya Television Network, 1900 GMT 24 Nov 93). 
   Although Ukraine has an urgent need to maintain its nuclear power 
facilites, it is experiencing great difficulties in keeping them 
staffed.  1,254 employees left their jobs at Ukrainian power plants 
during the first nine months of 1993, including 1,100 "highly 
skilled professionals," according to a Ukrainian Television Network 
broadcast. 400 specialists left key jobs at the Zaporozhye Nuclear 
Power Station alone in 1993, emigrating to Russia because they were 
dissatisfied with wages and working conditions. Yet, the Zaporozhye 
station saved Ukraine over 2 million tons of coal in the third 
quarter of 1993 alone (Moscow Ostankino Television First Channel 
Network, 2100 GMT 7 Nov 93). 
   The industry has managed to cope with the losses by reassigning 
personnel from facilities where a moratorium on new facilities had 
halted construction 
or use. That manpower source has now been exhausted, and should 
resignations continue, there will be no further reserves to draw 
upon (Kiev Ukrayinske Telebachennya Television Network 1900 GMT 01 
Dec 93). 
   Ukraine is also experiencing difficulties in training nuclear 
specialists to replace those it has lost. According to Vladimir 
Bronnikov, director of the Zaporozhye Nuclear Power Station, it 
takes five to six years to train new operators. Furthermore, because 
Ukraine's training facilities are among the best in the former 
Soviet Union, its graduates are in very high demand. Nuclear 
specialists leave because wages and benefits in Ukraine are not 
competitive. (Kiev PRAVDA UKRAINY 3 May 93). 
   A complaint by Ukraine's Ministry of Environmental Protection 
suggests that current training is inadequate and hurried. According 
to the Ministry's press service, "personnel at the Chernobyl Nuclear 
Power Station, which were completely replaced in 1987-1988, do not 
have sufficient experience in dealing with complex or emergency 
situations at RBMK reactors. There is no full-scale simulator at 
Chernobyl to help train personnel in dealing with emergency 
situations" (Kiev UKRAYINSKA HAZETA 4-17 Nov 93), 
   Meanwhile, Ukraine's economic crisis has made it impossible for 
the nation to purchase adequate supplies of conventional fuels, thus 
forcing the Supreme Council of Ukraine to lift a moratorium on 
building new nuclear electric power stations and putting them into 
service. The council was also forced to delay implementation of 
legislation mandating the closure of the infamous Chernobyl station, 
despite the lobbying of many antinuclear organizations (Kiev 
DEMOKRATYCHNA UKRAYINA 27 Oct 93). 
   In addition to nuclear power plant workers, Ukraine is having 
difficulties keeping nuclear weapons specialists employed. On 25 
October, the final decision was adopted to create a Scientific and 
Technology Center in Ukraine (STCU) to "ensure the nonproliferation 
of technologies and special knowledge associated with weapons of 
mass destruction." The center will be funded by the United States, 
Canada, and Sweden and will finance projects employing scientists 
and engineers who are specialists in nuclear weapons technology. 
(Kiev HOLOS UKRAYINY, 3 Nov 93) 
   (AUTHOR:  TYSON.  FOR QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, COMMONWEALTH OF INDEPENDENT STATES BRANCH AT (703) 733-6332.) 
GIG/ 14JAN94/ECONF/TNDF/TID ca 19/1911z jan 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43199 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000003194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   20 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-19JAN94-NORTH KOREA 
<H3> <TI>      Conservative Resistance Apparent in New Labor Regulations </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                 A set of labor regulations Pyongyang has recently decreed 
provides for the pervasive presence of North Korean bureaucrats 
in any special economic zones on North Korean territory, for the 
ostensible purpose of protecting North Korean workers from 
potential foreign exploitation.  The new regulations seem 
designed more to address conservative misgivings about such zones 
than to attract foreign businesses and could even serve to 
discourage foreign investment in North Korea. 
                              END SUMMARY 
   The regulations, decreed on 30 December and carried in full by 
the North Korean news agency KCNA on II January, give what 
amounts to  supervisory powers over "foreign funded enterprises" 
to North Korean government organs and "trade unions."  Under the 
regulations, foreign-funded enterprises--joint-ventures and 
foreign-owned establishments--which would presumably operate in 
the Tumen free trade zone now under construction, will be subject 
to the following controls: 
   + Foreigners may be employed only with Pyongyang's approval. 
   + North Koreans must be hired under the supervision of the local 
"labor administration" to assure that they are hired through 
local "labor service agencies" and that "primary attention" is 
paid to securing "safe, cultural, and hygienic" working 
conditions in order to "protect and promote" workers' "lives and 
health."  In this regard, foreign enterprises are required to 
"organize and operate nurseries and kindergartens."  They "can" 
also run "sanatoriums and holiday homes," sponsor "mass culture 
and sports" activities, and fund unspecified welfare facilities- 
-all in addition to providing workers with "labor protection 
tools, working necessities, and nutritious food." 
   + North Korean workers may not be dismissed without a month's 
notice and approval by "trade unions "--over which the regime 
presumably exercises some control--and by the local labor service 
agency, and under the penalty of fines. 
   Conservative Voice     The regulations seem primarily designed to 
mollify conservatives whose ostensible concern about the specter 
of foreign exploitation of North Korean yorkers have been 
indirectly raised in North Korean media.   Signs that some in the 
North Korean leadership continue to harbor misgivings about 
special economic zones surfaced publicly three days after the 
KCNA announcement of the new labor regulations.  In a commentary 
criticizing ROK President Kim Yong-sam's economic policies, 
Pyongyang radio on 14 January ridiculed the South Korean economy 
as consisting of "the vulnerable colonial subjugated economy" 
capable only of "bonded processing trade with others' capital, 
technology, facilities, and materials"--precisely the type of 
arrangement that the Tumen basin project is aimed at. 
   1 See the Trends of 28 October 1992, pages 31-34. 
   Implications     While it is possible that those in the DPRK 
leadership pressing for foreign capital investment have 
overestimated the attractiveness of North Korea's cheap labor, it 
is more likely that they found that the stringently restrictive 
provisions were the only way to enlist the conservatives to go 
along with the special economic zone plan.  Either way, the new 
labor regulations may discourage foreign enterprises from 
investing in North Korea even after the nuclear issue is 
resolved. 
(AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENT, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, ASIA 
DIVION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/BIETZ  cka 19/1920z  jan 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43200 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000003294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   21 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-20JAN94-PALESTINIANS 
<H3> <TI>      Mainstream Palestinians Continue Pressure on PLO for Reform </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                          Recent meetings between PLO leaders and a delegation of 
mainstream Palestinians demanding reform of Yasir 'Arafat's 
autocratic leadership appear to have achieved little to resolve 
the growing internal Palestinian dispute over PLO decisionmaking. 
'Arafat's evident unwillingness to heed the reformer's demands is 
likely to exacerbate dissent among mainstream Palestinains, 
irrespective of the course of negotiations with Israel. 
                      END SUMMARY 
   PLO leaders and a delegation of seven Palestinians led by the 
prominent Gazan Haydar 'Abd-al-Shaf i met in Tunis in early 
January following growing public Palestinian criticism of PLO 
chairman Yasir 'Arafat's leadership.  In November, more than 100 
prominent Palestinians in the Occupied Territories and Jordan 
reportedly signed a memorandum demanding reform in the PLO. 
According to the Amman daily Jordan Times, the signers reaffirmed 
their recognition of the PLO as the representative of the 
Palestinian people but said that they "are not satisfied with the 
working method of political leadership at this stage," with 
regard either to "running the difficult and sensitive 
negotiations with the Israeli side" or to "preparing for . . 
national development in the transition stage" envisaged for the 
territories under the Israel-PLO Declaration of Principles [DOP] 
(21 December). 
   While media accounts of the reformers' demands have differed on 
details, the demands clearly include measures to make the PLO 
leadership more accountable, assure creation of democratic 
institutions in the proposed autonomous Palestinian entity, and 
ensure that professional competence will be the primary criterion 
for choosing Palestinian officials in the autonomy regime (see 
box).  According to the French news agency AFP, 'Abd-al-Shafi 
said that the objective of the reformers is "to broaden the 
decisionmaking structure so that it does not stay entirely in 
Abu-'Ammar's ['Arafat's] hands" and to establish a "collective 
leadership" (3 January). 
   Meager Results, Continued Criticism 
   Judging from comments by 'Abd-al-Shafi and others, the Tunis 
meetings did little to further reformers' goals.  Speaking to 
journalists in Amman on 8 January, 'Abd-al-Shafi proclaimed the 
meetings a success, but his awkward and contradictory language 
suggested an effort to paper over unresolved differences.  As 
quoted in the Jordan Times on the 9th, he said that the PLO 
leadership's response to his delegation was "not rejectionist to 
our calls for democratic reforms but not actively supportive." 
In the same interview, he said that PLO leaders acknowledged "the 
importance of democratizing the structure of the PLO and of 
adopting democracy in our political life as a whole" and 
"endorsed" the statement presented by his delegation, but he also 
said "not all demands were accepted."  'Abd-al-Shafi confirmed 
that the PLO had accepted one demand, authorizing him to initiate 
a "popular dialogue" among all Palestinian factions, including 
those opposed to the DOP.  Nonetheless, he clearly implied a lack 
of agreement on calls for institutional reform within the PLO, 
saying on the one hand that "expanding the decisionmaking body 
and collective leadership cannot be done at this stage" but 
adding on the other hand that "it is unacceptable that Abu-'Ammar 
['Arafat] alone makes the decisions."  According to the report, 
he also insisted that Palestinian elections be carried out as 
scheduled next summer. 
   Other remarks attributed to 'Abd-al-Shafi immediately after the 
Tunis meetings left no doubt that he was dissatisfied with the 
outcome.  On 7 January, the London-based Saudi daily Al-Sharq Al- 
Awsat quoted him as criticizing both 'Arafat and the PLO 
Executive Committee, saying that "'Arafat is still monopolizing 
the decisionmaking" and that Executive Committee members "are 
making it easy for him to continue to do so by accepting that he 
is the decisionmaker."  According to the paper, 'Abd-al-Shaf i 
warned that if 'Arafat did not accept reformers' demands, they 
would seek recourse to "the PLO's legitimate institutions," 
possibly a reference to the Palestine Central Council or the 
Palestine National Council, and "after that we would seek the 
verdict of the masses." 
   Hanan Ashrawi, spokeswoman for the Palestinian delegation to 
bilateral Middle East peace talks until her recent resignation- 
-apparently out of frustration with 'Arafat's autocratic 
leadership--from all formal PLO activity, stepped up her own 
criticism of the PLO leader in a recent interview.  Indicating 
her disenchantment with the PLO leadership and in particular 
resentment over the limited role of residents of the territories 
as Palestinians prepare for autonomy, she said that Palestinians 
currently "have a leadership that has not lived in its own 
country, with its own people, with a system of accountability, of 
control, and critical commentary for a long time."  As 
Palestinians undergo the transition to self-rule, she said, "we 
must ensure that the new government respects citizens' rights and 
is truly democratic," adding that Palestinians must not emulate 
"many Third World countries wherein a monolithic authority puts 
itself, not the people, at the center."  Ashrawi avoided a direct 
answer when asked explicitly whether 'Arafat exercised too much 
power, but made her opinion clear by saying that "the PLO 
leadership should be more open and more democratic" and that "the 
old decisionmaking process is no longer valid."  It "remains to 
be seen," she added pointedly, "whether the PLO is capable of 
effecting this change."  Asked directly whether PLO leaders in 
Tunis or Palestinians from the territories should occupy key 
position in the autonomy regime, Ashrawi replied "there should be 
a good mix" and "the people who have lived permanently in a 
coherent Palestinian society should get an effective say" (Vienna 
Der Standard, 10 January). 
   Dissent within PLO's Leadership . 
   Notwithstanding 'Abd-al-Shafi's complaints about the PLO 
Executive Committee's inaction, several of its members have also 
reportedly voiced objections to 'Arafat's leadership.  The London 
daily Al-Hayah cited Executive Committee member Samir Ghawshah as 
saying that he, along with prominent Executive Committee members 
Mahmud 'Abbas, Yasir 'Abd-Rabbuh, and Sulayman al-Najjab had sent 
a memorandum of their own to 'Arafat calling for more democratic 
decisionmaking and had only recently resumed attending committee 
meetings following a "period of seclusion" (8 January). 
   And Grumbling in the Ranks 
   In addition to facing increased criticism from prominent 
mainstream Palestinians in the territories, the PLO leadership 
also appears to be encountering protests from some of its own 
cadres in the territories.  Some of these less prominent 
individuals, who see themselves as having borne the primary 
burden of sustaining the Palestinian uprising, evidently fear a 
loss of status if the PLO makes the transition from a 
revolutionary organization to a more conventional political 
establishment and in particular resent the possible rise at their 
expense of mainstream Palestinians both in the PLO and the 
territories whom they perceive as lacking militant credentials. 
For example, Israel's Qol Yisra'el radio broadcast a statement by 
Husayn al-Nazir, identified as one of three Fatah officials from 
the area of Hebron who recently resigned their Fatah posts, 
attributing his resignation to the "deteriorating internal 
situation in Fatah institutions in the past few months," 
specifically the "absence of a democratic policy" and the 
existence of "bad personalities who hold sensitive posts inside 
Fatah."  Alluding to fears that the PLO leadership in Tunis might 
use the proposed Palestinian police force to impose its will on 
PLO cadres in the territories, al-Nazir cited unnamed individuals 
charged with "forming a security apparatus" and warned that 
"entrusting a bad personality with running this apparatus will 
practically destroy Fatah's internal structure."  While 
professing loyalty to 'Arafat, Al-Nazir complained that 'Arafat 
is "surrounded by a group of personalities who do not brief him 
on the true reports sent from the territories" and blamed such 
people for "the rise of traditional personalities who are outside 
the organization and . . . away from the suffering of the 
strugglers" who "were always in the confrontation lines" (6 
January). 
   PLO Lip Service 
   The PLO's own account of the Tunis meetings strongly suggests a 
strategy of paying lip service to the reformers' demands while 
resisting any measures that would effectively reduce the PLO's 
domination of Palestinian decisionmaking.  In its newscast on 7 
January, the PLO radio Voice of Palestine (VOP) in Algiers 
reported a press conference by 'Abd-al-Shafi on the 6th, giving 
no hint of any tension or disagreement between the delegation and 
the PLO leadership. (See Note 1)  While saying that the meetings 
were held to discuss "proposals . . . to entrench the democratic 
conception and consolidate the unity of our people on the basis 
of political plurality and democratic practices," the report 
portrayed 'Abd-al-Shaf i as indicating that agreement had been 
achieved on how to proceed toward these ends. 
   (Note 1) Al-Hayah reported that 'Abd-al-Shafi's press conference 
included critical remarks (8 January). 
   In the same broadcast, VOP carried the text of a statement by the 
PLO Executive Committee that purported to welcome the reformers' 
demands but conveyed a veiled warning to mainstream Palestinian 
dissenters not to cause trouble.  The statement affirmed the 
Executive Committee's commitment to "the principles of democratic 
dialogue, political plurality, the respect of views, and the 
practice of democracy."  It also stressed, however, "the 
importance of consolidating our national unity" and called for 
"more cohesion and unity. . . . in order to realize the 
establishment of a patriotic Palestinian authority to complete 
the Israeli withdrawal [from Gaza and Jericho] as a first step 
along the path of retrieving the inalienable national rights of 
our Palestinian people."  Alluding to the delegation, the 
Executive Committee welcomed "the efforts made by some brethren 
with a view to strengthening national unity and reinforcing the 
bases of the democratic process" but characterized such efforts 
as proof of "the health and vitality of the Palestinian arena and 
our people's determination to rally around the Palestine 
Liberation Organization."  The statement pointedly asserted that 
"this is the time for unity and not for disunion" and "the time 
for solidarity that is based on common denominators and not on 
elements of division." 
   Implications 
   Although most mainstream Palestinians support or at least 
acquiesce in the PLO's move toward a negotiated settlement with 
Israel, growing disaffection among mainstream Palestinians, 
rather than the often more publicized opposition of Palestinian 
rejectionists, constitutes the greater long term challenge to 
Yasir 'Arafat's and the PLO's primacy in the Palestinian 
movement.  Tensions between the PLO leadership and mainstream 
critics--primarily from within the Occupied Territories--are 
likely to continue regardless of how successfully the PLO 
conducts negotiations with Israel.  Progress toward establishment 
of a Palestinian autonomy regime could well bring further into 
the open a thus far semi-veiled struggle for influence among 
various mainstream Palestinian elements, while deadlocked 
negotiations and continued disarray in the territories would 
heighten the perception among many Palestinians that the PLO 
leadership is incapable of defending their interests. 
   An escalation of disputes among mainstream Palestinians could 
ultimately weaken the PLO leadership's ability to deal with the 
complex pressures arising from the current negotiations, 
especially if protracted difficulties continue.  'Arafat is 
undoubtedly aware of mounting criticism of his leadership and 
probably has recognized the need for tactical concessions to his 
critics.  Thus far, however, there is little indication that he 
has any intention of abandoning his tight control over 
fundamental decisionmaking, thus leaving open the possibility of 
a major collision with reform-minded dissidents. 
   Box 1 
   Palestinian Delegation's Demands 
   According to AFP on 4 January, the list of demands presented to 
the PLO leadership by 'Abd-al-Shaf i's delegation included the 
following: 
   --Creation of specialized councils to pursue national action on 
Palestinian autonomy and also with the Arab and international 
worlds. 
   --Calling on qualified people and experts to form councils and 
the planning and executive structures that depend on them. 
   --Giving priority to professional and political competence in 
forming working groups and negotiating committees and teams 
instead of favoritism and clan loyalties. 
   --Working out a plan of negotiation based on the text of the 
[Israel-PLO] Declaration of Principles and ensuring 
complementarity and coordination among the various commissions 
and negotiating groups. 
   --Forming a supreme authority for guiding, directing and 
following up the negotiations process. 
   --Forming a Palestinian Development and Reconstruction Council 
based on specific criteria so that it should be credible in the 
eyes of [the Palestinian] people and the donors of funds for 
building and national economic infrastructure. 
   --Finalizing the work of the [PLO] legislative committee charged 
with drawing up the basic law--constitution--of the national 
Palestinian authority in a way that brings out its democratic 
nature. 
   --Creating as soon as possible a supreme committee to organize a 
wide national dialogue grouping all Palestinian tendencies. 
   --Creating a high consultative committee of experts with a 
parallel status to that of the PLO Executive Committee, which has 
already been weakened by the departure of several of its members. 
   Box 2 
   The Palestinian Constitution--All Power to 'Arafat? 
   Mainstream critics of Yasir 'Arafat may have had their concerns 
heightened by the publication in the Jordanian daily Al-Ra'y on 
26 December of a reported draft text of the constitution for the 
proposed Palestinian interim authority in the Occupied 
Territories.  As reported by Al-Ra'y, the constitution clearly 
concentrates effective power in the hands of the PLO in general 
and 'Arafat in particular. 
   The draft establishes that the chairman of the PLO Executive 
Committee, that is, 'Arafat, will be president of the "national 
authority government" and will "exercise his prerogatives as 
given to him in the PLO bylaws and the decisions of the Palestine 
National Council, Central Council, and Executive Committee" as 
well as specified by the constitution itself.  Among other powers 
listed in the draft, the president is to be "the supreme 
commander of the Palestinian security forces, which will take 
orders from him."  The draft specifies that the president may 
serve two six-year terms of office (AFP reported on 8 January 
that the presidential term was set at five years).  It does not, 
however, mention presidential elections.  In addition, the 
president is empowered to appoint his own vice-president. 
   The draft also outlines the structure and function of the rest of 
the national authority government, specifying that it will be 
"appointed by the Executive Committee and will be responsible to 
it."  The draft devotes only one short paragraph to legislative 
authority, establishing that all legislative power will be 
exercised by the national authority government "until the 
legislative council is elected," but omitting any mention of the 
powers of the prospective legislative council. 
(AUTHOR: MORTON.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH (703) 733-6094.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH  cka 20/2021z  jan 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43201 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000003394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   22 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-21JAN94-CHINA 
<H3> <TI>      Yang Shangkun Voices Support for Deng </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
In     an apparent effort to strengthen the hand of reformers as they 
at tempt to implement the new market reforms adopted at the recent 
party plenum, the PRC-owned Hong Kong daily Wen Wei Po has 
portrayed retired party elder Yang Shangkun as supportive of 
paramount leader Deng Xiaoping during Yang's early January "visit 
and inspection" to Shenzhen.  Drawing attention to the symbolic 
nature of Yang's trip, the paper pointed out that it was his 
first visit to Shenzhen since 1992, when he "accompanied Deng" on 
the southern inspection tour that inspired the current wave of 
rapid economic growth and ambitious reform (9, 11 January). 
Judging by the 11 January edition of Wen Wei Po, Yang used the 
trip to air his strongest endorsement of Deng's reform agenda 
since retiring last spring.  The paper quoted Yang as saying 
during a tour of a local industrial zone that the "tremendous" 
changes evident there "proved in every way" that the reform 
policies "advocated by Deng Xiaoping"-- the "chief architect" of 
China's reform and opening up--were "entirely correct."  By 
contrast, neither the PRC-owned Hong Kong media nor the official 
PRC media reported that Yang had mentioned Deng Xiaoping during 
an 18-day visit to Yang's native province of Sichuan in October, 
noting only, for example, that Yang had merely applauded the 
change he saw in Sichuan and had expressed his hope that the 
province would "leap forward" in reform (Xinhua, 12 October 
1993).  Since October, PRC media have reported three appearances 
in Beijing by Yang (Xinhua, 2 November, 22 and 26 December 1993) 
but have not reported any remarks by the retired party elder. 
   In what may have been an attempt to amplify the political 
significance of Yang's supportive remarks on Deng, the recent Wen 
Wei Po reporting portrayed Yang as physically healthy.  The 9 
January report, for example, described the 87-year-old Yang as 
"healthy and strong" and able to "walk steadily" and "talk 
cheerfully and humorously."  Similarly, the 11 January article 
said that Yang had "walked around" in a Shenzhen park for "more 
than half an hour."   Since January 1993, when Xinhua reported 
that Yang was "hospitalized" (21 January) for an apparent 
illness, official PRC media, aside from periodic references to 
the "vigorous strides" taken by Yang while walking in public, 
have not been known to have commented as explicitly on his 
health.  PRC media are not known to have reported on Yang's visit 
to Shenzhen. 
(AUTHOR:  VOSS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/BIETZ 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43202 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000003494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   22 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-21JAN94-RUSSIA/US 
<H3> <TI>      Government, Opposition, Press React to Clinton Visit </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                            Russian President Boris Yeltsin and government officials hailed 
the 12-15 January visit of U.S. President Bill Clinton as 
demonstrating that U.S.-Russian partnership had reached a new, 
more mature phase where everyday, businesslike dealings, rather 
than sensational achievements, were to be expected.  Politicians 
outside the Russian Government generally had less upbeat 
assessments ranging from lukewarm to hostile.  Reaction from the 
press ranged predictably across the spectrum, with progovernment 
newspapers emphasizing the U.S.-Russian-Ukrainian agreement on 
nuclear weapons and the Partnership for Peace initiative as 
positive achievements and the nationalistic and procommunist 
press criticizing U.S. support for Yeltsin and his reform 
policies. 
                        END SUMMARY 
   Summing up President Bill Clinton's visit as reflecting 
"equality, mutual benefit, and accounting for each other's 
interests," Russian President Boris Yeltsin hailed the summit as 
a new stage in U.S.-Russian partnership (Russian TV, 14 January). 
Although Yeltsin cautioned that a "too upbeat" assessment did not 
reflect the "nature of the frank and businesslike discussions" 
and said that there "were and will be disagreements," he stressed 
that the visit had been "very fruitful" and that "most 
importantly" there was "goodwill" and "common decisions defined 
by partnership."  Listing some of the results of the summit, 
Yeltsin echoed the words of the Moscow Declaration signed at the 
summit on 14 January in stressing that U.S.-Russian relations 
have "finally moved into the phase of mature, strategic, global 
partnership in all spheres during these talks." 
   Russian Government 
   Other government officials, also highlighting the theme of 
partnership, gave similarly high marks to the summit: 
   -- After the first round of talks, Presidential press spokesman 
Vyacheslav Kostikov told journalists that the talks had taken 
place "in an atmosphere of genuine partnership" with each side 
acting "on the premise that peace and stability in Europe and 
worldwide is impossible without Russia and the United States" 
(Interfax, ITAR-TASS, 13 January). 
   -- Foreign Minister Andrey Kozyrev said that the "main sensation 
of the summit is the absence of a sensation," stressing that the 
"we are proceeding to institutional and systematic partnership." 
Kozyrev, who singled out the agreement signed on 14 January for 
the sale of enriched uranium as a notable result, also stressed 
that the summit achieved an economic partnership, stating that 
this did not mean "short term credit" or "humanitarian aid" but 
"negotiations with a long term perspective and realization that 
Russia is a great economic power" (Interfax, 15 January). 
   -- Deputy Foreign Minister Georgiy Mamedov called the talks "the 
most substantive, businesslike, and concrete" of all the summits 
he had attended.  He also stressed economic partnership, noting 
that President Clinton had put forth a package of "specific 
measures" that could help Russia "gain a greater foothold in 
world markets" and ease Russia's economic relations with former 
Soviet republics (ITAR-TASS, 14 January). 
   Other Politicians' Assessments 
   In contrast to the government officials, leaders of several 
parties represented in the new Duma gave the summit assessments 
ranging from lukewarm to hostile: 
   -- Speaking before the summit, reformist opposition leader 
Grigoriy Yavlinskiy said the meeting would be simply a "pleasant 
exchange of opinions" (Interfax, 11 January).  Apparently 
disagreeing with Yavlinskiy, from whose electoral bloc he was 
elected to the Duma, Yevgeniy Ambartsumov, formerly head of the 
Supreme Soviet's international affairs committee, said the visit 
was "evidence of U.S. respect for our great country."  He also 
expressed hope the president would take advantage of the visit to 
"familiarize himself even more deeply with [Russia's] problems" 
(ITAR-TASS, 13 January). 
   -- Centrist Democratic Party leader Nikolay Travkin told Interfax 
that he expected little from the summit, saying that the best 
thing Washington could do for Russia would be to recognize it as 
"an equal partner," and adding that "we do not need any 
tips."(Interfax, 11 January). 
   -- In contrast, Russian Communist Party (CPRF) leader Gennadiy 
Zyuganov called the visit "uniquely important and timely as our 
political situation has changed" and it is "necessary [for 
President Clinton] to get acquainted with it" (ITAR-TASS, 13 
January). 
   -- Reflecting possible pique that he was not invited to meet with 
President Clinton, ultranationalist Liberal Democratic Party of 
Russia leader Vladimir Zhirinovskiy both before and during the 
summit described the visit as "useless," "unnecessary," and 
"pointless."  He said that the visit discredited the U.S. 
President since "Russians are going to see he has come to support 
a team of bankers---the Gaydar government."  Zhirinovskiy called 
the president's failure to meet him "a mistake."  At the same 
time, he contended that, since Russians know that "all this 
disarray [in Russia] was organized by the West," he would gain 
votes by the snub, adding that it indicates that "I am the only 
honest and clean politician" because the leader of the country 
"mainly responsible" for helping the democrats "undermine" Russia 
"does not want to meet me"(Interfax, 11, 13 January). 
   Partnership for Peace 
   Despite their upbeat assessment of the summit as a whole, Yeltsin 
and other government officials gave a more nuanced reaction to 
the results of the NATO summit and the Partnership for Peace 
proposal: 
   -- Yeltsin told the 14 January press conference that he "actively 
supported" the Partnership for Peace initiative as a "good 
formula" that ruled out a "country by country" expansion of NATO, 
claiming that it contained "a primordial element of Russia-U.S. 
joint creative work."  However, Yeltsin appeared to place 
conditions on any NATO expansion, saying that if Russia or other 
countries at some point joined NATO they should do it all at 
once--" precisely together in one package"--to create "security 
for everyone."  Yeltsin also stressed his view that the 
Partnership for Peace was only one step--although an "important" 
one--in "creating a security system from Vancouver to 
Vladivostok," noting that Russia would not "forget" the other 
collective security systems in Europe, above all "the well-tried 
institutions of the UN and CSCE" (Russian TV, 14 January). 
   -- Kozyrev characterized the Partnership for Peace as an 
"important step forward and a serious test of the partnership 
between Russia, the United States, and other NATO states." 
Emphasizing the "new quality of partnership and not new 
membership in NATO," Kozyrev said everyone should "concentrate on 
partnership," "fill it with specific content," because now "it is 
too early to say how the period of partnership will end." 
Kozyrev admitted that one option was to expand NATO, adding that 
Moscow "did not rule this out."  However, returning to statements 
he has made in the past, he said that other possible options 
include creating broader security systems and the consolidation 
of the North Atlantic Cooperation Council, and he called for 
"parallel" efforts to be taken in "all of those directions" 
(Interfax, 13 January; ITAR-TASS, 15 January). 
   -- Kostikov called the Partnership for Peace a "politically 
attractive declaration," but said it "needed more substance" 
(Interfax, 13 January). 
   -- Defense Minister Pavel Grachev continued to claim that he did 
not "understand" the "aspirations of [Central and East European 
states] to defend themselves from Russia by membership in NATO," 
saying that Russia supports a "genuine, all-European system of 
security" that would be defined by "collective actions" rather 
than by "belonging to blocs."  He stressed, however, that 
Russia's relations with NATO should be "richer" and develop 
across a "broad range of interaction," adding that in January 
Russian defense specialists expect to study a plan for 
cooperation with NATO (Radio Rossii, 16 January). 
   Media Reaction 
   Press commentary on the summit devoted much attention to the 
tripartite agreement on nuclear weapons as well as the 
Partnership for Peace initiative.  The progovernment press 
generally stressed the maturing of the U.S.-Russian partnership 
while the nationalist and communist opposition papers predictably 
criticized U.S. support for Yeltsin and reform.  The proreform, 
independent Nezavisimaya Gazeta, whose chief editor has often 
severely criticized Yeltsin personally, carried favorable 
commentary on the summit. 
   Progovernment Press.  Commentary in the pro-Yeltsin Izvestiya and 
the government newspapers Rossiyskiye Vesti and Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta focused on the achievements in the nuclear and security 
areas.  The Defense Ministry newspaper Krasnaya Zvezda was 
particularly upbeat in its assessment of these issues: 
   -- A 15 January report in Rossiyskiye Vesti hailed the advent of 
a "phase of mature strategic global partnership in all spheres" 
that Moscow and Washington have "now indeed entered."  The 
article went on to praise the trilateral accord on Ukrainian 
nuclear weapons for imparting "new substance" to U.S.-Russian 
cooperation toward "strengthening strategic stability and 
security" and lauded the Partnership for Peace initiative as 
evidence of "harmony between Russia and the United States," as 
refuting "the argument of unequal security," and precluding the 
"possibility of new demarcation lines" dividing Europe. 
   -- Commentary in Izvestiya generally played up the nuclear 
agreement and the Partnership for Peace and gave less attention 
to bilateral economic issues, although a 15 January article 
concluded by saying that the "main attention" of the talks had 
been devoted to the "reform program."  In a discordant note, 
however, the 12 January Izvestiya carried a report by Melor 
Sturua contending that the Partnership for Peace proposal 
"essentially," though not by design, is "placating Zhirinovskiy" 
and arguing that postponing the admission to NATO of East 
European countries "both objectively and subjectively" 
strengthens "not the Russian president but his neofascist 
opponent" by in effect making a concession out of fear of an 
extremist backlash. 
   -- Although a 12 January Krasnaya Zvezda article did broach the 
concern that NATO membership might become an "instrument of 
blackmail," noting that there was the temptation to use the power 
of "big brother"--a role it said that NATO plays--to attempt to 
"pressure" the Russian leadership, in general the Defense 
Ministry's paper assessed the summit favorably.  In a 13 January 
article, prominent commentator Aleksandr Golts affirmed that the 
U.S.-Russian relationship had "indeed reached" a stage of "mature 
strategic partnership" where breakthroughs are unnecessary. 
Claiming that the United States  and Russia had taken a 
"realistic look" at each other and after "sober assessment" had 
concluded that they need each other, Golts lauded the Partnership 
for Peace plan for being "primarily" concerned with "Russia's 
legitimate interests in the security field." 
   Opposition Press.  Commentary in the nationalistic and 
procommunist Pravda and Sovetskaya Rossiya generally followed the 
negative tone they set in their coverage of the April 1993 
Vancouver summit, minimizing or criticizing the effectiveness of 
U.S. aid and hinting that U.S. support for Yeltsin is part of an 
anti-Russia plot: 
   -- An 11 January report in Pravda speculated that the U.S. 
delegation's "baggage" would "once again" contain "more advice 
and political declarations than specific economic programs or 
more, importantly, funds to implement them."  The report 
contained a litany of complaints about U.S. aid, grumbling on the 
one hand about the "derisorily small" sums involved and on the 
other hand that such efforts are misdirected.  The commentary 
used U.S. grain sales as an example, saying that these 
constituted a "fix like narcotics" that "in the opinion of many 
economists" had "shattered the health of Russian agricultural 
production."  This approach is similar to that adopted by the 
newspaper's commentary on the April 1993 Vancouver summit when it 
calculated that the U.S. aid agreed upon at the summit amounted 
to only "ten dollars for each Russian."  The 11 January article 
also castigated the U.S. reaction to the Russian elections, 
claiming that the U.S. desire that Russia should not "put on the 
brakes" but "continue the policy of reforms" struck a "discordant 
note" against statements by Yeltsin and Prime Minister 
Chernomyrdin that the "course and speed of reform" needed to be 
"urgently" revised.  The article charged that such discrepancies 
"reinforce suspicions" that the reforms are "advantageous to the 
U.S. rather than to Russia." 
   -- A pre-summit article in Sovetskaya Rossiya, which appears 
increasingly to reflect the influence of the CPRF, complained 
that "it is now totally clear" that America is at best "only 
prepared to make gestures involving charitable aid," noting that 
"even this is limited to gestures that will yield greater 
dividends on the purely propaganda level."  The article cited 
U.S. support for Yeltsin prior to the September-October conflict 
with the Russia legislature to claim that the U.S. administration 
"unconditionally approved" Yeltsin's orders to open fire on the 
legislature, hinting that the U.S. administration might have had 
more than an "indirect" responsibility for the 3-4 October 
government attack on the parliamentary headquarters.  A 15 
January article cited statements by U.S. and East European 
officials about NATO which it said "cannot fail to elicit 
profound alarm."  Claiming that NATO became "totally redundant" 
immediately after the elimination of the Warsaw Pact and the 
"self-destruction" of the USSR and should have been disbanded 
then, the article charged that the Partnership for Peace is only 
the "latest phase" in Western policy of "forcing" Russia "out of 
its traditional spheres of influence."  The article dismissed the 
Moscow summit as mainly an exercise in "diplomatic protocol." 
   Independent Press.  The reformist newspaper Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 
despite its chief editor's usual antipathy to Yeltsin, gave good 
marks to the summit.  Other independent newspapers pointed out 
the summit's lack of impact on domestic economic uncertainty, but 
some balanced this against the achievements of strategic 
cooperation: 
   -- A 15 January Nezavisimaya Gazeta article said nothing "new" in 
U.S.-Russian relations was demonstrated at the summit but 
explained this by claiming that bilateral relations are "as good 
as they can possibly be."  The article nevertheless went on to 
elaborate on the economic results of the summit, saying that the 
most outstanding achievement might be the lifting of most of the 
"discriminatory economic restrictions" on Russian goods entering 
the U.S. market.  The article commended Yeltsin for stressing 
that Russia needed collaboration with the West not "humanitarian 
aid," and said that by renouncing help from others Russia is 
putting itself in "the same rank as developed countries."  Even 
chief editor Vitaliy Tretyakov, often a harsh critic of Yeltsin, 
claimed that the visit demonstrated that "now matter how" 
Russia's role "in the world might be assesses," the summit was 
"still a visit by the head of one superpower to the capital of 
another superpower" and thus demonstrated "mutual respect, 
recognition, and mutual acceptance of . . . parity." 
   -- A 12 January article in the independent Segodnya similarly 
claimed that although U.S. officials "have presumably understood" 
that they are "incapable of influencing" the Russian domestic 
situation, they "continue to support Yeltsin" in the interest of 
"global security."  Although the article noted that the 
"strategic partnership" is "far from ideal," it nevertheless 
claimed that the "level of confidence" between the U.S. and 
Russian leadership "has no precedent." 
   (AUTHOR:  BELLINGER.  OUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION, (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/PF 21/2137z Jan 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43203 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000003594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   22 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-21JAN94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      New Setbacks for Reformers at Opening of Duma </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                             The opening days of the State Duma brought new signs of the 
weakness of reformers and strength of anti-reform parties, 
especially the Agrarians and Communists, in the election of a 
speaker and the registration of party factions.  The Agrarian 
Party's candidate, Communist Party (CPRF) Deputy Chairman Ivan 
Rybkin, was elected speaker of the Duma almost by default, as 
reform parties were unable to work together and failed to get a 
candidate onto the final ballot.  The formal registration of 
party factions revealed that the Agrarian Party has considerably 
expanded its expected membership since the election, while the 
Russia's Choice faction appeared smaller than its leaders had 
expected and now is showing signs of splitting. 
                          END SUMMARY 
   The selection of a Duma speaker, carried out mainly in secret 
talks among factions, turned into a fiasco for the disunited 
reformers.  Instead of working with other reform parties and 
independents to agree on a single candidate to put up against the 
communists and other hardliners, Russia's Choice entered into 
long and ultimately fruitless talks with the three other biggest 
parties--the anti-reform CPRF, Vladimir Zhirinovskiy's Liberal- 
Democratic Party of Russia (LDPR), and the Agrarians--trying to 
agree on a package dividing up the posts of speaker, deputy 
speakers, and committee chairmanships.  However, the three anti- 
reform parties worked together against Russia's Choice and 
presented such tough demands that Russia's Choice eventually 
broke off talks, accusing the other three of making unreasonable 
demands (Interfax, 7, 8 January). 
   Russia's Choice's negotiations with the other big blocs appeared 
to alienate some potential allies among the other reformers, and 
each of the three reformist blocs ended up supporting its own 
candidate.  Russia's Choice backed Sergey Kovalev, while Grigoriy 
Yavlinskiy's bloc pushed Vladimir Lukin, and Sergey Shakhray's 
Party of Russian Unity and Accord (PRES) pushed Shakhray (ITAR- 
TASS, 12 January).  Shakhray assailed the big four parties for 
conducting talks excluding smaller parties (Segodnya, Krasnaya 
Zvezda, 5 January).  He appeared to look to independents and 
regional deputies for allies, rather than to Russia's Choice. 
When Shakhray finally gave up on his own hopes for the speaker's 
post, he threw his support behind Vladimir Medvedev, nominee of a 
newly created "New Regional Policy" group of independents (ITAR- 
TASS, 13 January). 
   While reformers were in disarray, the CPRF, LDPR, and Agrarians 
appeared able to work together closely.  Although they apparently 
did not finally settle on one candidate until the opening of the 
Duma, in late December Russia's Choice leader Arkadiy Murashev 
already claimed that the three parties had secretly decided to 
back the Agrarian Party's Rybkin for speaker (Nezavisimaya 
Gazeta, 30 December). (See Note 1)  Segodnya on 5 January 
concluded that Zhirinovskiy's party had decided to back Agrarian- 
Communist candidate Rybkin--although Zhirinovskiy himself later 
briefly sought the post, according to ITAR-TASS on 12 January. 
Rybkin personifies the clear connection between the CPRF and 
Agrarians since he is simultaneously an Agrarian Party leader and 
deputy chairman of the CPRF.  In the old parliament he was leader 
of the "Communists of Russia" faction. 
   (Note 1)  Selskaya Zhizn on 15 January asserted that Nikolay 
Travkin's Democratic Party of Russia also joined in a coalition 
with the Agrarians and CPRF, and Segodnya on 15 January wrote 
that Travkin was allied with the Agrarians and CPRF in backing 
Rybkin. 
   When the voting for speaker began on 12 January, it appeared that 
even the anti-reform deal had broken down, as each individual 
party nominated its own favorite candidate or candidates--ten in 
all (Selskaya Zhizn, 15 January).  Four--Zhirinovskiy, Shakhray, 
Anatoliy Lukyanov, and Valentin Kovalev--withdrew before the 
voting (Izvestiya, 15 January).  Kovalev, a nonparty candidate 
backed by the CPRF, withdrew in favor of Rybkin, while 
Zhirinovskiy withdrew and the LDPR's secretary ordered its 
deputies to back Yuriy Vlasov, candidate of the nationalist 
Russian Way group (Izvestiya, 15 January). 
   The anti-reform parties apparently pushed through a proposal to 
hold a preliminary vote to narrow the field of six remaining 
candidates. Russia's Choice, now apparently courting the small 
parties and independents, objected that this would be unfair to 
small factions and independents (Interfax, 13 January).  In the 
preliminary vote, deputies were able to vote for more than one 
candidate (Izvestiya, 15 January), and two communist-conservative 
candidates came out on top--Rybkin with 233 and Vlasov with 2OO 
(ITAR-TASS, 13 january; Izvestiya, 15 January).  Russia's Choice 
candidate Sergey Kovalev came out next to last with 138 votes 
(Izvestiya, 15 january).  CPRF Chairman Gennadiy Zyuganov, noting 
the "democratic blocs' failure in the preliminary ballot," 
claimed that Russia's Choice had already begun to disintegrate 
(Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 15 January). 
   When the formal secret balloting was held on 14 January, deputies 
had a choice only between two anti-Yeltsin and anti-reform 
candidates (See Box One).  Moreover, even that choice was largely 
ended when Vlasov (who had worked with the CPRF leaders in the 
recent past) announced before the vote that he would support 
Rybkin (ITAR-TASS, 14 January).  Rybkin won with 223 votes (Radio 
Mayak, 14 January), a bare majority of the 444 deputies but far 
more than the strength of the combined CPRF-LDPR-Agrarian 
factions (163), indicating he won the votes of many independents 
and perhaps even some reformers.  It appears, however, that many 
reformers did not vote at all:  Rybkin's vote was 223 for and 101 
against, totalling only 324 of the 444 deputies, and only 334 (23 
for, 311 against) voted on Vlasov (Radio Mayak, 14 January), 
indicating that at least 110 deputies did not vote.  Yavlinskiy 
and Shakhray announced that their factions had voted against both 
candidates (Segodnya, 15 January). 
   Registration of Factions 
   The reformers' weakness and their foes' strength was also evident 
in the registration of party factions at the opening of the Duma. 
The official membership figures for each faction announced on 13 
January indicate that Russia's Choice has considerably fewer 
formal adherents than its leaders had previously claimed, while 
the Agrarian faction ended up with many more than previous 
figures had suggested.  Perhaps indicating a fluid boundary 
between the Agrarian and CPRF factions, the CPRF faction has 
shrunk, registering fewer members than ran under its banner in 
the election.  Meanwhile, a newly.formed faction of  centrist 
independents has displaced Zhirinovskiy's party as the second 
largest in the Duma (See Box Two). 
   Reform Factions 
   The failure of the expected number of deputies to formally enroll 
in the Russia's Choice faction suggests that the bloc--a hastily 
formed coalition of reformist organizations--is already 
fragmenting.  The first meeting of the Russia's Choice faction on 
27 December had claimed 94 members, although only 65 attended 
(Interfax, 28 December), and Gaydar on 9 January again claimed 94 
(ITAR-TASS, 10 January).  Russia's Choice faction Secretary 
Sergey Yushenkov on 18 January reported that the faction had 
grown from 76 to 78 (Interfax, 18 january). 
   Although splintering into small factions is to a certain extent 
discouraged by the Duma's decision to not allow the formation of 
any faction smaller than 35 (See Box Three), some prominent 
members of Russia's Choice have already declared their intention 
to split off.  Finance Minister Boris Fedorov and lawyer Andrey 
Makarov announced they were leaving Russia's Choice to join a new 
faction--" the Union of 12 December"--being formed by Irina 
Khakamada of the Economic Freedom Party and Moscow Deputy Premier 
Aleksandr Braginskiy of the Russian Movement of Democratic 
Reforms (Interfax, 18 January).  Fedorov indicated he was angry 
that Gaydar decided to resign as first deputy premier without 
consulting his cabinet colleagues, according to the 19 january 
Segodnya, which also stated that many of the new Khakamada 
faction had come from Russia's Choice.  Giving further indication 
of dissention within Russia's Choice, Segodnya reported that some 
Russia's Choice members had revolted against Gaydar at a meeting 
just before the Duma opened, proposing to elect Gennadiy Burbulis 
as faction head. 
   Members of the component groups of Russia's Choice appear to 
behave as members of independent organizations making their own 
policies.  Democratic Russia leaders Lev Ponomarev and Gleb 
Yakunin recently threatened to withdraw support for Yeltsin and 
the cabinet if he did not drop agriculture chief Aleksandr 
Zaveryukha as deputy premier.  Complaining that the impending 
reorganization of the cabinet may drop some reformist deputy 
premiers while leaving Zaveryukha, who represents the Agrarian 
Party "which consistently opposes reform policy and the 
presidential decree on land," the DemRossiya leaders said their 
party "will be forced to revise its course of supporting 
presidential and government policy" if reformers are dropped and 
Zaveryukha retained (Interfax, 12 January; Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 
13 January). 
   Despite the fact that some Duma rules work against small 
factions, Russia's Choice has been debating whether to split into 
two big pseudo-independent factions for tactical reasons--to take 
advantage of the privileges granted to factions by the new Duma 
rules.  Each faction gets a vote in the Duma's presidium, and by 
splitting Russia's Choice can have two votes (Segodnya, 18 
January).  Russia's Choice Secretary Yushenkov explicitly 
referred to such a strategy on 16 January (Interfax, 16 January). 
   While Russia's Choice has appeared to fragment and shrink, 
Shakhray's reformist PRES registered a larger number of members 
than included in the published lists of candidates and winners or 
previous estimates.  This apparently reflects the recent decision 
of a group of 20 "financial and industrial" independents led by 
St. Petersburg entrepreneur Mark Goryachev, who was elected with 
the support of the Civic Union, to join PRES, raising the 
faction's size to 40 (ITAR-TASS, Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 12 January; 
Segodnya, 13 January).  Even with the addition, however, PRES has 
officially registered only 30 members. 
   Anti-Reform Factions 
   The relatively large gain in registered members for the Agrarian 
Party suggests that a number of rural officials--chiefs of local 
agricultural administrations, farm managers, etc.--who did not 
run as Agrarian Party candidates in the election have now joined 
the faction to lobby for rural interests.  The size of the 
Agrarian faction puts pressure on Yeltsin and Chernomyrdin to 
retain Agrarian Party leader Zaveryukha, who has fought reformers 
over agricultural subsidies, as a deputy premier. 
   The failure of all deputies elected as CPRF adherents to register 
with their party faction suggests that the Communists, who have 
heretofor appeared more disciplined than the looser blocs, may be 
having some problems of factionalism or that they may be allowing 
some members to form satellite factions.  The CPRF faction 
registered only 45, even though 48 had been identified with the 
CPRF in the list of winners.  One of the straying communists was 
Anatoliy Lukyanov, who, even though running on the CPRF party 
list, apparently did not join its faction, as the 12 january 
Nezavisimaya Gazeta reported him trying to form a separate 
conservative "Russian Way" faction.  Segodnya on 13 january 
asserted that the CPRF had specifically sent Lukyanov and a group 
of its members to help Vlasov form the "Russian Way" faction. 
   The LDPR's 63 fell slightly short of the number identified in the 
list of winners and of party leaders' claims.  The list of 
winners in the 28 December Rossiyskaya Gazeta identified 64 LDPR 
members, while Zhirinovskiy had claimed 59 party list deputies 
and 5 district deputies at the first meeting of the LDPR faction 
on 10 january (ITAR-TASS, 10 january), and LDPR cochairman 
Aleksandr Vengerovskiy on 11 january claimed his faction would 
consist of the 59 party list deputies plus 6 district deputies, 
totalling 65 (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 12 January).  In view of 
Stankevich's statement that some deputies may still join 
factions, stray LDPR deputies may simply be slow in joining their 
party's faction. 
   Independents 
   In a move that may herald a resurrection of centrism in the Duma, 
a mixed group of centrist industrialists and officials managed to 
form the second largest faction, the "New Regional Policy" 
faction.  Izvestiya on 14 January said that "judging by the 
group's declaration," it wants to occupy the center ground 
formerly held by the Civic Union, which failed to win the minimum 
5 percent in the election.  The core of the faction, according to 
Izvestiya, is the leaders of big enterprises, and it includes 
almost all army generals elected to the Duma and varied members 
ranging from representatives of republics headed by former CPSU 
Secretary Aleksandr Dzasokhov (from North Ossetia) to 
controversial millionaire businessman Artem Tarasov (from Moscow 
city).  Izvestiya also saw a connection with Premier Viktor 
Chernomyrdin, since the premier's assistant Vladimir Kvasov 
(Moscow Oblast), leader of the cabinet's apparat and recently 
promoted to ministerial rank (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 10 January), 
joined the new faction.  So, according to Izvestiya, "the talk in 
the Duma corridors is that the new association enjoys the 
sympathy of the premier." 
   Implications 
   The reformist parties in the Duma appear to be compounding their 
poor showing in the December elections through their inability to 
cooperate to further common interests, and the main reformist 
bloc--Russia's Choice--appears to be in danger of disintegrating. 
In contrast, the anti-reform parties' ability to work together 
(aided by partially overlapping leadership of the Agrarians and 
Communists) thus far has allowed them to control key decisions 
even though they do not actually have a majority of the Duma 
within their own ranks.  This state of affairs bodes ill for 
prospects for cooperation between President Yeltsin and the Duma, 
but fortunately for Yeltsin, the new constitution allows him to 
avoid an immediate potential confrontation by giving him the 
power to appoint new members of the cabinet without seeking Duma 
confirmation. 
   Box 1 
   Choice Between Two Anti-Yeltsin Candidates 
   The two candidates for Duma speaker--Ivan Rybkin from the 
Agrarians and Communists and Yuriy Vlasov from the nationalist 
"Russian Way" (ITAR-TASS, 13 January)--both appear anti-Yeltsin 
and anti-reform, with Vlasov perhaps even more hostile to 
reformers than Rybkin. 
   Rybkin is a somewhat reformist communist, who after the August 
1991 putsch praised Aleksandr Yakovlev, Eduard Shevardnadze, and 
Mikhail Gorbachev as the "intellectual nucleus" of the communist 
party (Interfax, 10 September 1991).  But he also later defended 
the CPSU against Yeltsin, joining with nationalist Sergey Baburin 
and others to ask the Constitutional Court to review the 
constitutionality of Yeltsin's ban on the CPSU (ITAR-TASS, 7 May 
1992).  Long a prominent communist official, he had been second 
secretary of the Volgograd CPSU Obkom, then coordinator of the 
"Communists of Russia" faction in the old Russian parliament, 
then head of the Russian Communist Party's Central Committee 
Department for Ties with Soviets (Interfax, 10 September 1991). 
In October 1991 he helped dissident communist Roy Medvedev 
organize the "Socialist Workers Party" (Izvestiya, 11 October 
1991; Interfax, 26 October 1991).  At the February 1993 congress 
of the CPRF that elected Zyuganov chairman, Rybkin and present 
Agrarian Party Chairman Mikhail Lapshin were elected deputy 
chairmen (ITAR-TASS, 15 February 1993).  He, like Lapshin, 
migrated to the new Agrarian Party later in 1993.  He opposed 
Yeltsin's 21 September dissolution of parliament and worked in 
the parliament during Yeltsin's September-October siege 
(Komsomolskaya Pravda, 15 January).  After being elected speaker, 
however, Rybkin pledged to cooperate with Yeltsin, to work for 
consensus, and to "rise above his party allegiance" (ITAR-TASS, 
14 January).  Segodnya on 15 January quoted one Russia's Choice 
deputy characterizing Rybkin as an enlightened communst--someone 
who rose "on the late Gorbachev wave" and "not some sort of 
Zyuganov." 
   Vlasov, who won 200 votes in the first round of balloting, 
initially had the reputation of a reformer but later emerged as a 
radical nationalist and conservative.  A former champion weight 
lifter who was elected to the USSR Congress of People's Deputies 
in 1989, he won celebrity on 31 May 1989 by openly and harshly 
denouncing the KGB at one of the first sessions of the congress 
(Pravda, 2 June 1989), creating a sensation and helping to set a 
new tone of outspokenness for the Soviet parliament, which for 
the first time had been elected from among multiple candidates. 
Since then, however, he has repeatedly worked with 
ultranationalists and communists, for example, joining with Gen. 
Albert Makashov, Aleksandr Nezvorov, Sazhi Umalatova, CPRF 
Chairman Gennadiy Zyuganov, and Zhirinovskiy at a mid-1992 
"Russian National Convention" (ITAR-TASS, 12 June 1992; Radio 
Rossii, 15 June 1992), and in October 1993 becoming the No. 1 
candidate for conservative Viktor Aksyuchits's Christian 
Democratic Movement (Izvestiya, 19 October 1993), which, however, 
failed to get enough signatures to get on the December ballot. 
Nezavisimaya Gazeta reported on 12 January 1994 that he was 
working with communist leader Anatoliy Lukyanov, Baburin, and 
Nezvorov to get enough members to register a nationalist "Russian 
Way" faction in the Duma.  In his speech as a candidate for 
speaker at the Duma session, Vlasov bluntly told Russia's Choice 
that "I have opposed you and will continue to do so" (Izvestiya, 
15 January). 
   End Box 1 
   Box 2 
   Size of Factions 
   Chairman of the State Duma's temporary secretariat Sergey 
Stankevich announced on 13 January that nine factions have been 
registered and gave the size of each faction.  He cautioned that 
"these figures were not final because deputies were continuing to 
apply for membership" in the factions (Interfax, 13 January).  In 
addition to the eight parties apparently automatically entitled 
to faction status for clearing the 5 percent barrier in the 
election, a group of independents--the New Regional Policy group- 
-registered as a faction.  The figures given by Stankevich add up 
to 386 of the 444 elected deputies, indicating that 58 are still 
unassociated with any faction. 
   Registered Faction     Size*   Election   High Estimate 
                               List**     20 December*** 
   Russia's Choice        75****  58  (69)   103 
   New Regional Policy    65 
   Liberal-Democratic     63      64  (64)    66 
   Agrarian               55      33  (39)    49 
   CPRF                   45      48  (49)    62 
   PRES                   30      19  (22)    29 
   Yavlinskiy Bloc        25      22  (27)    28 
   Women of Russia        23      23  (24)    25 
   DPR                    15      15  (16)    17 
   *Given by Stankevich (Interfax, 13 january). 
   **Identified by party in the list of winners in the 28 December 
Rossiyskaya Gazeta.  In parentheses is a count including those 
identified with the party in the 30 November Rossiyskaya Gazeta 
list of candidates but not in the 28 December list of winners 
(see the Trends of 5 January 1994, pages 14, 15, 18). 
   ***A 20 December ITAR-TASS report based on "reliable government 
sources."  This has been the highest count for all parties except 
Yavlinskiy's to appear anywhere.  Candidates from the Civic 
Union, the Russian Movement for Democratic Reforms, Dignity and 
Charity, and Future of Russia also won some district seats (see 
the Trends of 5 January 1994, page 15, 18), but these factions 
had too few deputies to form a faction. 
   ****Stankevich said 75, according to the 13 january Interfax, but 
the 14 January Izvestiya and Trud accounts said 76. 
   End Box 2 
   Box 3 
   Minimum Size for Factions 
   The Duma after much wrangling decided on 11 january that factions 
must have at least 35 members (ITAR-TASS, 11 January; Segodnya, 
12 January; Rossiyskaya Gazeta, Krasnaya Zvezda, 13 January). 
Although some groups have responded to this minimum requirement 
by joining other factions and abandoning ambitions to go it 
alone, others persist in efforts to attract enough members to 
constitute a separate faction.  According to the 14 january 
Izvestiya, an "industrial and financial" group failed to gather 
enough members to form a faction, apparently prompting it to join 
PRES (ITAR-TASS, Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 12 january).  Izvestiya on 
14 January said that a "patriotic" group led by former CPSU 
Politburo member Lukyanov was still trying to form a faction, 
while Nezavisimaya Gazeta on 12 January said that nationalist 
Baburin was forming a "Russian Way" group with Lukyanov, 
extremist television commentator Nezvorov, and Vlasov, but still 
had not reached 35.  Segodnya on 13 January asserted that Vlasov 
had asked the CPRF to send some of its members to join his group 
to make it big enough to be a faction and that a group of 
communists led by Lukyanov had responded.  Izvestiya reported 
that Economic Freedom Party leader Khakamada had failed to form a 
faction and had joined Russia's Choice, but later reports 
indicated Khakamada's "Union of 12 December" group was growing 
and may reach 35.  Interfax reported on 16 january that 
Khakamada's faction had already gathered 23 members and Segodnya 
on 19 january reported it had 22 members and "verbal assurances" 
of joining from 8 others. 
   The 35-member minimum did not disbar the parties that made it 
over the 5 percent threshold in the party list voting but 
received fewer than 35 seats--PRES with 30, the Yavlinskiy bloc 
with 25, Women of Russia with 23, Democratic Party of Russia 
(DPR) with 15--from being officially recognized as factions. 
   End Box 3 
(AUTHOR:  HAHN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION, (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/PF 21/2153 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43204 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000003694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   22 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-2lJAN94-Russia/Ukraine/U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      Russia and Ukraine React to Trilateral Agreement </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                              In anticipation of a showdown with the Ukrainian parliament 
following the recent signing of the trilateral U.S.-Russian- 
Ukrainian agreement on nuclear weapons, Ukrainian government 
officials have mounted a campaign to win parliament's 
acquiescence in the agreement, arguing that Ukraine's refusal to 
bend under Russian and world pressure has led to an agreement 
that meets the conditions laid down in the parliament's 18 
November 1993 resolution on the START-I Treaty.  In contrast, 
Russian officials--in a strategy Ukrainian opponents of the deal 
are likely to use against it--have suggested just the reverse, 
portraying the agreement as a vindication of their own strategy 
of marshaling international pressure on Ukraine to relinquish the 
nuclear arsenal deployed on its territory.  Meanwhile, in a 
development likely to further diminish chances that the current 
Ukrainian parliament will go along with the deal, Russian and 
Ukrainian officials have expressed differing interpretations of a 
key provision of the accord on relief of Ukraine's energy debt to 
Russia. 

                           END SUMMARY 

   The Ukrainian government has begun an uncharacteristically 
agressive battle with opponents in the Rada to win the 
parliament's acquiescence in the trilateral agreement signed by 
Presidents Clinton, Yeltsin, and Kravchuk on 14 January.  Since 
returning to Kiev following the signing ceremony in Moscow, 
Kravchuk and other key Ukrainian government and military 
officials have mounted an offensive stressing that the agreement 
will provide security and economic benefits to Ukraine and 
enhance the country's international stature as well. 

   Kravchuk on the Offensive 

   Both Kravchuk and the cabine appear to be committed to defending 
the agreement.  Kravchuk, en route to Moscow on 13 January, 
suggested willingness to risk his political career by signing the 
accord, saying the "career of a politician cannot compare with 
the global problem we are solving" (Interfax, 13 January).  At a 
press conference held on his return to Kiev, Kravchuk lambasted 
domestic critics of the agreement who, he said, had accused the 
government of buckling under pressure from Russia and the United 
States and bringing Ukraine "to its knees."  Calling such 
statements "absurd," Kravchuk claimed that the critics are "a 
minority" and "demonstrate their total ignorance."  He took pains 
to dispel any impression that Ukraine had yielded to Russian or 
U.S. pressure, asserting that the agreement resulted from an 
understanding by Russia and the United States of Kiev's problems 
rather than "pressure or arm twisting" (Interfax, 14 January). 
Ukraine's negotiators, Kravchuk said, had remained steadfast in 
promoting the country's interests, thereby raising Ukraine's 
political prestige and image" as a nation whose "policies are 
predictable" (Kiev radio, 14 January).  Kravchuk and other 
officials used the same argument in winning the endorsement of 
the Ukrainian Cabinet of Ministers on the eve of the signing, 
suggesting that the government will maintain a united front on 
the issue.  According to Kiev radio (13 January), the government 
leaders praised "the active stand of Ukraine's representatives" 
in the trilateral negotiations in December and January, saying it 
produced "the essential progress" toward the agreement which 
would "guarantee our state's security and promise it considerable 
economic benefits." 

   Economic Benefits 

   In an apparent effort to gain maximum leverage from the economic 
benefits of the agreement, Ukrainian officials have played up not 
only the benefits specified in the agreement, such as fuel rods 
for Ukrainian power reactors, but others they argue will accrue 
from improved relations with the United States, Russia, and the 
West resulting from the agreement: 

   -- Kravchuk, in his 14 January press conference in Kiev, said the 
agreement opens the way for expanded economic assistance from the 
United States, "international financial organizations, and 
Russia" (Kiev radio, 14 January). 

   -- In a roundtable discussion broadcast on Kiev radio (15 
January), Foreign Minister Anatoliy Zlenko cited the U.S. 
commitment to establish a foundation for small businesses, a $155 
million allocation to Ukraine by the United States for "economic 
reform," and "a whole series of specific projects and programs"- 
-including, according to Defense Minister Vitaliy Radetskyy, U.S. 
assistance in providing housing for servicemen--expected to 
result from the pending visit to the United States of a Ukrainian 
economic delegation.  Zlenko also hinted that the United States 
would increase the $175 million in dismantlement assistance it 
has promised Ukraine.  "We know what other reserves they are 
talking about and, of course, we will be able to get access to 
those reserves so as to increase this sum," Zlenko said without 
elaboration. 

   -- In a similar vein, Deputy Prime Minister Deputy Shmarov, in 
remarks paraphrased by Kiev radio on 17 January, said Ukraine's 
denuclearization "will enable Ukraine to receive international 
financial aid, including much needed investment to help resolve 
defense conversion issues, overcome the economic crisis, and 
provide for the social protection of our people" (Kiev radio, 17 
January). 

   Security Guarantees 

   Government officials evidently feel that the issue of security 
guarantees presents the greatest challenge in their efforts to 
sell the agreement at home.  They indirectly acknowledged that 
Ukraine had failed in its effort to obtain legally binding 
security guarantees from the United States and Russia, and 
highlighted instead the multilateral security guarantees accruing 
to nonnuclear parties to the Nonproliferation Treaty and 
emphasized Russia's pledge not to use economic pressure against 
Ukraine: 

   -- Clearly uncomfortable when asked repeatedly about security 
guarantees for Ukraine, Kravchuk, in his 14 January press 
conference, responded vaguely, at one point suggesting that 
security guarantees are not very meaningful.  "Security does not 
mean signed documents," Kravchuk said, stressing instead that the 
road to security begins with "civilized" policies.  When pressed 
further, Kravchuk cited the tripartite agreement's pledge to 
"respect the territorial integrity, inviolability of borders, 
sovereignty, and independence of Ukraine."  Kravchuk added that 
by joining the NPT, "those security guarantees will acquire a 
more specific, precise nature."  And he noted that Russia had 
pledged not to use "economic pressure" against Ukraine. 

   -- Zlenko, in contrast, was more self-assured on the issue of 
security guarantees in the 15 January roundtable discussion on 
Kiev radio, asserting that Ukraine had successfully won 
"multilateral" assurances of security through the NPT process 
rather than mere "bilateral" assurances and adding that France 
had also offered security guarantees.  Underscoring his point, 
Zlenko asked, "Do you understand what we are talking about?  What 
does it mean for our state, which is still unsteady on its feet 
of independence, to receive political guarantees from leading 
nuclear states?  It is a guarantee protecting Ukraine's political 
sovereignty." 

   Military Endorsements 

   Ukrainian military officials also gave their stamp of approval to 
the agreement affirming that the agreement adequately protects 
Ukraine's security, and pointing out that since Kiev does not 
control the nuclear weapons on its soil, they afford Ukraine no 
real security: 

   -- In an 18 January press conference, Radetskyy said he "fully 
supports" the agreement, adding, according to paraphrased 
remarks, that Ukraine "is incapable of maintaining its own 
nuclear weapons at the moment and would have to get rid of them 
sooner or later" (Kiev UNIAN, 18 January).  Earlier, Radetskyy 
said "high-precision" conventional weapons are more valuable for 
Ukraine's security and that he plans to report "in the near 
future" to the defense Council on plans to "compensate for the 
withdrawal of the nuclear weapons" (Kiev radio, 15 January). 

   -- In a similar vein, Deputy Defense Minister Col. Gen. Ivan 
Oliynik said the nuclear arms in Ukraine had no bearing "on the 
issues of our security.  We do not control these weapons, we 
cannot maintain them. . . . and we cannot but implement the 
decision taken by our state to become non-nuclear in the future." 
He also said Ukraine would "have to rely on our own forces [and] 
create nonnuclear forces that can enable us to ensure the 
protection of our state" (Kiev radio, 18 January). 

   Safety Issue Played Up 

   In an unusual twist to support their efforts to sell the 
agreement, Ukrainian officials have also adopted a Russian 
argument, which until recently they had heatedly rebutted, that 
the current physical condition of nuclear warheads in Ukraine is 
deteriorating dangerously.  In his 14 January news conference, 
Kravchuk himself raised the prospect--often used by Russian 
military officials--of a nuclear nightmare on Ukrainian soil, 
saying Ukraine is "obliged to remove [the weapons] because they 
are more dreadful than all the Chernobyl-type accidents taken 
together," adding, "we cannot maintain them with due 
responsibility for our future" (Kiev radio, 14 January).  At an 
18 January press conference, Kostyantyn Hryhschenko, chief of 
disarmament for the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, reportedly said 
warheads stored in Ukraine are increasingly unstable and pose a 
serious environmental threat to Ukraine (UNIAR, Kiev radio, 18 
January). 

   Party and Legislative Reaction 

   Although some Ukrainian opposition leaders condemned the 
agreement even before it had been signed and released, a number 
of key legislators adopted a wait-and-see attitude while others 
expressed support.  Meanwhile, at a parliamentary meeting on 20 
January, several relevant committees (foreign affairs, defense 
and security, and legislation and legality) were instructed to 
prepare by 25 January a "resolution" on the "compatibility" of 
the trilateral agreement with the parliament's 18 November 
resolution (UNIAN, 20 January). 

   Legislative Opponents.  Some leaders of the main opposition party 
People's Movement of Ukraine (Rukh) vituperatively opposed the 
agreement, although some other leading members took a more 
moderate stand.  Rukh Chairman Vyacheslav Chornovil called the 
agreement "a national betrayal," and Les Tanyuk, a Rukh leader 
and member of the parliament's presidium, asserted Ukraine had 
been brought "to its knees" (UNIAN, AFP, 14 January; Interfax, 18 
January).  However, another Rukh leader, Volodymyr Chernyak, was 
less harsh, praising the agreement for opening possibilities for 
economic cooperation and compensation, but faulting it for being 
short on security guarantees (UNIAN, 13 January).  Similarly, a 
statement issued by the Conservative Republican Party, headed by 
the well-known radical nationalist Stepan Khmara, reportedly 
claimed that Kravchuk had "acted contrary to Ukraine's national 
interests" in signing the agreement (Krasnaya Zvezda, 19 
January).  Mykhaylo Horyn, leader of the Ukrainian Republican 
Party, keyed on Ukraine's national security interests, asserting 
in an interview published on 12 January that Ukraine should 
retain indefinitely the 46  SS-24 ICBMs deployed on Ukrainian 
soil.  Horyn urged Kravchuk not to sign the agreement, saying it 
would be an "irreparable blunder" (Za Vilnu Ukrayinu). 

   Undecided Legislators.  A number of key legislators said that 
they needed to study the document before taking a stand and 
claimed that if the accord did not meet the conditions set out in 
parliament's 18 November resolution on START-I they would oppose 
it.  According to the Ukrainian news agency UNIAR, parliament 
speaker Ivan Plyushch was "refraining from comment" until the 
"relevant documents are studied" (15 January).  Yuriy Kostenko, 
Minister of Environmental Protection and head of the 
parliamentary commission on ratification of START-I, was 
similarly cited by Russian media as saying that he would "like to 
read the text" of the agreement before drawing any "conclusions" 
about whether it conforms to the parliament's conditions (ITAR- 
TASS, Moscow radio, 16 January).  In April 1993, Kostenko was 
widely reported to have claimed that the nuclear weapons on its 
territory made Ukraine a "nuclear state" (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 27 
April 1993; Kiev radio, 28 April 1993).  According to the Russian 
news agency Interfax, Yevgeniy Marmazov, deputy head of the 
parliament's foreign affairs commission, told an interviewer that 
the legislature would "not ratify the deal unless the conditions 
it had set" were met, but he apparently did not draw any 
preliminary conclusion as to whether the agreement met this test 
(14 January). 

   Supportive Legislators.  Some legislative leaders have reacted 
positively to the agreement, some citing the participation of the 
United States in the accord and some the economic benefits to 
Ukraine.  Mykola Shulha, chairman of the parliamentary committee 
for issues of state sovereignty and inter-republic and inter- 
ethnic relations, told a Ukrainian interviewer that he would 
"endeavor to convince" parliament to support the agreement, 
arguing that Russian adherence to the terms of the agreement was 
guaranteed by the "global authority of such an influential state 
as America" (UNIAN, 14 January).  Vladimir Grinyev, former deputy 
head of parliament and leader of the New Ukraine Movement, 
reportedly said that he is "supportive" of the agreement and that 
Ukraine will "reap economic dividends" from it (Interfax, 18 
delegation.  Zlenko also hinted that the United States would 
increase the $175 million in dismantlement assistance it has 
promised Ukraine.  "We know what other reserves they are talking 
about and, of course, we will be able to get access to those 
reserves so as to increase this sum," Zlenko said without 
elaboration. 

   Russian Reaction 

   While Ukrainian officials have stressed the benefits of the 
agreement to Ukraine, Russian officials have let it be known that 
they view the agreement as the fruit of their and U.S. efforts to 
pressure Ukraine to relinquish the nuclear arsenal on its 
territory: 

   -- During in a joint press conference with President Clinton on 
14 January, Yeltsin did not demur when an ITAR-TASS correspondent 
spoke of Russian efforts during Yeltsin's recent visit to 
Brussels to get the United States and NATO "to exert more 
influence" on Ukraine.  Asked if his "hopes" on this score had 
been justified, Yeltsin replied, "I think our hopes have been 
justified extremely quickly" (Russian TV, 14 January). 

   -- An unnamed "senior official" of the Ministry of Foreign 
Affairs reportedly told Interfax that the "extremely negative 
reaction" by the world community--above all Russia and the United 
States--to Kiev's earlier hesitant stand on the nuclear question 
"was understood by Leonid Kravchuk" (1O January). 

   -- In a 12 January article in the government newspaper 
Rossiyskaya Gazeta, commentator Vladimir Kuznechevskiy wrote that 
Kravchuk was "unable to withstand the combined pressure of the 
U.S. and Russian presidents" and had therefore "agreed" to sign 
the document giving up nuclear weapons. 

   Russian officials may also view the trilateral signing as 
evidence of tacit U.S. acknowledgment of the primacy of Russia's 
role among states of the former Soviet Union.  Member of the 
Presidential Council Andranik Migranyan, in 17 January remarks 
disseminated by ITAR-TASS, said that with the trilateral 
agreement the United States had confirmed "Russia's special role 
in maintaining stability on the territory of the post-Soviet 
space."  The same sentiment was expressed in a Nezavisimaya 
Gazeta commentary on the trilateral talks (13 January), which 
asserted that Yeltsin "managed to demonstrate the role his 
country is playing in the former Soviet Union:  Leonid Kravchuk 
and Bill Clinton will negotiate on his territory and he himself 
will be involved in the talks." 

   Disagreement Over Compensation 

A controversy over the possibility of debt relief for Ukraine as 
part of the trilateral agreement demonstrates a serious 
divergence in the two sides' interpretation of the agreement. 
Although it has been widely reported that Russia agreed in the 
tripartite talks to write off all or part of Ukraine's energy 
debt as compensation for tactical nuclear weapons removed from 
Ukraine in 1992, (Interfax, 12 January; Moscow radio, 14 
January), some Russian officials have denied such a possibility, 
thereby angering Ukrainian officials who are trying to sell the 
agreement on its economic merits.  Kozyrev, in remarks on 14 
January, said that "any write-off of the Ukrainian debt is out of 
the question" (Interfax, 14 January).  In addition, a senior 
official of Gosprom, a leading Russian gas producer, said the 
Russian government would "never" agree to compensate Ukraine for 
denuclearization by writing off its energy debt (Interfax, 12 
January).  Zlenko reportedly reacted with "surprise and 
disagreement" to Kozyrev's statement, saying, in remarks 
paraphrased 14 January by Interfax, that a Ukrainian debt relief 
"formula" was "laid down in the agreement."  In a 14 January 
press conference at the Ukrainian Embassy in Moscow, Kravchuk 
said the "amount and form" of compensation for tactical nuclear 
weapons removed from Ukraine in 1992 was yet to be determined, 
but that "one option" was debt relief for Ukrainian energy 
imports. 

   Outlook 

   The number of Ukrainian legislators reserving judgement on the 
agreement offers some hope that Kravchuk may be able to sway the 
parliament's final reaction to the agreement, and Kravchuk and 
the Ukrainian Government appear to be forcefully pushing the 
agreement now.  But in the past, Kravchuk has backed away from 
controversial decisions, such as the signing of the Massandra 
agreement with Russia, when the political heat rose.  Moscow's 
view of the trilateral agreement, which surely will not go 
unnoticed in Ukraine, may raise the heat for Kravchuk by 
undermining his strongest selling points:  enhanced international 
prestige and economic benefits.  Kravchuk's domestic opponents 
will likely use the Russians' statements that the agreement was 
the product of pressure on Ukraine against him, particularly as 
the campaign for Ukraine's 27 March legislative election gets 
into full swing.  The apparent disagreement over debt relief to 
Ukraine is also likely to complicate Kravchuk's effort to sell 
the agreement on its economic merits and may raise additional 
difficulties when the parties attempt to resolve outstanding 
issues of implementation. 

(AUTHOR: ROBERTON. QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION, (703) 733-6O7O.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/JF 22/0047Z JAN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43205 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000003794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   22 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-21JAN94-JORDAN-PLO 
<H3> <TI>      Strained Relations Will Persist Despite Economic Pact </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                               Despite the success of Jordan and the PLO in signing an economic 
accord following intense Jordanian pressure, Amman has clearly 
signaled that it does not intend to tolerate Palestinian neglect 
of its political and economic interests as the PLO negotiates 
with Israel over the terms of the Gaza-Jericho accord.  In 
addition to being the catalyst for the latest economic agreement, 
the increasing Jordanian pressure will likely have the effect of 
forcing the PLO to pay greater attention to other Jordanian 
concerns, such as border and security matters. 

                           END SUMMARY 

   In the context of continuing strains between Jordan and the PLO, 
the accord signed by the two sides in Amman on 7 January--giving 
Jordan's Central Bank broad financial responsibilities in the 
West Bank and Gaza during the transitional period of Palestinian 
self-rule--has received mixed coverage in Jordan's media. 
Several Amman newspapers have emphasized that the accord came 
only after King Husayn exerted strong pressure in his 1 January 
speech to top-level military officials.  In the speech, the king 
described his meeting with 'Arafat two days earlier as "extremely 
frank" and said that he had warned 'Arafat that unless he took 
advantage of one "last opportunity" to coordinate with Jordan, 
Amman and the PLO could "separately assume their 
responsibilities" (Amman TV, 1 January).  For example, an 
editorial in Al-Dustur portrayed the pact as being a direct 
result of "His Majesty King Husayn's directives, calls and wise 
views regarding the need to establish clear, firm and serious 
Jordanian-Palestinian relations"--a clear reference to the king's 
1 January speech   In a reference to recently strained relations 
between the sides, the editorial stressed the necessity of 
"circumventing all the residues and repercussions of the previous 
phase" (8 January). 

   Other press comment expressed an outright distrust of the PLO, 
complaining that it is negotiating with Israel at Jordan's 
expense, and that the new economic agreement offers Jordan no 
long-term guarantees for its banking privileges in the 
territories under self-rule. 

   --A Jordan Times editorial echoed Information Minister al- 
'Anani's assessment of the event as "comforting" to Palestinians 
and Jordanians in light of the "seemingly tense 
atmosphere...between the leaderships of Jordan and Palestine," 
which has been "disturbing for people on both sides of the Jordan 
River."  At the same time, it accused the PLO of having neglected 
Jordanian interests in the haste to conclude agreements with 
Israel, explaining that "the Palestinian brothers were so 
submerged in their bargaining with the Israelis that they 
relegated (sic) their coordination with the Jordanians" (8 
January). 

   --Viewing the accord as a setback for Jordan, a column in Al-Ra'y 
asserted sharply that the agreement "does not commit either of 
the two parties to anything" and actually constitutes a "step 
backward" from an earlier draft.  The columnist complained that 
the agreement allows Jordanian banks to operate in the 
territories only "until the self-rule authority is able to 
prevent them from doing so," amd that the Jordanian dinar would 
cease to circulate in the territories once a Palestinian currency 
is issued. (See Note 1)  It also ridiculed the provision on 
reopening Jordanian banks, since "Israel, the party with the 
authority, has (already) allowed this" in its own separate 
agreement signed with Jordan (10 January). 

   (Note 1) These conditions were not present in a reported earlier 
draft, highlights of which were published in the 13 December 
issue of Al-Ra'y. 

   Tough Talk Underscores King's Impatience 

   In addition to the ultimatum to 'Arafat on the economic accord, 
King Husayn used his 1 January speech to bluntly criticize 
'Arafat's failure to coordinate with Jordan, an attack that 
appears intended to embarrass the PLO and drive home the 
seriousness with which Husayn views any perceived neglect of 
Amman's interests in the autonomy talks. 

   --Recounting his meeting with 'Arafat, King Husayn said that he 
told the PLO leader that "commitment should mean commitment," and 
that Jordan and the PLO "should not remain in a whirlpool of 
talks that do not yield tangible results." The king added that he 
told 'Arafat that Amman had "tolerated too much, and we cannot 
proceed in this way" (Amman TV). 

   --Appearing to cast aspersions on 'Arafat's ability to 
effectively lead an emerging Palestinian authority, the king 
stated that Palestinian leadership "must now be a leadership for 
all the Palestinians" inside and outside the occupied 
territories, adding that "those who are capable of assuming 
responsibility should be prepared to do so," since "the question 
of credibility is very important" (Amman TV). 

   --Revealing his irritation with 'Arafat for repeatedly raising 
the sensitive issue of creating a Jordanian-Palestinian 
confederation, King Husayn stated that during his talks with 
'Arafat on the subject, he "asked the brother president to drop 
this expression from his lexicon and absolutely not to discuss it 
with me, not in any form--not even any other formula, other type, 
or other approach that leads to this course."  Nevertheless, the 
king suggested that although talks on the subject were unwelcome 
in the current phase, they could occur at a later stage with the 
consensus of both peoples, arguing that "at the appropriate time 
and circumstances, people will decide the nature of the 
relationship which should be established.  But to create formulas 
and act on them, I believe, is premature and out of place" (Amman 
TV). 

   Further clarifying the meaning of the king's remarks on 
confederation, Information Minister Jawad al-'Anani was cited as 
stating in response to a question during a 7 January news 
conference that "King Husayn's recent speech has been clear in 
this regard.  His majesty said that we will leave such a thing 
for the future, and the Jordanian and Palestinian sides will 
decide the nature of the joint relationship between them" (Amman 
radio, 7 January). 

   For their part, Palestinian officials reportedly indicated a 
willingness to defer to Jordan on the confederation issue.  PLO 
Political Department head Faruq ()addumi was cited as stating en 
route to negotiations in Amman that talk about a Jordanian- 
Palestinian confederation was "premature" and that "discussing 
this at present would complicate matters" (4 January). 
Furthermore, Al-Ra'y cited a statement by PLO Executive Committee 
member Muhammad al-Nashashibi indicating that King Husayn had 
personally sought to place the impact of his confederation remark 
in a milder context.  Asked what he thought of the king's remark 
suggesting that 'Arafat drop the word "confederation" from his 
vocabulary, the official responded that "in accordance with the 
clarification that we heard from his majesty the king when he 
honored us with his meeting with us two days ago, 'dropping' is 
not the correct word.  The major hopes and expectations will be 
discussed in due time.  This is what he meant." 

   Implications 

   The signing of the economic pact following King Husayn's 
unusually sharp oration suggests that for now, the PLO will 
likely take more careful account of Amman's concerns with regard 
to the autonomy arrangements in the territories, since it can ill 
afford to risk further alienating an already irritated King 
Husayn.  Given obvious Jordanian doubts about the credibility of 
the PLO leadership, however, Amman can be counted on to maintain 
its pressure on 'Arafat as the two parties move toward a 
reevaluation of their future relationship. 

(AUTHOR: MURRAY.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH  (703) 733-6094) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/jf 22/0105Z JAN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43206 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000003894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   22 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-21JAN94-SYRIA 
<H3> <TI>      Syria-US-Israel </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Arabic     Version of Al-Asad's Statement on "Normal Relations" 

   President Hafiz al-Asad's 16 January statement supporting "normal 
peaceful relations among all" as a result of peace with Israel 
went significantly further than previously in suggesting a 
willingness to meet Israel's demand for full-fledged ties; but in 
his statement, which did not elaborate on the meaning of "normal 
relations," he evidently made a conscious effort to avoid using 
the term in Arabic that most clearly connotes such ties. 
Speaking at the joint press conference with President Clinton 
following their summit in Geneva, al-Asad endorsed "'alaqat silm 
'adiyah" (Damascus TV, 16 January) rather than "'alaqat silm 
tabi'iyah."  Although the former term can also be translated as 
"normal peaceful relations" ('adiyah means ordinary or regular), 
Arab media generally use the word "tatbi'"--from which the latter 
expression is derived--to connote "normalization," presumably 
including full diplomatic ties, trade, and tourism.  In fact, the 
term "tatbi'" was used by Syrian media's Arabic translation of 
President Clinton's reference at the joint press conference to 
eventual "normal and peaceful relations" between Syria and 
Israel. 

(AUTHOR:  BROWN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
MIDDLE EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH (703) 733-6094.) 
jf 22/0117Z JAN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43207 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000003994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   27 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-007--MAGHREB 
<H3> <TI>      MAGHREB PRESS REVIEW No. 1 </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
This     press review series focuses on economic, social, and 
demographic issues in the Maghreb countries of Algeria, Libya, 
Morocco, and Tunisia. 
   ALGERIA 
   UMA, Algerian Presidency Viewed 
   According to London expatriate daily AL-HAYAH, Algeria may be 
distracted by its civil unrest and economic problems in leading the 
Arab Maghreb Union (UMA) after assuming the UMA presidency on 1 
January 1994.  However, Algeria may be able to promote a resolution 
of the Western Sahara issue, possibly by supporting the UN-mandated 
referendum, and may find itself in a better position to negotiate 
its border with Morocco.  According to the article, "All observers 
agree that the UMA will not be an effective organization as long as 
Morocco and Algeria have no strategic accord since they form the 
backbone of the Union." 
   The AL-HAYAH article also stated that Algeria's relations with 
Tunis have improved since the two countries finally drew fixed 
borders, but that its relations with Libya were still uneasy because 
of al-Qadhdhafi's alleged support for the Islamic Salvation Front 
(FIS).  Regarding the UMA's international role, AL-HAYAH said that 
Algeria will not be able to repeat its 1990 hosting of the 
Mediterranean Basin summit because of the impasse between Libya and 
the United States, France, and Britain. 
   A commentary in Casablanca daily AL-ITTIHAD AL-ISHTIRAKI compared 
the UMA to an invalid still confined to the recovery room, and 
questioned whether Algeria could revitalize the UMA in view of its 
own problems.  In addition to its internal strife and the UN 
sanctions against Libya, Algiers would have to deal with the 
significant problem of the European Union's insistence on 
negotiating separate deals with individual Maghreb countries, rather 
than negotiating with the entire region.  AL-ITTIHAD AL-ISHTIRAKI 
commented, ??Now five years old, the UMA needs a thorough evaluation 
to recognize its fractured state and to put things back together. 
If there really is an intention to continue the organization and to 
build it, it must not remain a structure far removed from the 
citizenry and from being concerned with their needs and idealism. 
Indeed, the Arab Maghreb, which fought collectively against 
colonialism in the Tangiers Conference 35 years ago, should not now 
be under the exclusive control of the ruling powers, nor should it 
be a prisoner of their transitory policies." (London AL-HAYAH 30 Dec 
93; Casablanca AL-ITTIHAD AL-ISHTIRAKI 22 Dec 93) 
   MOROCCO 
   Regional Utilities, Rural Finance Projects 
   The World Bank has approved two loans to taIling $260 million to 
back projects costing over $1.5 billion.  Both projects also include 
large-scale co-financing from international donors and domestic 
institutions and reportedly reflect the international community's 
high support for rural development and water-supply projects. 
   A $353.6 million water supply project is to receive a $160 
million loan, repayable over 20 years with a five-year grace period. 
Japan's Overseas Economic Cooperation Fund (OECF) and the African 
Development Bank will provide $84 million and the rest will come 
from domestic sources.  The project is intended to restructure 
regional utilities in Casablanca, Fes, Rabat, Kenitra, Meknes, and 
Marrakech, and strengthen other water-sector institutions, including 
the National Office for Drinking Water (ONEP). 
   The World Bank has also committed $100 million to a $1.15 billion 
rural finance project to promote private investment in rural areas. 
One of the project's main aims is help the Caisse Nationale de 
Credit Agricole move away from its core farm and forestry investment 
to banking on a broader scale.  This will receive substantial co- 
financing including an estimated $30 million from the French Caisse 
Francaise de Developpement; $34 million from Germany's Kreditanstalt 
fuer Wiederaufbau; and $60 million each from the European Investment 
Bank, the Arab Fund for Economic and Social Development, and the 
OECF.  (London MEED 25 Dec 93) 
   TUNISIA 
   AL-HADATH Director Receives Threat 
   Rabat daily AL-MAGHRIB has reported that the staff of Tunisian 
Arabic-language weekly AL-HADATH received a telephone call on 29 
December directed at the manager-chief editor, demanding that he 
"stop writing about the (Muslim) brothers; otherwise he will suffer 
the same fate as Faraj Foudah."  Additional threats were made on 30 
and 31 December.  AL-HADATH reportedly stated that management 
attached "little importance" to these threats, attributing them to 
"traffickers in religion" and to "plain assassins," and noting, 
"This strengthens our belief that we are on the right track--that of 
fighting for Tunisia."  (Rabat AL-MAGHRIB 1 Jan 94) 
   Health Services Statistics 
   According to public health sector statistics, as of 1 September 
1993 there were 1,579 general practitioners and 1,113 specialists 
providing medical services in Tunisia.  The specialists numbered 243 
surgeons, 86 gynecologists, 54 opthalmologists, 42 ear, nose, and 
throat specialists, and 44 radiologists; the remaining 523 were in 
other fields.  In the private sector, there were reportedly 2,100 
doctors, including 1,000 specialists.  (Tunis LE TEMPS 19 Nov 93) 
   Technical Cooperation Program 
   The Tunisian Agency for Technical Cooperation reported that 694 
individuals departed for Gulf and Western countries in 1993 as part 
of bilateral cooperation programs.  Many of these technical programs 
were underwritten by international organizations such as the World 
Bank, the Arab Fund for Social and Economic Development, and the 
United Nations Development Program.  One-third of the 694 came from 
the education sector, another third from the health sector, and the 
remainder from engineering, electrical energy disciplines, 
telecommunications, petroleum, agriculture, mechanics and computer 
science.  The number of Tunisians currently employed by these 
programs in other Middle Eastern countries is as follows:  Saudi 
Arabia (4,034); Oman (1,909); Qatar (502); UAE (404); Bahrain (111); 
Kuwait (87); and Yemen (62).  Some 283 are employed in Western 
countries, including Europe, the United States, and Canada, with 114 
of these working in France.  (Tunis LE TEMPS 8 Dec 93) 
   Olive Oil Surplus Reported 
   According to LE TEMPS, olive oil production has been facing 
pricing, distribution, and stocking problems due to the domestic 
market's inability to absorb surplus quantities.  Although 
production totals have been estimated at 320 million tons, exports 
will only absorb 110 million tons, with the remaining 210 tons to be 
sold on the local market, according to the Ministry of Agriculture. 
The article noted that the domestic olive oil market is "sluggish" 
since consumption has moved to other types of seed oil because of 
the longstanding policy of reserving olive oil for export.  In 
addition, olive oil must compete on the domestic market with 
"inferior" imported seed oils that are sold at competitive prices. 
The article further reported that "significant quantities of 
imported oil at subsidized prices" will also be marketed. 
   The Ministry of Agriculture has proposed a revised price schedule 
to make the surplus olive oil more competitive; however, by lowering 
prices, production in the northern and southern regions could be 
discouraged altogether.  According to LE TEMPS, Minister of 
Agriculture Mohamed Ben Rejeb believes that the current problems are 
temporary and will diminish "if everyone does his part."  The 
state's Office of Olive Oil has reportedly "hidden" the problem by 
"financial juggling" that "has created a deficit of 137 billion 
(dirhams) and 400 billion in bank debts,..  The bailout bid is 
costing the government 103 billion and the banks 20 billion."  The 
article further stated that companies will not weather reduced 
prices at a time when the industry is being privatized.  According 
to LE TEMPS, although the supply of olive oil is increasing, the 
lack of financing and distribution systems will ensure a continuing 
surplus problem.  (Tunis LE TEMPS 7 Dec 93) 
   (QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, AFRICA/LEVANT 
BRANCH AT (703) 733-6408) 
ENEAG/24 Jan/ECONF/NEASA Division cka 24/2032z jan 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43208 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000004194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   27 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-26Jan94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      Moscow's Rescheduling of Elections Meets Varied Responses </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                 The 6 January Russian Federation Central Electoral Commission 
(CEC) announcement scheduling repeat elections to fill vacant 
Federal Assembly seats has prompted varied responses from the 
affected localities.  The Chechen republic continues to balk, 
denouncing the announcement, and again refusing, as in December, 
to hold elections.  Moscow and Tatarstan appear to be making 
progress toward signing a treaty on bilateral relations, a Tatar 
prerequisite for holding elections, suggesting that voting may 
proceed on schedule in that region. 
                             END SUMMARY 
   In an effort to fill vacant upper- and lower-house seats in the 
new Russian parliament, the Russian Federation CEC announced 
"repeat elect ions" have been scheduled in regions where they were 
boycotted or not held on 12 December, namely the republics of 
Tatarstan and Chechnya, and the Yamalo-Nenets autonomous okrug 
(Interfax, 6 January; ITAR-TASS, 6 January).  The CEC scheduled 
elections in Tatarstan and Chechnya, the only republics not to 
have held elections on 12 December, for 13 March and in Yamalo- 
Nenets for 6 March.  The CEC announcement indicated that the 
elections would be organized by local election commissions with 
the "same members" as for the failed 12 December elections. 
   The Chechen republic refused to take part in the 12 December 
Federal Assembly elections (ITAR-TASS, 13 October 1993).  While 
Tatarstan did not openly refuse to hold elections, local 
authorities effectively sabotaged them by using their control of 
local media and by bureaucratic maneuvering, according to an 
article in the 29 December Rossiya.  As a result of the local 
opposition, the elections had to be cancelled because of an 
insufficient number of registered candidates (Kommersant-Daily, 7 
December 1993).  Only one Federation Council deputy was elected 
for the Yamalo-Nenets two-mandate district (Interfax, 20 December 
1993). (See Note) 
   (Note)  Ballots for the December elections allowed the voter to 
vote against all candidates.  Federation Council seats were 
awarded to the two candidates receiving the largest number of 
votes, unless the number of votes in the box against all 
candidates exceeded the total of either of the top two.  It can 
therefore be assumed that only one candidate in the Yamalo-Nenets 
district exceeded the "against all candidates" vote. 
   Chechnya Remains Adament 
   Chechen electoral officials reacted with hostility to the CEC 
announcement of a new election date for the republic.  The CEC 
announcement on Chechnya's elections--termed a "final appeal" by 
Ostankino television's "Novosti" newscast-- asked the "people and 
leadership" of Chechnya to "examine and make a positive decision" 
on the question of the republic's participation in Federal 
Assembly elections (Ostankino TV, 5 January; ITAR-TASS, 6 
January).  Nevertheless, the Chechen republic electoral 
commission vehemently decried the CEC announcement as 
demonstrating Russia's "unwillingness to abandon the gendarme 
approach," "threats," and "intimidation," and it called the 
announcement a "fresh ultimatum" that will "complicate relations" 
between Chechnya and Russia (Interfax, 6 January; Russian TV, 7 
January). 
   Tatarstan Negotiates 
   In contrast to Chechnya's outright opposition, Tatarstan 
President Mintimer Shaymiyev has reportedly offered a compromise, 
agreeing to hold new elections in Tatarstan if Moscow and the 
republic first conclude a bilateral treaty defining Tatarstan's 
sovereignty (Kuranty, 12 January; Interfax, 11 January). 
Although this "Treaty on the Mutual Delegation of Authority and 
Terms of Reference" has yet to be signed, it is cited in the 
Tatarstan Constitution as the "basis" on which Tatarstan will 
associate with the Russian Federation (Sovetskaya Tatariya, 13 
December 1992).  In a possible attempt to pressure Moscow toward 
concluding the treaty with the republic, during a break in the 
first session of the Federation Council--which Shaymiyev and 
Tatarstan Parliament Chairman Farid Mukhamedshin attended as 
guests" (Rossiyskiye Vesti, 11 January; Interfax, 11 January)- 
-Shaymiyev was quoted as saying that repeat elections will 
"depend on whether relations [with the Russian Federation] are 
straightened out" and whether the treaty is signed (Kuranty, 12 
January). 
   The two sides appear to be making progress toward signing the 
treaty.  Nezavisimaya Gazeta reported from "well-informed 
sources" that "full-scale" negotiations will take place between 
Russia and Tatarstan at the end of January and that the Russian 
Government has reportedly been tasked with preparing "within a 
week draft intergovernmental agreements on defense, foreign 
economic activity, banking activity, and budget interrelations 
between Moscow and Kazan" (19 January).  Suggesting that Kazan is 
anticipating a successful outcome of the end-of-January 
negotiations, officials at the Tatarstan republic CEC reportedly 
announced that "operating procedures" will commence as of 1 
February (Segodnya, 22 January). 
   This conciliatory stand appears consistent with Kazan's efforts 
to garner a greater "say" in policy affecting its territory while 
avoiding explicit advocacy of separatism.  Assessing Russian 
President Boris Yeltsin's 11 January address to the Federation 
Council, Shaymiyev was quoted as expressing "great satisfaction" 
with Yeltsin's "thesis" that "strong regions are the condition of 
Russia's prosperity" (Interfax, 11 January; Radio Rossii, 11 
January). Shaymiyev previously has claimed that, while 
"sovereignty" is important for the republic, "full independence 
in the usual sense of the word does not suit" Tatarstan, owing to 
"the republic's geographical location," "visible and invisible 
ties," and the "large degree of economic integration."  This 
stand has left him open to criticism by Tatar nationalist 
opponents for trying to "reform the Russian Federation rather 
than leave it" (Ostankino TV, 10 August 1993). 
   Tatarstan officials also appear to have adopted a new tactic in 
their efforts to achieve greater autonomy within the Russian 
Federation--organizing a republic political party.  According to 
a report in Kommersant-Daily, government officials and Shaymiyev 
supporters recently founded the Republican Party of Tatarstan 
"Unity and Progress," with presidential adviser Rafil Khakimov 
serving as co-chairman of the organizing committee.  Khakimov 
reportedly expects that the party will "soon emerge on the 
federal political arena and make Moscow reckon with it" 
(Kommersant-Daily, 18 December).  The newspaper cited Khakimov as 
saying that the party's goals include the "development and 
consolidation of Tatarstan's statehood," and fighting "not only 
for Tatarstan's rights but also assist[ing] the other Russian 
republics in this struggle" (Kommersant Daily, 21 December). 
   Implications 
   A successful conclusion to treaty negotiations should assure the 
holding of elections in Tatarstan and, in turn, the republic's 
full representation and participation in the Federal Assembly, 
although disputes over the republic's sovereignty and 
interpretation of the treaty will probably continue.  In 
contrast, there seems to be little prospect for agreement between 
Chechnya and Moscow on ending the republic's boycott of federal 
institutions. 
   (AUTHOR:  NERO.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION, (7O3) 733-6O7O.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/PF 26/1656z Jan 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43209 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000004294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   27 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-26Jan94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      Cabinet Reshuffle Weakens Reformers, Leaves Confusion </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                             The new cabinet named on 20 January after several delays as well 
as repeated and apparently difficult talks between President 
Boris Yeltsin and Premier Viktor Chernomyrdin is less reformist 
than the pre-election cabinet, with radical reformers Yegor 
Gaydar and Boris Fedorov gone and more conservative leaders- 
-Chernomyrdin, First Deputy Premier Oleg Soskovets, and Deputy 
Premier Aleksandr Zaveryukha--now running the show.  Despite 
signs that Sergey Shakhray and Aleksandr Shokhin would be purged 
for their attacks on Gaydar's Russia's Choice party during the 
election, they remained in the cabinet, at least as ministers, 
while several Russia's Choice leaders left.  The new cabinet 
appears to be a compromise between Yeltsin and Chernomyrdin and 
only a temporary fix since some posts--such as first deputy 
premier and finance minister--remain vacant and no one was added 
to the cabinet to replace those who were dropped. 
                         END SUMMARY 
   The shift toward conservatism evident in the new cabinet is a 
considerable departure from initial post-election assurances by 
Yeltsin, Gaydar, and apparently even Chernomyrdin to stay on a 
reformist course.  Yeltsin set the reorganization in motion with 
a 23 December edict ordering Chernomyrdin to prepare a plan to 
revamp and reduce the cabinet (Rossiyskiye Vesti, 28 December 
1993) and a 10 January edict reducing the number of deputy 
premiers, reorganizing ministries, and apparently dropping state 
committees from the cabinet (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 12 January)--see 
background section.  With the reduction of posts, it was likely 
that some reformers might be dropped from the cabinet, but in his 
first post-election news conference Yeltsin stated that "Gaydar 
stays" and "so does the policy that he is pursuing" (Ostankino 
TV, 22 December 1993).  On 13 January Yeltsin personally ensured 
that prominent reformer Anatoliy Chubays, chairman of the State 
Committee for Managing State Property, would remain in the 
cabinet by reappointing him deputy premier by presidential edict 
(ITAR-TASS, Russian TV, 13 January).  Gaydar himself stated that 
he would not resign as long as he "felt we are pursuing a 
sensible course" and cited Chernomyrdin's assurances that there 
would be no revision of the government's program (Interfax, 29 
December 1993). 
   Despite this, Gaydar on 16 January sent Yeltsin a letter of 
resignation as first deputy premier and minister of the economy, 
complaining that decisions harming reform had been recently 
adopted over his objections (Interfax, 16 January).  This was 
followed by Deputy Premier and Finance Minister Fedorov's 17 
January ultimatum that he would not accept reappointment unless 
Deputy Premier Zaveryukha and Bank Chairman Viktor Gerashchenko, 
whom he accused of opposing reform, were removed (Interfax, 17 
January)  (See Box). 
   Gaydar's resignation and Fedorov's ultimatum threw plans to 
announce a new cabinet into turmoil.  Yeltsin began urgent talks 
with Chernomyrdin, and on 18 January they spent six hours 
discussing the makeup of the cabinet (Radio Mayak, 18 January). 
Chernomyrdin held to his favorites, Soskovets and Zaveryukha, and 
would not concede to Fedorov's demands (Izvestiya, 21 January), 
although he did not object publicly to Yeltsin's preemptive 
reappointment of Chubays.  But, as Shokhin publicly stated, the 
president and premier "have different views" on accepting 
Fedorov's demands (Interfax, 20 January).  Although the president 
has final power over cabinet appointments, (See Note) he 
apparently did not or could not persuade Chernomyrdin to add more 
reformers or meet Fedorov's demands.  The list of cabinet 
appointments announced on 20 January failed to include the key 
posts of first deputy premier and finance minister and appeared 
to leave some other posts unfilled also. 
   (Note) According to the new constitution, he appoints deputy 
premiers and ministers "on the proposal" of the premier 
(Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 25 December 1993). 
   Some Reformers Remain 
   Without Gaydar and Fedorov, the cabinet loses the two strongest 
voices for economic reform and tight money, but some reformers 
still remain.  Radical reformers Chubays (deputy premier and 
chairman of the State Committee for Managing State Property), 
Viktor Khlystun (agriculture minister), and Russia's Choice 
leader Andrey Kozyrev (foreign minister) remain, while Shakhray 
and Shokhin, who have been pushing more moderate reform, gave up 
their posts as deputy premiers but retained ministerial posts, 
Shakhray as minister for affairs of nationalities and regional 
policy and Shokhin as minister of the economy.  Moreover, Chubays 
and Kozyrev have publicly declared that the new cabinet does not 
necessarily spell the end of reforms (Russian TV, 18 January; 
Interfax, 24 January). 
   The retention of Shakhray and Shokhin presumably reflects 
Chernomyrdin's desires more than Yeltsin's.  Shakhray and Shokhin 
split with Gaydar, formed the Party of Russian Unity and Accord 
(PRES) to run against Gaydar's Russia's Choice during the 
election, and began criticizing Gaydar for pushing overly radical 
reform.  PRES leaders trumpeted their support for and closeness 
to Chernomyrdin during the election.  After the election Yeltsin 
dismissed PRES leaders Aleksandr Kotenkov (as State-Legal 
Administration head) and Sergey Stankevich (as councillor), and 
it appeared that he would drop Shakhray and Shokhin from the 
cabinet in displeasure at their splitting his reform team and 
contributing to the reformers' election defeat.  Interfax on 31 
December 1993, for example, reported that the removal of Shakhray 
and Shokhin was "virtually settled."  But instead, Russia's 
Choice leaders Gaydar, Fedorov, Vladimir Shumeyko (who left as 
first deputy premier after being elected Federation Council 
chairman), and Ella Pamfilova (who resigned as minister after 
Gaydar, Russian TV, 16 January) have left the cabinet, while the 
PRES leaders remained. 
   Zaveryukha's retention as deputy premier for agriculture 
presumably similarly reflects Chernomyrdin's support and also the 
strength demonstrated by Zaveryukha's Agrarian Party in the 
election and in the newly organized Duma, which elected Agrarian 
leader Ivan Rybkin speaker.  Zaveryukha has been at odds with 
Gaydar and Fedorov over monetary policy, attacking them for 
blocking sufficient funds for agriculture.  Fedorov made 
Zaveryukha's removal a condition for accepting reappointment as 
finance minister, arguing that Zaveryukha was resisting reform 
(Interfax, 17 January). 
   Implications 
   The cabinet announced by Yeltsin and Chernomyrdin is becoming 
more of a coalition, with PRES and Agrarian leaders now having 
equal weight with Russia's Choice leaders.  However, its current 
composition is apparently only a temporary fix as various 
factions jockey for position, and decisions still have to be 
reached on the key posts of first deputy premier and finance 
minister.  Chernomyrdin, strengthened by anti-reform election 
returns, will probably pursue a more moderate reform course, 
balancing reforms and anti-inflationary measures against demands 
supported by Soskovets and Zaveryukha to protect industry and 
agriculture. 
            Background on the Cabinet Restructuring 
   Yeltsin's 10 January edict cut the number of first deputy 
premiers from three to two and deputy premiers from six to two, 
expanded the number of ministries from 20 (two others--for press 
and information and for security--had been abolished on 21 and 22 
December) to 23, and cut the number of state committees from over 
a dozen to nine.  The edict listed 67 ministries, state 
committees, committees, services, agencies, departments, and 
inspections, but did not indicate which have cabinet status 
(Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 12 January).  A 30 September 1992 Yeltsin 
edict had clearly specified that ministers and state committee 
chairmen belong to the cabinet but heads of committees, services, 
and other agencies do not (Vedomosti Syezda Narodnykh Deputatov 
Rossiyskoy Federatsii i Verkhnovnogo Soveta Rossiyskoy 
Federatsii, 15 October 1992).  The new constitution, however, 
declares that the cabinet consists of the premier, deputy 
premiers, and ministers, with no mention of state committees 
(Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 25 December 1993). 
   Despite the constitution's definition, Yeltsin subsequently gave 
Nikolay Golushko, head of the new Federal Counterintelligence 
Service, the rank of minister (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 24 December 
1993) and the new Federal Border Service the status of a ministry 
(ITAR-TASS, 30 December 1993), and despite his own edict's 
limitation of deputy premiers to two, three were appointed, as 
Yeltsin insisted on Chubays' reappointment.  The 10 January 
edict's lack of clarity over exactly who is in the cabinet and 
who is not is producing confusion, according to commentator 
Eduard Gonzalez in the 13 January Izvestiya.  He noted, for 
example, that State Committee for Managing State Property 
Chairman Chubays is still deputy premier but his committee is now 
apparently outside the cabinet.  Gonzalez concluded that the 
edict is ambiguous and "everyone can, if he wishes, interpret 
provisions of the edict to his own satisfaction." 
   While the structure of ministries and other bodies is clear from 
the 10 January edict, the precise membership of the cabinet is 
not, and though the appointment of several cabinet members was 
announced on 20 January, most have not been formally reappointed. 
In fact, Yeltsin's 20 January edict was titled "The First 
Changes" in the makeup of the cabinet (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 22 
January).  Some additional ministers--such as Yuriy Kalmykov and 
Viktor Danilov-Danilyan--were clearly visible in television shots 
of the first post-shakeup cabinet meeting on 21 January, 
indicating that they remain in the cabinet.  But the agencies and 
individuals in the cabinet are still only partially clear as of 
24 January. 

                      Apparent Cabinet 
                      Early January                 Late January 
Premier            Viktor Chernomyrdin           Chernomyrdin 
First Deputy       Yegor Gaydar (resigned) 
                   Vladimir Shumeyko (resigned) 
                   Oleg Soskovets                Soskovets* 
Deputy             Anatoliy Chubays              Chubays* 
                   Boris Fedorov (resigned) 
                   Sergey Shakhray (dropped) 
                   Aleksandr Shokhin (dropped) 
                   Yuriy Yarov                   Yarov* 
                   Aleksandr Zaveryukha          Zaveryukha* 
Ministers: 
Agriculture        Viktor Khlystun              Khlystun* 
and Food 
Atomic Energy      Viktor Mikhaylov 
Communications     Vladimir Bulgak 
Culture            Yevgeniy Sidorov 
Defense            Pavel Grachev 
Economics          Yegor Gaydar (resigned)       Shokhin* 
Education          Yevgeniy Tkachenko 
Finance            Boris Fedorov (resigned) 
Foreign Affairs    Andrey Kozyrev 
Foreign Economic   Oleg Davydov 
 Ties 
Fuel and Power     Yuriy Shafranik 
Health             Eduard Nechayev               Nechayev* 
Internal Affairs   Viktor Yerin 
Justice            Yuriy Kalmykov               Kalmykov** 
Labor              Gennadiy Melikyan 
Protection of      Viktor Danilov-Danilyan     Danilov-Danilyan** 
 Environment 
 and Natural 
 Resources 
Railroads          Gennadiy Fadeyev 
Science and        Boris Saltykov 
 Tehnical Policy 
Social Protection  Ella Pamfilova (resigned) 
 of Population 
Transport          Vitaliy Yefimov 
   State Committees: 
Affairs of Civil   Sergey Shoyga                 Shoyga* 
Defense, Emergencies,                     (changed to ministry) 
and Liquidation of 
Results of Disasters 
Affairs of         Sergey Shakhray              Shakhray* 
 Federation                               (changed to ministry) 
 and Nationalities 
Antimonopoly       Leonid Bochin          (apparently no longer 
 Policy                                    in cabinet) 
Architecture       Yefim Basin           (apparently no longer 
  and Construction                          in cabinet) 
Defense Branches   Viktor Glukhikh        (apparently no longer 
 of Industry                               in cabinet) 
Economic           Vladimir Mashchits***        vacant 
Cooperation with                          (changed to ministry) 
 CIS States 
Higher Schools     Vladimir Kinelev       (apparently no longer 
                                           in cabinet) 
Industrial         Igor Shurchkov         (apparently no longer 
 Policy                                    in cabinet) 
Machine Building,  Vyacheslav Chernoivanov***    (abolished) 
Servicing of 
Agriculture, Food, 
and Food Processing 
Managing State     Anatoliy Chubays       (apparently no longer 
 Property                                  in cabinet) 
Social Protection  Vasiliy Voznyak***            (abolished) 
of Citizens and 
Rehabilitation of 
Territories Suffering 
 from Chernobyl and 
Other Radiation 
Disasters 
Socio-Economic     Vladimir Kuramin***           (abolished) 
Development of 
North 
Statistics         Yuriy Yurkov           (apparently no longer 
                                           in cabinet) 
State Customs      Anatoliy Kruglov       (apparently no longer 
Committee                                  in cabinet) 
New Services Given Ministerial Rank: 
Federal Counterintelligence Service       Nikolay Golushko 
Federal Border Service                    Andrey Nikolayev 

*Appointment announced in 20 January Yeltsin edict (Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta, 22 January).  Edict also dropped Fedorov, Shakhray, and 
Shokhin as deputy premiers. 

**Visible at 21 January cabinet meeting (Russian TV, 21 January). 

***Dropped as state committee chairmen (ITAR-TASS, 20 January; 
Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 22 January). 


   Box 
                      Fedorov's Resignation 
   Although Fedorov announced his resignation on 17 January and 
Yeltsin's 20 January edict on cabinet changes dropped him as 
deputy premier (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 22 January), Fedorov's status 
was not finally resolved until 26 January.  In addition to the 18 
January meeting, Yeltsin held another session with Chernomyrdin 
on 24 January, which news reports said was to discuss the 
cabinet's makeup (Interfax, Russian TV, 24 January). 
Chernomyrdin afterward denied they had discussed the cabinet 
(Radio Rossii, 24 January) but indicated Fedorov's status was 
still up in the air, saying that Fedorov's resignation had not 
been accepted, that Fedorov still continued to hold his post "for 
the time being," and that it was up to Yeltsin to decide on 
Fedorov (Russian TV, ITAR-TASS, 24 January).  According to 
Chernomyrdin (Radio Rossii, 24 January), Fedorov must decide 
whether to join the cabinet--although presumably only as finance 
minister and without attaining his demand for the removal of 
Zaveryukha and Gerashchenko.  In the meantime Fedorov had 
escalated his demands, insisting now that the finance minister 
must have the status of first deputy premier, not just deputy 
premier (Russian TV, Interfax, 24 January), apparently hoping to 
gain a stronger position to use in fighting off inflationary 
cabinet decisions.  Finally on 26 January Yeltsin met with 
Fedorov and accepted his resignation after Fedorov declined to 
join the cabinet unless his conditions were met (Ostankino TV, 
ITAR-TASS, 26 January). 
   End Box 
   (AUTHOR:  HAHN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION, (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/PF 26/1830z Jan 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43210 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000004394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   27 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-26JAN94-CHINA-FRANCE 
<H3> <TI>      Beijing Rewards French Firm with Subway Contract </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Less     than two weeks after normalizing relations with Paris, 
Beijing appears to be rewarding France for its recent pledge not 
to authorize the sale of arms to Taiwan.  According to Beijing's 
English-language paper China Daily, a French transportation 
engineering firm recently "clinched" a "$5 million plus" 
consulting contract to help "supervise and manage" the 
construction of the new Guangzhou subway (24 January).  When 
relations between Beijing and Paris had soured after France 
agreed in November 1992 to sell 60 Mirage 2000 jet fighters to 
Taiwan, Guangzhou Mayor Li Zilin told the PRC-owned Hong Kong 
daily Wen Wei Po that he had been "ordered" to halt cooperation 
with France in the construction of the city's subway and "revoke" 
the eligibility of French companies to "participate in and bid" 
on the project (29 December 1992).  More recently, the well- 
connected independent Hong Kong journal Ming Pao reported that 
Chinese authorities had decided not "to allow France to take part 
in the first-phase construction of the Guangzhou subway" because 
of "the political factor of France's selling fighters to Taiwan" 
(23 May 1993). 
   (AUTHOR: SIMON. QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANAYLSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/BIETZ/PF 26/1843z Jan 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43211 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000004494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   27 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-26JAN94-DPRK-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      DPRK Avoids Blaming Administration, Hits "Conservatives" </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                 In what appears to be an at tempt to avoid direct criticism of 
the Clinton Administration, Pyongyang has recently blamed the 
current impasse on the nuclear issue on unnamed "conservative 
forces" in the United States. 
                             END SUMMARY 
   Pyongyang's apparent interest in preventing a breakdown of U.S.- 
North Korea talks on the nuclear issue seems reflected in its 
careful media treatment of the Clinton Administration and its 
domestic critics.  A 22 January commentary in the party paper 
Nodong Sinmun, reported by KCNA the same day, claimed that 
Pyongyang has agreed to nuclear inspections, but only to the 
extent of ensuring "the continuity of the safeguards" and only 
because Washington had expressed a "willingness" to discontinue 
Team Spirit military exercises.  The paper then went on to point 
to "anti-dialogue forces" in the United States, "intelligence 
plotters," and "paid trumpeters" as responsible for the current 
stalemate on the nuclear inspection issue.  The commentary also 
criticized these "forces" for demanding that Pyongyang accept 
"routine and ad hoc" nuclear inspections and "even" special 
inspections of the two suspected nuclear sites.  In a move 
seemingly calculated to impress Pyongyang's own hardline forces, 
the paper claimed that the U.S. conservatives are justifying 
these demands on the grounds that Washington had made 
"unilateral" concessions to Pyongyang on the nuclear issue. 
   Further underscoring Pyongyang's effort to avoid antagonizing the 
Administration in order to protect the dialogue on the nuclear 
issue, monitored Pyongyang media have not commented on criticisms 
of North Korea's stance on the nuclear issue made by U.S. 
officials in recent weeks.  Pyongyang passed up opportunities to 
react to criticisms contained in the joint statement by 
Presidents Clinton and Yeltsin during his recent visit to Moscow 
and a 5 January press conference by Undersecretary of State Lynn 
Davis. 
   Implications     The calibration of Pyongyang's criticism 
suggests that those leadership elements in Pyongyang pressing for 
ending North Korea's international isolation hope to avoid 
raising rhetorical tensions with the Clinton Administration in 
order to prevent any break in the bilateral talks on resolution 
of the nuclear issue. 
   (AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENT, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, ASIA 
DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/BIETZ/PF 26/2042z Jan 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43212 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000004594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   27 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-26JAN94-CHINA-PAKISTAN 
<H3> <TI>      Bhutto Visit Highlights Expanding Sino-Pakistani Ties </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                               Recent high-level exchanges between China and Pakistan, including 
a late December visit to Beijing by Pakistani Prime Minister 
Benazir Bhutto, indicate that, despite its ongoing efforts to 
improve relations with India, Beijing is continuing to expand its 
bilateral relations with Pakistan, strengthening both economic 
and military ties. 
                           END SUMMARY 
   The 27-29 December "official goodwill" visit to China by Prime 
Minister Bhutto served to underscore Beijing's commitment to 
Pakistan.  Meeting with Bhutto on 28 December, Premier Li Peng, 
for example, reaffirmed the "importance" China attaches to its 
"friendly and cooperative ties" with Pakistan (Xinhua, 28 
December).  He went on to assure Bhutto of China's continued 
friendship, stating that "whatever changes take place in the 
world, China will remain Pakistan's trusted friend and continue 
to develop good-neighborly ties" (Xinhua, 28 December 1993). 
Party General Secretary Jiang Zemin also underscored Beijing's 
commitment to Islamabad at his meeting with Bhutto on the 28th, 
hailing the Sino-Pakistani relationship as having "stood the test 
of time" as "an example" for "relations between countries with 
different social systems" (Xinhua, 28 December 1993). 
   Focus on Economic Cooperation 
   Reflecting the continuing expansion of economic ties, the visit 
was capped by the signing of five bilateral agreements, including 
an agreement for economic and technological cooperation, an 
accord extending the border trade agreement between the two 
countries, road transport and water resource cooperative accords, 
and an agreement to establish sister relations between Pakistan's 
Punjab and China's Jiangsu provinces (Xinhua, 28 December 1993). 
Calling for the further expansion of bilateral economic relations 
Li, at his meeting with Bhutto, said that two countries should 
"seek more ways," including more exchanges between enterprises 
and setting up of more joint ventures, to "boost" their ties and 
indicated that the Chinese Government was "encouraging" PRC 
companies to "invest" in Pakistan (Xinhua, 28 December 1993). 
During a five-day official visit to Pakistan earlier in December, 
Politburo Standing Committee member Li Ruihuan had suggested that 
Beijing may be planning to give more aid to Pakistan, noting in 
an interview with the Pakistani press--carried by Xinhua on the 
6th--that China "may provide more assistance" if China's economy 
"develops at a faster pace" (Xinhua, 6 December 1993). 
   Military Cooperation 
   There are also signs that the two countries are continuing to 
expand their military ties.  Reflecting this trend, Xinhua on 1 
December reported that Gen. Zhang Wannian, Chief of the General 
Staff of the PLA, and his host Pakistani Defense Minister Af tab 
Shaban Mirani discussed the "mutual cooperation between the armed 
forces" of the two countries during Zhang's visit.  In another 
indication of their deepening military ties, the two sides also 
signed an agreement during Zhang's visit granting Chinese 
"credits" to Pakistan for the "procurement of defense equipment" 
(Xinhua, 4 December 1993). 
   (AUTHOR: SIMON. OUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/BIETZ/PF 26/2107z Jan 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43213 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000004694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   27 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-26JAN93-JAPAN-U. S. 
<H3> <TI>      Tokyo Hardens Line in Response to U.S. Framework Pressure </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                               The Japanese Government appears to have responded to a variety of 
tough signals from the United States over the past few weeks, 
including the visit of Treasury Secretary Bentsen, by digging in 
its heels on key issues in the Japan-U.S. framework talks, 
especially the setting of objective criteria.  Japanese business 
groups are pressuring Tokyo to maintain this hard line, and the 
Japanese media have generally supported the government's 
negotiating posture on the issue of objective criteria.  In view 
of the continued stalemate in the talks, some members of the 
Japanese bureaucracy may hope to take advantage of the political 
confusion following the defeat of the political reform bill in 
the upper house of the Diet to delay concluding the negotiations 
beyond the original deadline of the Il February summit between 
President Clinton and Prime Minister Morihiro Hosokawa. 
                         END SUMMARY 

   Japanese political leaders appear to have responded to a recent 
series of comments by U.S. officials, including Undersecretary of 
State Joan Spero, criticizing Japan's hard-line stance in the 
framework talks by signaling that they fully back the negotiating 
strategy for the talks formulated by the Japanese bureaucracy. 
   -- Prime Minister Hosokawa appeared to signal his support for the 
hard-line strategy when he reportedly told a group of key 
Japanese business leaders on 12 January that he would tell 
President Clinton during their upcoming summit that he "could not 
accept" numerical targets to measure Japanese import performance 
"for the private sector."  According to 12 January Kyodo and 13 
January Asahi Shimbun reports, the prime minister also indicated 
that he would appeal to GATT if the United States imposes 
sanctions on Japan. 
   -- Similarly, on 18 January, Minister of International Trade and 
Industry Hiroshi Kumagai reportedly defended the stance taken at 
the talks by bureaucrats in his ministry, denying that they were 
"impeding the negotiations" as charged by U.S. officials (Kyodo, 
18 January).  In an interview in the 23 January Asahi Shimbun, 
Kumagai also firmly signaled his support for the current Japanese 
negotiating strategy, stating that Japan "cannot accept numerical 
targets."  He also categorically denied any difference of opinion 
between himself and the bureaucracy on framework strategy, 
commenting that "if the United States thinks that there are 
differences in views between myself and my administrative staff, 
then that is a misunderstanding." 

   Members of the Japanese bureaucracy also appear to have dug in 
their heels further in response to the U.S. comments.  According 
to a 20 January Kyodo report, an unnamed senior Ministry of 
Foreign Affairs (MOFA) official described reported U.S. criticism 
of Japanese bureaucrats as "improper" and warned that it would 
"serve only as a negative factor in the talks."  Some Japanese 
press reporting also suggests that elements of the bureaucracy 
may be seeking to circumvent parts of the U.S. Government that 
they perceive to be inflexible by appealing to others they 
believe may be more sympathetic to Japan's  position.  For 
example, the 16 January Nihon Keizai Shimbun reported that 
Japanese government officials, frustrated by the tough stance of 
the U.S. Trade Representative's office in the framework 
negotiations, were trying to contact the head of the National 
Economic Council, Robert E. Rubin.  According to the paper, 
Japanese officials believe Mr. Rubin is less wedded to the 
concept of imposing objective criteria to measure Japan's trade 
performance than USTR. 
   Reaction to Bentsen Visit 
   While official Japanese Government reaction to Secretary 
Bentsen's 23 January visit has so far been limited, those 
officials who have been observed to comment on the Secretary's 
remarks have responded negatively.  According to a 24 January 
Kyodo report, Foreign Minister Tsutomu Hata described the 
Secretary's warning that the United States might have to 
reexamine the framework talks if a satisfactory agreement is not 
reached before 11 February as having been "premature." 
Similarly, Kyodo also reported that Vice Foreign Minister 
Kunihiko Saito characterized the Secretary's comments as 
"untimely" and "unconstructive" because the talks are still in 
progress. 

   Pressure from Private Sector 
   One source of pressure on Tokyo to continue to take a hard line 
in the talks appears to be the continued opposition of Japanese 
business to objective criteria.  Over the past week, a number of 
organizations have been reported to have issued or be planning to 
issue public statements opposing objective criteria and other 
U.S. trade practices. 
   -- According to the 19 January Mainichi Shimbun, on 18 January 
the Communications Industry Association of Japan (CIAJ)--an 
organization made up of communications equipment manufacturers- 
-submitted statements on the framework talks to MITI and the 
Ministry of Posts and Telecommunications calling on the 
government to oppose the establishment of objective criteria in 
the telecommunications field.  The statements also reportedly 
pressed the government not to give in to U.S. demands that 
equipment purchased by Nippon Telegraph and Telephone (NTT) be 
covered in the framework talks. 
   -- According to a 2O January Kyodo report, the Marine and Fire 
Insurance Association of Japan issued a statement opposing the 
use of objective criteria to measure the openness of the Japanese 
insurance market, warning that even if the Japanese Government 
agrees to them, "they cannot be attained." 
   -- Similarly, on 2O January, Yutaka Kume, Chairman of the Japan 
Automobile Manufacturers Association (JAMA), reportedly told news 
organizations that he was opposed to any settlement of the 
automobile and auto parts sector of the framework talks that 
involved setting voluntary targets for imports by Japanese 
industry.  According to a 2O January Kyodo report, Kume 
reportedly warned that the United States might interpret such 
targets as firm commitments, as he claimed it did with targets 
for purchases of U.S.-made auto parts set during former President 
Bush's trip to Tokyo in January 1992. 

   -- According to the 25 January Nihon Keizai Shimbun, Japan's 
leading business organization, the Keidanren, is drawing up plans 
to issue a statement calling on U.S. and European governments to 
prevent the emergence of protectionism and avoid the use of 
sanctions in trade disputes.  According to the paper, Keidanren's 
move has been prompted in part by concerns that the United States 
may revive the use of the Super 301 provision of the 1988 Omnibus 
Trade Act. 
   Press View of Talks 
   There also appears to be little significant pressure from the 
media for Japan to take a more flexible stance on some of the key 
sticking points in the talks, especially objective criteria. 
Newspaper editorials published both before and after Secretary 
Bentsen's visit to Tokyo strongly supported the Japanese 
Government in its opposition to objective criteria.   For 
example, an editorial in the 17 January edition of the business- 
oriented Nihon Keizai Shimbun criticized the U.S. demand for 
setting objective criteria, claiming that it was opposed by "all 
major U.S. economists."  The paper called on the Washington to 
focus more on "long-term" than "immediate" results.  A 26 January 
editorial in the same paper warned that President Clinton's 
emphasis on "trade results" might "undermine the relations of the 
G-2 (Japan and the United States)."  Similarly, the 25 January 
Yomiuri Shimbun supported the Japanese Government's position on 
objective criteria, commenting that the setting of targets "is a 
matter to be judged independently by enterprises.  Governments 
should not interfere in the matter."  Like Nihon Keizai Shimbun, 
Yomiuri Shimbun also cited the opposition of leading U.S. 
economists to the concept of targets. 

   Media commentary relating to the talks has not been totally 
hostile to U.S. objectives in the talks, however.  Most 
editorials have urged the Japanese Government to take steps to 
open Japanese markets and to take measures to stimulate the 
Japanese economy.   The 17 January Nihon Keizai Shimbun editorial 
called on the government not to "just keep saying 'no"' and "come 
up with concrete proposals to open markets which will not lead to 
managed trade."  The 26 January editorial in the same paper 
called on the government to present the U.S. with "concrete steps 
to open the Japanese market in individual sectors" and to 
"speedily undertake stimulus measures centering on income tax 
reductions to pull Japan out of its prolonged recession," which 
would, it argued, help reduce Japan's current account surplus. 
The 25 January Yomiuri Shimbun editorial called on the government 
to "avert a showdown" between Japan and the United States by 
quickly passing economic stimulus measures and adopting a 
"transparent tender system" for both public works projects and 
government procurement. 
   Impact of Political Confusion 
   Some Japanese bureaucrats involved in the framework talks may be 
hoping to use the political confusion following the defeat of the 
political reform bill in the upper house of the Diet to delay any 
concessions in the framework talks.  Even before the defeat of 
the political reform bill, there appear to have been voices 
within the bureaucracy calling for postponement of the final 
agreement in the talks as a means of gaining leverage against the 
United States.  The 19 January Mainichi Shimbun, for example, 
quoted an unnamed senior MITI official as warning that a final 
accord might have to be postponed until the G-7 Summit if the 
United States refused to concede on the issue of objective 
criteria.  The 24 January edition of the same paper reported that 
some officials in MITI and JAMA are urging that the negotiations 
be extended until July because the United States has shown no 
indication of making concessions.  On 25 January, Mainichi 
Shimbun also reported that in the wake of the defeat of the 
political reform bill, many Japanese Government officials favored 
delaying the summit between President Clinton and Prime Minister 
Hosokawa--and hence, the conclusion of the trade talks.  The 
paper quoted an unnamed senior MITI official as arguing that with 
the government in turmoil and seemingly unable to draw up 
economic stimulus measures, the summit would become 
meaningless . 

   Outlook 
   The preoccupation of the Japanese Government with the fate of the 
political reform bill and the survival of Prime Minister 
Hosokawa's cabinet will almost certainly prevent senior political 
leaders from devoting much attention to framework talks.  If a 
revised political reform bill fails to pass the Diet by the end 
of the current session on 29 January, the political situation is 
likely to become even more fluid, and the prospects for 
involvement of political leaders in the framework talks even less 
likely.  This will leave the formulation of policy toward the 
talks firmly in the hands of various ministry officials who favor 
a hard-line approach.  Any concessions offered are therefore 
likely to be largely cosmetic in nature, designed to provide a 
face-saving way of concluding the negotiations by the 11 February 
deadline. 
   (AUTHOR:  BOUNDS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (7O3)-733-6534.) 
EAG/BIETZ/ch 27/0224z Jan 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43214 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000004094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   27 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--EAST EUROPE 
<H3> <TI>      FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-003--EAST EUROPE </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Foreign     Economic Review:  EASTERN EUROPE Vol. III, No. 3, 
January 18, 1994 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a subtitled series 
published by FBIS Europe/Latin America Group.  The Survey series 
features brief summaries of foreign media reports on topical issues 
compiled from the most recent sources available to FBIS.  Any and 
all comment or analysis contained herein is attributable to the 
cited media source. 

   Europe Economic Review is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY 
published by the East and West Europe Divisions of Europe/Latin 
America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas bureaus.  Europe 
Economic Review is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Reports for West and East Europe 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normally do not 
appear as full-text translations in other FBIS publications. 

   The contents of Europe Economic Review consist of abstracts of 
foreign media coverage of European economic developments under two 
main geographic headings: 

   -- Western Europe:  Drawing on West European, Canadian, and 
Turkish media, this section reports on national and regional 
economic issues, focusing on economic competitiveness, key 
industries, regional economic integration, internal economic 
policies and performance, and foreign trade and investment. 

   -- Eastern Europe:  Citing East European and, where appropriate, 
other foreign media sources, this section highlights East European 
efforts to rebuild national economies and achieve integration into 
the European Community and the global economy, focusing on policy 
debates and practical action geared toward the implementation of 
internal economic reforms and industrial restructuring and on 
developments in foreign trade, cooperation, and investment from 
national and regional perspectives. 

   Under these two main headings, summaries of foreign media reports 
on all categories of economic issues generally are grouped under 
subheadings by subject, country, or region. 

   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government. 

   ALBANIA 

   RUBIK COPPER-PROCESSING ENTERPRISE:  In addition to the Copper- 
Smelting Establishment in Rubik, the Copper-Processing Enterprise is 
expected to begin production soon, Engineer Sefer Nika told an ATA 
reporter.  The operation of this plant becomes necessary because 
cathodic copper with 99.96 percent copper and different types of 
bronze are in great demand on foreign markets.  It is worth pointing 
out that the copper plant was not robbed and misused during the 
transition period.  The plant's technology and equipment were not 
even damaged by frequent suspensions of production.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 1123 GMT 24 Dec 93 AU) 

   DUTCH GROUP'S AID TO HOMES FOR ELDERLY:  The Dutch Humanitarian 
Association "Osteuropa Zendings" will provide investments to improve 
the living conditions in houses for the elderly in Fier and Shkoder. 
Besides financing for the installation of central heating and the 
painting of the buildings, this association will also provide 
facilities for the kitchens, bathrooms, lavatories, and wash basins. 
A Dutch couple will come to Albania to train the staffs of both 
institutions.  They will stay for one year at the Fier house. 
During their stay in Albania, the Dutch couple will also deal with 
the problems of psychotherapy for the old people.  Rezarta Shehu, 
specialist at the Ministry of Labor and Social Assistance, told ATA 
that the representatives of the Dutch Association took interest in, 
and expressed their readiness to help, the Orphanage of Shkoder for 
3-6 year-old children.  (Tirana ATA in English 1110 GMT 26 Dec 93 
AU) 

   ALBANIAN TELECOM PLANS MAJOR PROJECTS FOR 1994:  At present, 
Albania is in great need of telecommunications, the Telecom director 
told an ATA reporter.  The EBRD, the Swiss Government, the European 
Community, the Albanian Government, and other organizations have 
supported the development of Albanian Telecom.  Dozens of big 
companies that have provided Telecom with new technology have 
competed for different projects.  During 1993, 6,000 subscribers 
were added to the national telephone network of Kavaje, Berat, 
Vlore, Tirana, and other cities, compared to a total of 30,000 in 
the existing network.  The extension of the telephone network in the 
countryside is one of the targets of Albanian Telecom for 1994, 
considering the requests of new Albanian farmers and a lot of 
clients who can afford to pay large sums of money. 

   "The Albanian telephone network is the crossroads of European 
telephone lines, north-south and west-east," Mr. Shehu said and 
reported the inauguration of an Italy-Albania-Macedonia radio line 
and the first inter-Balkan telecommunication agreement, the 
establishment of a Tirana-Skopje-Sofia telephone network.  One of 
the Telecom targets is to establish the Greece-Elania-Germany 
telephone network.  Computers will be installed in the Telecom in 
1994 and, in the future, the network will make possible the 
transmission of signals from one city to the other.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 1805 GMT 27 Dec 93 AU) 

   'TRANS-BALKAN' TELEPHONE SYSTEM INAUGURATED:  A new telephone 
system, "The Trans-Balkan Lines," has been established to improve 
telecommunication between Italy, Albania, Macedonia, Bulgaria, and 
Turkey.  On the occasion of inaugurating the system, Mr. Adrian 
Shehu, director of the Albanian Telecom Department, said that the 
system will also be part of a wider network of east-west 
communications traffic.  The first stage of the realization of this 
project was the inauguration of 300 telephone lines from Italy, 
Albania, Macedonia, Bulgaria, and Turkey.  The Italian company 
Tritel participated in the project by providing the necessary 
equipment.  Mr. Shehu said that the technical staffs of the Albanian 
and Macedonian Telecoms and the Italian company Sirti have also 
taken part in this undertaking.  The second stage of the project 
will be the installation of fiber-optical cables in these countries. 
The total cost of the project will amount to $24 million.  Each 
country will carry out the work and own that part of the system 
within its borders.  The participating states will conclude 
bilateral agreements governing the operation system.  Mr. Shehu said 
that they are drafting the "Adria 1" project for another telephone 
system, which will cover Germany, Croatia, Albania, and Greece. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1105 GMT 22 Dec 93 AU) 

   NUMBER OF FREIGHTER PASSENGERS DOUBLES:  The number of passengers 
who travel by freighter from Italy, Slovenia, and Croatia to the 
port of Durres has doubled on the eve of the New Year.  At the Naval 
Agency, an ATA reporter was told that the influx of Albanian 
passengers in the last two weeks has increased from 500 to 1,000 per 
freighter.  There are five ferry boats that run their service for 
the Albadria, Shpresa, and Italmar Agencies.  Over 60 percent of the 
Albanians who return to celebrate the New Year with their families 
come with cars, buses, or trucks, which are of a higher quality that 
those that were brought some months ago.  The reporter was also told 
that many Albanians of Macedonia and Kosova, employed in various 
countries of Europe, have returned home through the port of Durres. 
(Tirana ATA in English 0919 GMT 28 Dec 93 AU) 

   GROWING PRIVATE SECTOR:  Skeptics who predicted a gloomy year for 
the Albanian market are now facing concrete facts.  Polls and 
official statistics show that over 150 Albanian joint ventures with 
foreign partners are functioning throughout the country.  Private 
trade units count for over 52,000, without mentioning here the 
thousands of other Albanian private firms that deal with the export 
and import of commodities.  The former ration tickets for 1 kg of 
meat, one chicken, or one turkey are now only memories.  However, 
miracles cannot occur in only two years.  Foreign experts have 
confirmed that, since March 1992, Albania is progressing faster with 
its economic reforms than any other eastern European country. 
(Tirana ATA in English 0917 GMT 28 Dec 93 AU) 

   MACEDONIAN TRANSPORTATION MINISTRY DISCUSSES PROTOCOL: 
Delegations of the Albanian Ministry of Transportation, led by 
Deputy Minister Sopot Haci, and the Macedonian Ministry of 
Transportation, led by Deputy Minister Jorgo Shundovski, met in 
Skopje on 21 December to discuss the prolongation of the term of the 
protocol on motor road transportation between Albania and Macedonia 
until 30 June 1994.  During this time, both countries are planning 
to sign an agreement on international passengers and goods 
transportation.  (Tirana ATA in English 0912 GMT 28 Dec 93 AU) 

   GREEK EQUIPMENT FOR ELECTRICITY SYSTEM:  The Greek Electroenergy 
Corporation has provided 69 transformers and seven tons of electric 
cable for the Albanian electric system.  All equipment has already 
arrived in Albania.  (Tirana ATA in English 1105 GMT 29 Dec 93 AU) 

   AGRICULTURAL TECHNOLOGY CENTER IN DURRES:  The private center 
Agrivelka Shqiptare was established in the territory of the former 
Agricultural Mechanical Enterprise in Durres, a coastal city in the 
most important western lowland area.  The center will provide 
services for the Italian technology and for Fiat Avil, which has 
already been introduced into Albania, will supply Albanian private 
farmers with agricultural technology, and will accomplish various 
qualifications.  It will cooperate with the Italian firm "New 
Holland Fiat," which has provided tractors and other agricultural 
machinery as part of the credit of the EC PHARE project for 
agriculture.  Mr. Elio Germano, EC ambassador, and Mr. Paolo 
Foresti, Italian ambassador to Albania, were present at the 
inauguration of Agrivelka center.  (Tirana ATA in English 1126 GMT 
18 Dec 93 AU) 

   U.S. FIRM TO FINANCE MODERNIZATION OF FERROCHROMIUM PLANT:  Work 
to reconstruct the first furnace in the Burrel Ferro-Chromium Plant 
has already started.  Due to old technology, the plant could not 
upgrade chrome concentrate.  So far, the concentrate has been 
exported at unfavorable prices unable to cover even the costs of 
production.  The U.S. firm Huxly Barter Cooperation has undertaken 
to reconstruct the ferro-chromium furnace by allocating about $1 
million for this purpose.  The firm had previously contracted the 
purchase of ferro-chromium.  The modernization of this plant is 
expected to be completed by the end of March next year.  (Tirana ATA 
in English 1118 GMT 18 Dec 93 AU) 

   FIRST PRIVATE ELECTRIC SERVICE COMPANY:  Nurka is the first 
private electric service company, established in Sarande three 
months ago.  Nurka carries out electric services for state 
enterprises and private owners.  So far, it has completed all 
installations in electric cabins in Borsh, Sarande, and Delvine, and 
has renovated the water reservoirs in Cuke and Vrine.  Nurka is 
receiving more and more requests from private owners in the city and 
countryside.  Engineer Bujar Nurka is the boss of the company.  He 
worked in a private electric company in Greece for two years and 
upon his return from Greece, he decided to run the company.  (Tirana 
ATA in English 1126 GMT 19 Dec 93 AU) 

   PRIVATE BAKERIES PRODUCING 75 PERCENT OF COUNTRY'S BREAD:  Over 
the last 20 months, the structure of supplying the population with 
food has changed in Albania.  During this period the state has 
imported 60 bakeries, while over 32 electric bakeries have been 
equipped with contemporary technology at home.  During this period, 
private firms have brought into Albania nearly 300 bakeries with a 
capacity of five tons in 24 hours.  The furnaces meet all the 
country's needs.  On a country scale, 75 percent of the needs for 
bread are met by private bakeries, which function in all city 
quarters and villages.  The state bread production sector is 
undergoing privatization as well, but only 60-70 percent of this 
sector has been privatized so far.  (Tirana ATA in English 0914 GMT 
20 Dec 93 AU) 

   IMPACT OF FOREIGN AID, EMIGRANTS' REMITTANCES:  The 19 December 
issue of GAZETA SHQIPTARE reports that during the past year local 
purchasing power has been significantly increased by approximately 
$500 million received from Albanian emigrants abroad.  At the same 
time, the value of goods brought into Albania by emigrants during 
1993 was about 600 million new leks, nearly $6 million.  Foreign aid 
accorded to Albania during the first ten months of 1993 amounted to 
2.391 billion leks.  Exports were another important source of 
revenue.  During the first nine months this year the profit amounted 
to approximately 6 billion, 775 million leks.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 1132 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   CABINET TO SET UP ENVIRONMENTAL AGENCIES, LABOR INSPECTORATE:  At 
its 20 December meeting, the Council of Ministers agreed to reduce 
the price of fruits, olive trees, and vineyards owned by state 
agricultural enterprises with the intention of stepping up the 
privatization of the state farms.  The Council of Ministers also 
decided to establish regional agencies for protecting the 
environment in prefectures with a view of expanding the information 
system and environmental control and to set up a labor inspectorate 
to control application of Labor Code and implement decisions 
regarding safety measures for workers employed in private sector. 
The new measure will define the rights, duties and other 
responsibilities of labor inspectors.  This measure fills an 
institutional gap existing in the labor field.  The cabinet decided 
to authorize the Ministry of Transportation and Communication to 
grant licenses for carrying out activities in these fields.  (Tirana 
ATA in English 1129 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   U.S. FARMERS' GROUP TO AID DAIRY SECTOR:  The U.S. Private 
Farmers Association "Land O' Lakes" has drafted a program to assist 
Albanian farmers to increase milk production and processing.  The 
association's program "Campaign To Improve the Milk Sector" aims to 
provide training and information to 4,000 Albanian dairy women.  Its 
director, Rebecca Balough, states that the program will last till 
December 1944, and, if it proves to be successful, it will be used 
as a model for other former communist countries in eastern Europe. 
The data provided by the Ministry of Agriculture and Food confirms 
that, in 1990, there were 550 dairy enterprises in Albania.  In 
1992, 40,000 tons of milk were processed for consumption.  Following 
the disintegration of the state agricultural enterprises, 98.5 
percent of dairy barns were privatized, resulting in a net increase 
per capita of milk production.  In 1992, milk production was 205 kg 
per capita, and it is expected to grow to 300 kg per capita per 
year.  (Tirana ATA in English 1320 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   BABY FOOD FACTORY TO BE SET UP IN TIRANA:  Mr. Mustafa Demneri, 
chief of the Department of Trade, Food, and Hotel Industries in 
Tirana Municipality, reports that a baby food factory will be set up 
in Tirana in 1994.  The European Union will contribute 80 million 
leks to the project to be channeled through the Ministry of 
Agriculture and Food.  The Tirana Municipality will provide the 
construction site alongside with its efforts to stimulate the 
production of macaroni, chocolates, wines and the creation of 
wholesale markets in Tirana suburbs.  Food markets will also be 
built by former persecutees and owners.  The Tirana Municipality 
also plans to create touristic centers in Kavaje, a coastal area, 
and Dajti mountain.  (Tirana ATA in English 1126 GMT 22 Dec 93 AU) 

   BULGARIA 

   BRITISH GAS REPORTEDLY FINDS GAS DEPOSIT:  Bulgarian dailies 
reported on 22 December that British Gas had discovered a natural 
gas deposit not far from the mouth of the Kamchiya River.  The 
deposit is expected to be richer than the one discovered by Texaco 
off Cape Galata near Varna.  DUMA reported that the British Gas 
press center denied being the source of the report, and cited Ivan 
Batandzhiev, chairman of the Committee on Geology, who said 
information on the British Gas drilling operations would be 
available around or after Christmas.  (Sofia BTA in English 1139 GMT 
22 Dec 93 AU) 

   STATE RAILWAYS TO CUT PASSENGER SERVICES:  As of 9 January 1994, 
the Bulgarian State Railways (BDZh) will cut 49 passenger train 
services to save costs, Deputy Transport Minister Kharalan 
Kharalanov announced on 21 December.  Kharalanov, who is also 
chairman of the BDZh Board of Directors,  also said that the BDZh 
will reduce the number of railcars in its trains, thus removing 
26,239 seats.  This measure will permit 150 railcars built in 1968 
to be withdrawn from service.  (Sofia KONTINENT in Bulgarian 22 Dec 
93 p 2 AU) 

   DAILY CLAIMS NATIONAL BANK TO SELL GOLD:  On 23 December the TRUD 
daily quoted financiers as saying the Bulgarian National Bank (BNB) 
may sell up to 20 tons of Bulgaria's gold reserves next year to 
raise money for payments to Bulgaria's private creditors and for 
other foreign debt service payments.  BNB Governor Todor Vulchev 
denied the statement.  TRUD quotes him as saying Bulgaria may use 
gold as a security for soft-term loans.  (Sofia BTA in English 1003 
GMT 23 Dec 93 AU) 

   EBRD TO FINANCE INDUSTRIAL PARK:  The European Bank for 
Reconstruction and Development (EBRD) has agreed to lend ECU 10 
million for the building of an industrial park in Bulgaria, Irena 
Komitova, managing director of the Euro Info Correspondence Center 
(EIC) of the Union for Private Economic Enterprise (UPEE), told BTA, 
quoting a letter to the EIC.  Greek and German partners of the EIC 
will finance the project with a further ECU 10 million. 

   The park will be housed in a specially built structure, in which 
a dozen or so Bulgarian companies will be allocated warehouses and 
production premises.  Infrastructure will be provided for some other 
services, such as financial management, office services, printing 
and mail, Mrs. Komitova said.  The main idea is that Bulgarian, 
Greek, and joint ventures be supported in the first two years of 
their operation. 

   High-tech companies are also expected to work in the Bulgarian 
industrial park, as Bulgaria is well known for its specialists, 
particularly in software.  The companies will not only be able to 
use the available infrastructure and information, but they can also 
buy the offices and the storerooms on easy terms, she added.  She 
said the idea came from a Greek-German group of internationally 
active business consulting firms.  The project's extended final 
version for about ECU 20 million will be submitted to the EBRD by 
the end of January, following its discussion with the Greek-German 
partner group.  A joint venture is envisaged as a joint-stock 
company to manage the industrial center. 

   The Euro Info Correspondence Center holds the exclusive rights to 
liaise between small and medium-sized Bulgarian businesses and the 
European Commission, Mrs. Komitova said.  Its main concern is the 
development of research projects at a macro level and support of new 
private enterprises at the micro level.  The center provides a 
number of specialized services such as legal advice, financial and 
marketing services, etc.  The network of information centers of the 
European Commission is intended to encourage the development of 
small and medium-sized enterprises in the European Union countries 
in the period before the single market is launched, Komitova 
recalled.  (Sofia BTA in English 1705 GMT 23 Dec 93 AU) 

   NEW INVESTMENT BANK SET UP:  The newly established Bulgarian 
Investment Bank (BIB) will help and finance the private sector.  The 
bank's capital is 200 million leva, and the major block of shares 
(35 percent) is held by the European Bank for Reconstruction and 
Development (EBRD).  According to the business daily PARI, the other 
foreign stockholders are Global Finance of Greece (14 percent) and 
Cholmeoly Trustees of Great Britain (11 percent).  The Bulgarian 
stockholders are United Bulgarian Bank and Elektronika Bank (10 
percent), Touristsportbank, Balkanbank and Hebrobank (5 percent), 
and Penyo Khadzhiev (5 percent).  Khadzhiev is a private 
businessman, former executive director of the Bank Consolidation 
Company, and a major shareholder of the private oil company Elpida 
(5 percent). 

   According to the BIB's articles, the bank will have a nine-member 
board of directors.  PARI writes that Penyo Khadzhiev is one of the 
three executive directors, and the other two will be foreigners. 

   The EBRD participation as shareholder in the BIB is its first 
direct investment in Bulgaria, the EBRD has so far financed only 
projects, Stiliyan Vutev, executive director of United Bulgarian 
Bank, says.  According to finance experts, in five or 10 years the 
EBRD will probably sell its BIB shares.  (Sofia BTA in English 1747 
GMT 23 Dec 93 AU) 

   TRADE WITH SOUTH KOREA:  Bulgaria's trade with the Republic of 
Korea has constantly expanded over the past few years.  A great 
number of Bulgarian businessmen have visited the Republic of Korea. 
Executives of small and medium-sized South Korean enterprises 
recently paid a visit to Bulgaria, says Kye Yong-Sang, director of 
KOTRA, the Republic of Korea's Trade Center in Sofia, in an 
interview in DEMOKRATSIYA.  The center was inaugurated in April 
1989.  Four years after the establishment of formal economic 
relations between the two countries, cooperation in science and 
technology has flourished, Mr. Kye adds.  Several South Korean 
companies already sell well on the Bulgarian market.  These include 
Goldstar, Samsung, and Daewoo.  (Sofia BTA in English 1241 GMT 24 
Dec 93 AU) 

   SHIRTS MARKETED ABROAD:  The Vida Stil Tailoring Company will sew 
860,000 shirts on consignment to the London Dewars Company next 
year.  The products will be marketed by the famous Marks and Spencer 
Trading House.  Under the framework agreement between the two sides, 
the London company will provide its Bulgarian partners with 
equipment to the value of $150,000 for the production of 400,000 
sportswear items next year.  Vida Stil has another 600,000-shirt 
consignment ordered by the German firm of Orbis, its oldest partner. 
Another 759,000 shirts will be made for a Belgian company.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1851 GMT 26 Dec 93 AU) 

   BULGARIAN-SWISS TOURIST ASSOCIATION FOUNDED:  A Bulgarian-Swiss 
Tourist Association was set up in Gabrovo (northern Bulgaria). 
Together with its activity in tourism, the organization will help 
launch major projects in agriculture and the health services system. 
The Inter Assist Fund will represent the Swiss side in the 
implementation of the initiative.  (Sofia BTA in English 1851 GMT 26 
Dec 93 AU) 

   SERBIAN COMPANY ACQUIRES VESSELS:  The Kladovo Shipyard, Serbia, 
is the new owner of the seven vessels auctioned off by Bulgarian 
River Lines.  The Serb company spent a total of 4.27 million leva on 
one tugboat, three passenger ships, and two barges.  The Serbian 
Company Director Blagoe Bogdanovic said the two barges will probably 
enter the river fleet sailing the Serb section of the Danube while 
the destination of the others is not yet decided.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1851 GMT 26 Dec 93 AU) 

   JAPANESE COMPANIES STUDY ERMA RIVER THERMAL WATER:  To study the 
ground thermal waters under the Erma River was the key purpose of 
representatives of Japanese firms headed by Kazumasa Shibuta, 
attache in charge of economic affairs at the Japanese Embassy here, 
who visited Zlatograd (southern Bulgaria) last week.  Meeting with 
Mitko Angelov, executive director of the local branch of the Ore 
Mining Gorubso Company, the Japanese guests discussed projects for 
joint activity.  According to the visiting businessmen, the 
development of ore mining in the region can combine with efficient 
use of the ground thermal waters that the area boasts.  A final 
decision on whether or not Japanese companies will invest in a joint 
project will be taken by mid-January.  (Sofia BTA in English 1851 
GMT 26 Dec 93 AU) 

   DAEWOO NEGOTIATES WITH FIRST PRIVATE BANK:  At their annual 
general meeting held a week ago, the shareholders of First Private 
Bank (FPB) voted in favor of continued negotiations with the South 
Korean Daewoo Group, which is bidding to buy a 49-percent stake in 
the bank.  Daewoo will be sold a new share issue of registered and 
voting stock.  The issue will bring the FPB's authorized capital to 
1 billion leva.  The bank was incorporated in April 1990 with a 
wholly privately owned nominal capital of 10 million leva.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1419 GMT 27 Dec 93 AU) 

   SUGAR-BEET GROWERS IN CRISIS:  Bulgaria had 9,000 hectares under 
sugar beet in 1993, down from 18,800 hectares.  Sugar output this 
year is projected at 6-7,000 tons, as compared with 28,000 tons in 
1992.  These figures were announced on 28 December at the annual 
meeting of the Academic Council of the Prof. Ivan Ivanov Sugar Beet 
Institute near Shumen.  According to experts, Bulgaria's sugar beet 
production may hit bottom next year.  The Academic Council proposed 
that the public, the cabinet and parliament be acquainted with the 
grave problems of sugar-beet growers.  (Sofia BTA in English 2026 
GMT 28 Dec 93 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT PROMISES IMF LOWER INFLATION IN 1994:  In a letter 
sent to the IMF, the government and the Bulgarian National Bank 
(BNB) promised that domestic inflation will fall to 30 percent in 
1994.  The document, outlining the government's economic intentions 
for 1994, was signed this week by Finance Minister Stoyan 
Aleksandrov and BNB Governor Todor Vulchev.  If the IMF approves it, 
Bulgaria will receive loans.  The letter promises that monthly 
retail price rises will be held to 2 percent and the budget deficit 
will be kept within 6.2 percent of the GDP.  It also predicts that 
interest rates will fall almost to the annual inflation rate of 30 
percent, and that, by the end of 1994, interest rates will be 
positive, i.e. higher than price inflation.  The letter also states 
that bank loans will be strictly limited in 1994 and that the BNB 
will continue its present policy of imposing credit ceilings.  If 
the IMF accepts the government's letter of intent, Bulgaria may 
expect to receive loans of about $1 billion in 1994.  (Sofia 24 
CHASA in Bulgarian 13 Dec 93 p 1 AU) 

   BUSINESS CONSULTING CENTER OPENS IN SOFIA:  The Bulgarian 
Industrial Association opened a Business Consultancy Center (BCC) in 
Sofia on 16 December.  The center will provide information about 
privatization, investment, banking, insurance, real estate, 
exchanges, and tourism and will offer legal advice.  "This is a new 
business consultancy firm set up in partnership with state and 
private institutions specialized in certain fields," Branimir 
Khandzhiev, the center's executive director, told BTA.  Sessions 
will be held in the provinces, inviting foreign consultants to some 
of them, and the center will also draw on foreign experience.  The 
BCC will establish direct contacts with over 3,000 private and state 
companies and enterprises affiliated to the Bulgarian Industrial 
Association.  All interested economic organizations, private 
persons, and foreign customers can use the center's services. 
Customers will be serviced by experts of the Bulgarian Industrial 
Association, the Privatization Agency, the Sofia City Privatization 
Agency, the Ministries of Trade, Industry, Transport, and 
Construction, the Committee on Tourism, and insurance, banking and 
other specialized institutions.  It will hold sessions every 
Thursday.  (Sofia BTA in English 1122 GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   RETAIL FOOD PRICES RISE:  The retail prices of the goods 
controlled by the government went up 0.74 percent between 30 
November and 15 December, the National Statistical Institute 
announced.  The steepest rise was in the prices of milk -- 3.78 
percent, and yoghurt -- 3.74 percent.  Pork and chicken cost less. 
(Sofia BTA in English 2204 GMT 15 Dec 93 AU) 

   UNION FOR PRIVATE ECONOMIC ENTERPRISE:  In the four years since 
it was set up, the Union for Private Economic Enterprise (UPEE) has 
built structures that have become an integral part of the Bulgarian 
economy, Valentin Mollov, UPEE chairman and head of the Mollov 
Financial Group, said at a press conference in Sofia on 16 December. 
As examples, he listed the UPEE's European Information Center (Euro 
Info Correspondence Center-BG-681), the First Private Bank, the 168 
Hours Press Group, and the Bulgaria Insurance and Reinsurance 
Company.  UPEE was set up on 22 December 1989 as the first nonprofit 
organization that set out to support the first steps of private 
enterprise. 

   The union has now become the largest organization of private 
entrepreneurs.  About 10,000 companies grouped in 50 regional units 
throughout the country are now members of the union, Mollov said. 
This May, he said, the EC approved the Union's Euro Office as a 
representative correspondence center of the European network of EC 
information units.  UPEE has contacts mostly with Bulgaria's 
neighbors, Mollov said, adding that Greece, Romania, and Serbia are 
its most active partners.  The union is trying to maintain 
traditional contacts with the Eastern European countries, including 
those of the former USSR, he added.  The European Information Center 
is drawing up projects with U.S. and Greek companies.  The European 
Bank for Reconstruction and Development is expected to extend ECU 20 
million to finance a large part of a project for a park-incubator 
for small and medium-sized companies, Mollov told journalists after 
the news conference.  UPEE has created over 40,000 jobs in the 
country, Mollov claimed.  He sees as a major achievement a small and 
medium-sized businesses bill introduced by the union in the National 
Assembly.  Such a law would help breed a middle class in this 
country and create new jobs, Mollov added.  (Sofia BTA in English 
1752 GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   PROBLEMS WITH NATURAL GAS SUPPLY:  On 16 December, Ivan Kolev, 
chief of the Countries in Transition to a Market Economy Department 
at the Ministry of Trade, announced that Bulgaria will need 2.8 
billion cubic meters of natural gas in addition to the 3.34 billion 
that Russia contracted to supply via the Orenburg-Yambol gas 
pipeline.  At the moment, Bulgargaz is delaying its payments for gas 
deliveries but, so far, the Russians have not suspended them. 
Bulgargaz's difficulties stem from the fact that it is owed 9 
billion leva by its customers Nef tokhim, the Devnya Plants, Khimko- 
Vratsa, and others.  Kolev suggested that Bulgaria might be able to 
pay for some of the gas with deliveries of soda ash.  Russian and 
Bulgarian experts are currently discussing this possibility.  (Sofia 
DUMA in Bulgarian 17 Dec 93 p 4 AU) 

   RUSE RIVER LINE WANTS TO SELL VESSELS:  On 17 December, the Board 
of Directors of the Bulgarian River Navigation Company applied to 
the Transport Ministry for permission to dispose of 42 river vessels 
worth a total of 250 million leva.  The board needs the money to 
defray its debts to commercial banks, which total 128.511 million 
leva.  The State Savings Bank has already blocked the steamship 
company's bank accounts but granted a postponement of settlement 
until 20 January.  The Privatization Agency and the Council of 
Ministers have to decide whether to allow the sale of the vessels, 
as the river line is scheduled to be privatized with a statutory 
capital of over 200 million leva.  Clients in Argentina have shown 
an interest in buying vessels.  Their average age is 20 years, and 
each is worth about 40 million leva.  The board of directors does 
not believe the reduction in the company's river fleet will affect 
its operations on the Danube, which have been severely reduced as a 
result of the embargo against Yugoslavia.  (Sofia TRUD in Bulgarian 
17 Dec 93 p 6 AU) 

   FOREIGN INVESTMENTS IN JOINT VENTURES:  Foreign investment in 
industrial joint ventures in Bulgaria amounts to over 2 billion leva 
(about $515 million), according to the Industry Ministry.  Direct 
foreign investment from the beginning of 1991 to August 1993 
totalled $167,459,853, said BULGARSKI BIZNES, quoting the ministry's 
Investment Commission.  (Sofia BTA in English 1420 GMT 19 Dec 93 AU) 

   FOREIGN DEBT INTEREST PAYMENT:  By the end of December, the State 
Fund for Reconstruction and Development will assign $27 million for 
interest payments to Bulgaria's commercial creditors for the first 
three-quarters of 1993, Executive Director Maksim Dimov said.  The 
fund aims to reduce the burden on the central bank's foreign 
exchange reserve and to keep the balance in the market.  (Sofia BTA 
in English 1420 GMT 19 Dec 93 AU) 

   CEMENT INDUSTRY PRIVATIZATION BLOCKED:  Privatization in the 
cement industry has been blocked, Reneta Indzhova, executive 
director of the Privatization Agency, told a news conference 
recently.  Given the current economic situation and output, 
Bulgaria's six plants cannot make cement for export, she said.  As 
it is, the industry will collapse.  The agency and the Construction 
Ministry should pool their efforts and prepare the units for 
privatization, according to Indzhova.  A cement plant in Devnya 
(northeastern Bulgaria) is being reconstructed, BTA's local 
correspondent reported.  Equipment worth 4.5 million German marks 
will be supplied from Germany.  The revamping will be completed next 
autumn and will allow the plant's output to reach the standard of 
the British cement type 450, the report states.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1420 GMT 19 Dec 93 AU) 

   BULGARIAN-GERMAN AGRICULTURAL PROJECT:  A Bulgarian-German 
agricultural project will be implemented along the Maritsa River 
(southern Bulgaria) as of 1994, the PARI daily reports.  Germany 
will provide consultancy at all stages, from sowing to sale.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1420 GMT 19 Dec 93 AU) 

   GREEK BUSINESSMEN DISCUSS COOPERATION:  A Bulgarian-Greek 
business forum on Balkan economic cooperation was held in Sofia on 
20 December.  It focused on areas of cooperation and the utilization 
of funds granted to Bulgaria under the European Union's Interreg 
Program for the development of border regions and Operation PHARE 
(Economic and Reconstruction Aid for Poland and Hungary Program). 
The forum was organized by the Central Union of Labor Cooperatives 
in Bulgaria, the Union of Farmer Cooperatives in Kastoria (UFC) 
(Greece), and the Greek consultancy firms Evro-Development and 
Domes.  The participants discussed the role of cooperatives in the 
expansion of contacts between the two countries and the sale of 
products of UFC-Kastoria in Bulgaria.  Grigoris Koutsabuyukidhis, 
president of UFC-Kastoria, said a protocol had been signed with 
Plovdiv's labor cooperative within the framework of Interreg for 
setting up chain stores and for joint production of dairy products. 
Under the PHARE Program, the European Union has already extended ECU 
160 million to Bulgaria for economic adjustment, agriculture and the 
food industry.  Part of these funds will go to UFC-Kastoria.  Greece 
is interested in Bulgarian fertilizers, fodder, and other 
agricultural products and wants to cooperate in the wood-working and 
food industries.  (Sofia BTA in English 1742 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   CHEESE EXPORT TO UNITED STATES:  The Serdika Company in Shumen 
exported the first shipment of 60 tons of cheese made from cow's 
milk to the United States.  It is the only Bulgarian firm to enter 
the U.S. market.  In the past year, it exported 190 tons of cheese 
made from sheep's milk to the United States.  (Sofia BTA in English 
1420 GMT 19 Dec 93 AU) 

   PARLIAMENT AMENDS BANKING, LENDING ACT:  Parliament amended the 
Banks and Lending Act at first and second reading on 20 December. 
Revaluation of fixed assets has not finished yet because of the 
consolidation and reorganization of the banking system, which 
necessitated an extension of the term by one year until 31 December 
1994.  The extension voted by parliament allows banks with a state 
holding to change their fixed capital after the revaluation.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 0756 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   CZECH REPUBLIC 

   INDUSTRIAL PRODUCTION DECLINES IN OCTOBER:  Industrial output in 
October 1993 fell 7.9 percent short of the October 1992 result and 
the output of the building industry fell 6.7 percent short of the 
October 1992 figure, the Czech Statistical Office reports.  In the 
first 10 months of the year, the index of industrial production fell 
to 94.5 percent and the index of building output to 95.6 percent of 
the level of the same period in 1992.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Czech 10 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   GROWING TRADE WITH ISRAEL:  The volume of Czech-Israeli trade 
turnover reached $84.7 million in the first nine months of 1993, 
compared with $54.6 million for 1992 as a whole.  The Czech Republic 
has thereby overtaken Hungary and Poland to become Israel's most 
important trading partner among the countries of the Visegrad Four. 
Imports from Israel, which consist mainly of telecommunications 
equipment (15 percent), electric goods and appliances (12.8 
percent), and cotton and textiles (10 percent), exceeded Czech 
exports 1.5 times.  The most important Czech export article are 
passenger cars, which account for 71.2 percent of Czech exports, 
followed by iron and steel (12.4 percent), and machinery (4.1 
percent).  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 10 Dec 93 p 21 AU) 

   NOVEMBER CONSUMER PRICE GROWTH:  Consumer prices increased 0.5 
percent in November 1993, compared with October, Jarmila Lehnerova, 
spokesperson of the Czech Statistical Office, announced.  While food 
prices decreased 0.3 percent, prices of non-food items increased 0.7 
percent, prices of restaurant meals increased 0.5 percent, and 
prices of services 1.3 percent.  Since the beginning of the year, 
the consumer price index increased 17.2 percent.  While food prices 
increased 12.5 percent and prices of non-food items 17.0 percent, 
the cost of services went up 23.5 percent and the cost of restaurant 
meals 21.6 percent.  (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY in Czech 11 Dec 93 p 2 
AU) 

   TRADE WITH ITALY BOOMING:  The volume of trade between the Czech 
Republic and Italy increased 60 percent in the first half of 1993. 
Czech imports from Italy amounted to Kcl0 billion and Czech exports 
to Italy to Kc7.5 billion.  Italian companies have invested $100 
million in companies in the Czech Republic.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF 
in Czech 11 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   FIRST NON-BANK TITLES ON LISTED SECURITIES MARKET:  The number of 
listed titles on the Prague Stock Exchange will increase by two -- 
Cokoladovny Praha, a sweets and confectionery maker, and IPS Prague, 
a construction firm -- the Stock Exchange Committee decided.  So 
far, only the shares of three banks (Komercni Banka, Ceska 
Sporitelna, and Zivnostenska Banka) have been quoted on the listed 
securities market.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 11 Dec 93 p 
14 AU) 

   LIAZ ENGINES FOR RUSSIAN TRUCKS:  As of December the Russian 
Avtoeksport company will begin using engines from the LIAZ Jablonec 
nad Nisou company for its KAMAZ trucks.  LIAZ and Avtoeksport have 
concluded a contract for the delivery of 10,900 engines for KAMAZ, 
whose engine plant was destroyed in a fire.  LIAZ is only one of 
three companies to have met the Russian truck maker's exacting 
criteria, the other two being the U.S. Cummins company and the 
Russian Yaroslavl engine plant.  DAF, Scania, or Detroit Diesel 
engines, for example, all failed the test.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA 
DNES in Czech 11 Dec 93 p 14 AU) 

   LIAZ CHASSIS FOR TURKISH TRUCKS:  Representatives of the LIAZ 
Jablonec nad Nisou company and the Turkish Coban-Tur trading company 
signed a contract for the delivery of 600 LIAZ truck chassis. 
Starting in January 1994, LIAZ will supply 50 chassis a month to 
Turkey.  The contract is worth almost $15 million.  (Prague MLADA 
FRONTA DNES in Czech 13 Dec 93 p 14 AU) 

   BOOMING COMPUTER MARKET:  Since 1989, sales of personal computers 
have been increasing at an annual rate of 33 percent, but the growth 
rate is slowing down.  In 1992, 135,000 personal computers worth 
$220 million were sold in the Czech and Slovak Republics, which 
represented an increase of 41 percent over the preceding year.  In 
1993, some 148,000 personal computers worth $234 million are 
expected to be sold in the two countries, which represents a growth 
rate of "only" 10 percent.  The average price of personal computers 
sold in the Czech Republic and Slovakia is $1,580.  Sales of 
printers are also booming.  In 1992, 116,000 printers worth $71 
million were sold in what still was Czechoslovakia, 43 percent more 
than in 1991.  In 1993, 126,000 printers are expected to be sold in 
the Czech and Slovak Republics, which represents a growth rate of 9 
percent.  The average price of printers sold on the Czech and Slovak 
markets is $620.  The market for copiers has undergone a similar 
development.  Last year's 31 percent growth will be followed by an 
estimated 11 percent growth in 1993.  The number of fax machines 
sold in the Czech and Slovak Republics is expected to reach 38,000 
this year and their total value will be $40 million.  This 
represents a 17 percent increase in sales, following a 40 percent 
increase in 1992.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF in Czech 13 Dec 93 p 6 AU) 

   BREWERIES HIT BY SLOVAK DEVALUATION:  Breweries in east Moravia, 
which depend on the Slovak market for 20 to 40 percent of their 
output, fear the impact of the 5 percent devaluation of the Slovak 
koruna and the 3 percent revaluation of the Czech koruna against the 
clearing ECU (European Currency Unit), introduced early in December. 
In their opinion, the expected 20 percent general devaluation of the 
Slovak koruna would bring beer exports to Slovakia to a complete 
halt.  In conjunction with the expected drop in sales to Slovakia, 
Moravian breweries now expect a more acute competition on the 
domestic Moravian market.  There are now 70 breweries in the Czech 
Republic, which produced 3.88 million hectoliters of beer last year. 
(Prague RUDE PRAVO in Czech 13 Dec 93 p 8 AU) 

   NOVEMBER UNEMPLOYMENT FIGURES:  The rate of unemployment slightly 
increased in November but the growth remains very slow, Minister of 
Labor and Social Affairs Jindrich Vodicka told journalists.  At the 
end of November 1993, 3.34 percent of the population were out of 
work.  Prague has retained the lowest rate of unemployment (0.34 
percent), while Bruntal district had the highest unemployment (8.12 
percent).  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 13 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   JAWA MOTORCYCLES FOR TURKISH MARKET:  Jawa Tynec nad Sazavou and 
the Turkish Ozbelge Izmir firm have concluded a contract for the 
supply of motorcycles, components, and spare parts.  In the 
contract, the Turkish partner undertook to import between 6,000 and 
10,000 Jawa motorcycles annually.  The next step to increase sales 
of Jawa motorcycles on the Turkish market, where Jawa is the second 
biggest brand in terms of sales, will be the construction of an 
assembly plant.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 14 Dec 93 p 2 
AU) 

   CZECH TRADE CENTER IN KIEV:  On the basis of a contract concluded 
in November 1993, the Job's Trading company from Opava, north 
Moravia, will open a Czech Trade Center in Kiev next year.  The firm 
will reconstruct a complex of buildings in an attractive part of the 
Ukrainian capital, which will house three restaurants, a sales 
center, a warehouse, as well as offices for rent to Czech 
businessmen.  In cooperation with the Ukrainian Vneshneespobyznys 
company and the Czech Ministry of Trade and Industry, Job's Trading 
organized a sales exhibition of 33 Czech companies in Kiev in 
October, at which $5 million worth of contracts were concluded. 
Job's Trading also plans to import 50,000 tons of feed grain from 
Ukraine next year, one-third of which is to be reexported to third 
countries.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 14 Dec 93 p 7 AU) 

   NUMBER OF SECURITIES ON STOCK EXCHANGE:  The number of securities 
that can be traded at the Prague Stock Exchange has increased to 
982, of which 955 are coupon privatization shares.  Of the other 27 
securities, four are state bonds, seven are bonds and debentures 
from other issuers, two are participation certificates, and 14 are 
shares that do not have their origin in coupon privatization. 
(Prague LIDOVE NOVINY in Czech 14 Dec 93 p 13 AU) 

   CZECH SHARES INAUGURATED AT VIENNA STOCK EXCHANGE:  On 13 
December, the shares of a Czech company appeared for the first time 
on the list of quotations of a foreign stock exchange.  The CEZ 
(Czech Power-Generating Works) company issued 200,000 options for 
the purchase of CEZ shares, which have been introduced on the Vienna 
Stock Exchange by the investment branch of Bank Austria.  CEZ shares 
are currently the most heavily traded shares at the Prague Stock 
Exchange.  Those who purchase the CEZ options will be able to buy 
one CEZ share for 600 Austrian schillings by 30 December 1994. 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 14 Dec 93 p 1 AU) 

   5,000 KORUNA BANKNOTE PUT INTO CIRCULATION:  On 15 December the 
Czech National Bank (CNB) put into circulation banknotes with a 
nominal value of Kc5,000 ($1 is about Kc30).  The banknote's front 
side carries the portrait of Tomas Garrigue Masaryk, the first 
Czechoslovak president (1918-35), and the back side, a group of 
well-known Prague Gothic and Baroque buildings.  It is mostly gray, 
with some rosy color.  The state printing office will issue a total 
of 20 million Kc5,00O banknotes.  Leopold Surga, director of CNB's 
currency department, said on 14 December the introduction of the 
Kc5,000 banknote was not an expression of distrust in monetary 
development.  The banknotes are supposed to serve especially for 
higher payments and reserves in cash.  They will not be usual in 
payments of wages and current cash-payment relations, CNB's Press 
Spokesman Martin Svehla said.  The banknote has all standard 
protective elements and a plastic sign for the blind. 

   The set of Czech banknotes will be completed by issuing Kc20 and 
Kc2,000 banknotes next year.  The first will bear the portrait of 
Czech King Premysl Otakar I (died 1230), the second, the opera 
singer Ema Destinova (1878-1930).  The Czech Republic has sufficient 
reserves of coins and banknotes, Surga said.  It should be fully 
self-sufficient in minting coins and printing banknotes as of next 
year.  Minting will be done by the mint of Jablonecka Bizuterie and 
printing by the State Printing Office in Prague.  Around 350 million 
Czech banknotes and about 800 million coins were made this year in 
connection with the separation of Czech and Slovak currencies in 
February following the split of Czechoslovakia on January 1, 1993. 
The number is expected to reach 200 million banknotes and 300 
million coins next year.  CNB delayed publishing the economic 
results of the monetary separation from Slovakia because they are so 
far only in the form of rough estimates.  (Prague CTK in English 14 
Dec 93 AU) 

   CSA FOREIGN SHAREHOLDERS DEMAND COMPENSATION:  The foreign 
shareholders of Czechoslovak Airlines (CSA) -- Air France and the 
European Bank for Reconstruction and Development (EBRD) -- demand 
from CSA the return of some Kc7O0 million, Jiri Weigl, chief of the 
government's consultants, announced after an extraordinary meeting 
of government ministers on 13 December.  According to Weigl, the 
CSA's closing account shows that the Czech contribution to the joint 
venture had been overvalued by that sum.  The two shareholders, who 
paid some Kc1.8 billion for less than 40 percent of CSA shares last 
year, therefore demand a financial settlement.  Jiri Weigl also said 
that the CSA would lose an estimated Kc1.2 billion this year. 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 14 Dec 93 p 1; Prague CESKY DENIK 
in Czech 14 Dec 93 p 1 AU) 

   CSA CARRIES OVER 1 MILLION PASSENGERS:  The Czechoslovak Airlines 
(CSA) carried 1,041,385 passengers in the first 10 months of the 
year.  The greatest increase in the number of passengers was on 
CSA's West European (22 percent) and North American (27 percent) 
routes.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF in Czech 7 Dec 93 p 6 AU) 

   DISSATISFACTION WITH STANDARD OF LIVING:  The majority of Czechs 
are satisfied and optimistic about developments in their country's 
democracy and foreign policies, but three-quarters are dissatisfied 
with their standard of living and social security.  According to a 
November poll of 802 people by the Institute for Public Opinion 
Research, 48 percent of Czechs are "satisfied" and another 10 
percent "very satisfied" with democratic developments.  On the other 
hand, 74 percent of the respondents described themselves as 
"dissatisfied" with their standard of living, nearly half of those 
"greatly dissatisfied."  Seventy-six percent expressed 
dissatisfaction with their social security, with half (38 percent) 
expressing great dissatisfaction. 

   Nearly the exact same percentages held regarding people's 
optimism, or lack of it, in the respective areas, although the 
number of "great" pessimists on living standards and social security 
drops by 11-12 percent.  Opinions on other aspects of political and 
economic developments showed no clear pattern, except that 
considerably more satisfaction and optimism regarding economic 
transformation, social security, and living standards appears among 
high school and university-level students, as well as among 
entrepreneurs.  One clear explanation is that these people face much 
better opportunities for financial remuneration and advancement than 
most people.  (Prague CTK in English 15 Dec 93 AU) 

   PRAGUE GIVES GREEN LIGHT TO FIRST ESTEE LAUDER STORE:  The 
American cosmetics and perfume maker Estee Lauder is expected to 
open its first store in Prague next year, the City Council decided 
today.  The council decided to rent the Parizska Street space to the 
company for ten years because of its Kcl7.5 million ($600,000) 
contribution to restoration of the historic building.  Estee Lauder 
will have to pay the current tenant, Tuzex, Kc3 million as 
compensation for the space.  The Prague store will be the company's 
third in eastern Europe.  The first two are in Budapest and Moscow. 
(Prague CTK in English 15 Dec 93 AU) 

   FEWER GERMAN TOURISTS VISITING KRKONOSE:  The owners of hotels 
and mountain chalets in the Krkonose (Giant) mountains in north-east 
Bohemia are watching with apprehension the continuing decrease in 
the numbers of their guests, the Dresden daily SAECHSISCHE ZEITUNG 
wrote on 30 November.  The times when over eight million tourists a 
year visited the mountain region are long over, it added.  The daily 
noted that one of the major reasons for the lack of interest in 
visiting the Krkonose in winter time was that many of its regular 
guests from the former German Democratic Republic currently prefer 
to go to the Alps.  On one hand, the Alps are something new for them 
and, on the other, they have had bad experiences with Krkonose price 
levels and the way they compare to the level of services provided. 

   The daily noted that the intention of many of Czech entrepreneurs 
to "bleed East Germans dry" has backfired on them.  For several 
seasons now, the hotels and mountain chalets in Krkonose have been 
only half-full.  It is possible to agree with the higher price level 
in the modernized chalets because they are mostly private properties 
which their owners received in restitution, and they have to repay 
comparativelyhigh bank-loans.  However, -nothing--except the prices 
has changed in many hotels, the daily wrote.  Frequently, guests are 
offered rooms without their own washing facilities, and services are 
far below Western levels.  (Prague CTK in English 30 Nov 93 AU) 

   SKODA MAY BUILD ASSEMBLY PLANT IN POLAND:  The Czech car 
manufacturer Skoda, based in Mlada Boleslav, central Bohemia, is 
considering building a car assembly plant in Poland, according to 
information published in the German daily HANDELSBLATT on 30 
November.  Vice Chairman of the Board Volkhard Kohler says in the 
article that, by building a plant in Poland, the company would avoid 
having to pay high import duty.  The German news agency, DPA, 
reported that the move would not mean a reduction in Skoda 
production in the Czech Republic.  Kohler commented on proposals to 
build a plant in Vietnam or China by saying the company would "first 
practice in its own backyard before going so far."  Contrary to 
earlier plans, Volkswagen would not now be building any new engine 
construction plants for Skoda but would restrict itself to assembly, 
Kohler said.  In the current economic climate such heavy investment 
would be unjustifiable, he said.  (Prague CTK in English 29 Nov 93 
AU) 

   SPOKESMAN CONFIRMS SKODA ENGINE PLANT PROJECT SCRAPPED:  No 
capital is available for financing the construction of Skoda's own 
engine factory and, moreover, the engine-manufacturing capacities of 
the Volkswagen concern are now unused, Jiri Hrabovsky of the press 
department of the Skoda car maker in Mlada Boleslav, central 
Bohemia, told CTK on 30 November.  He said the construction of the 
engine factory would cost about 17 billion crowns (about $580 
million), which would have to be paid by clients in the prices of 
new cars.  Hrabovsky was reacting to an article published in the 
German daily HANDELSBLATT.  The article claimed that Volkswagen, 
which has the largest stake in Skoda, had canceled plans to build an 
engine plant for Skoda and that Skoda was considering building a car 
assembly plant in Poland. 

   Skoda, which created a joint venture with Volkswagen in 1991, now 
expects semi-finished engines to be manufactured abroad and then 
assembled in the Czech Republic.  Skoda is doing its best to ensure 
most components for the new engine come from Czech suppliers. 
Ensuring a high quality will be an important criterion for choosing 
suppliers, Hrabovsky said.  He noted that Skoda expected to sell 
30,000 to 40,000 cars annually in Poland in future.  By imposing a 
41-percent tax and duties on imported Skoda cars, the Polish 
Government dramatically cut Skoda imports from 40,000 cars in 1991 
to 2,200 in the past ten months of this year.  Unless these barriers 
are lifted during negotiations of the Visegrad Four (the Czech and 
Slovak Republics, Hungary, and Poland), assembly of Skoda cars in 
Poland within the next two years would be considered, Hrabovsky 
said.  He added that this would in no case threaten job 
opportunities in the Czech Republic.  The entire project is, 
however, only being considered, he added.  (Prague CTK in English 30 
Nov 93 AU) 

   SKODA TO CUT DEVELOPMENT FUNDING:  The Skoda auto manufacturer 
will invest 3.749 billion German marks (DM) into development over 
the next five years, less than half the originally planned sum, 
Skoda Mlada Boleslav Director Ludvik Kalma told MLADA FRONTA DNES on 
30 November.  Despite this cut, Skoda will maintain its development 
plan, which Board member Volkhard Kohler said would be financed 
primarily by Skoda.  Another 700 million DM will be provided by 
Volkswagen, which is to increase its share in the auto manufacturer 
from 30 to 70 percent over the next two years, the paper writes. 
The investment cut will affect mainly the planned construction of a 
new motor plant, where Volkswagen was to have produced some 400,000 
motors annually for Skoda as well as other Volkswagen concerns, 
Kalma said.  While he said construction of the plant was no longer 
being considered by Volkswagen, according to the daily the Czech 
Government, which is still the majority shareholder in Skoda Mlada 
Boleslav, had not agreed to call it off. 

   In an article in MLADA FRONTA DNES on 1 December, Minister of 
Industry and Trade Vladimir Dlouhy says that if it was shown that 
Volkswagen was not acting in accordance with Skoda's interests, the 
Czech side would begin to act as a majority shareholder.  Dlouhy 
notes that the Czech side accepts the new strategy, which had been 
changed under market pressures, and does not want to force its 
partner into financial losses.  At the same time, however, he 
stresses that there is a minimum level of financial investment, 
without which the future of Skoda, as one of the pillars of Czech 
industry, could not be imagined.  The Volkswagen management cannot 
behave towards Skoda as if it was one of their factories, Dlouhy 
said, as long as it is still a minority shareholder.  In order to 
improve mutual relations and achieve more effective cooperation, 
Dlouhy said, the Czech side should propose a supplement to the 
original agreement from 1991, in which Volkswagen would pledge to 
taking several steps.  These should include concrete, specifically 
defined cooperation in privatizing the remaining 30 percent of 
shares, selling off Skoda's iron works, determining market prices 
for trade between Skoda and Volkswagen, and also not artificially 
lowering Skoda's profits to benefit Volkswagen.  (Prague CTK in 
English 1 Dec 93 AU) 

   TRADE UNION FEARS VW INTENDS TO CUT SKODA WORKFORCE:  According 
to Zdenek Kadlec, chairman of the trade union organization in the 
Skoda Mlada Boleslav automobile company, the German Volkswagen 
concern, which holds a 31 percent stake in the company, intends to 
turn Skoda into a mere "assembly plant" and its Czech workers into 
"guest workers in their own country."  The trade unions fear that, 
following the recently announced investment cuts, only 7,000 of the 
company's 17,000 employees will keep their jobs.  Without 
specifying, Kadlec said that Volkswagen was trying to introduce in 
the Czech Republic "new methods of work that it did not succeed in 
asserting among its German employees."  He also pointed out that, 
while Czech Skoda employees earn an average of 300 German marks per 
month, the company's German employees earn "incomparably more." 
According to Kadlec, the Czech side should not abandon its current 
majority stake (69 percent) in Skoda "as long as the German side 
does not meet its commitments toward the Czech automobile factory." 
(Prague LIDOVE NOVINY in Czech 8 Dec 93 p 3 AU) 

   SKODA PROFITS DOWN:  The Skoda Mlada Boleslav automobile factory 
expects to make a profit of 2 to 5 million German marks (Kc35-85 
million) this year, the company's representatives announced on 8 
December.  The company will produce the record number of over 
220,000 passenger cars in 1993, about 10 percent more than last 
year.  In 1992, Skoda made a profit of 66 million German marks 
(Kc1.12 billion).  Skoda will be the only member of the Volkswagen 
group (Volkswagen, Audi, Seat, Skoda) to report profit this year. 
The concern as a whole expects to lose 2 billion German marks. 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 9 Dec 93 p 14 AU) 

   TENDER FOR LEASE OF HISTORIC CAFE ANNOUNCED:  The rectorate of 
the Academy of Performing Arts (AMU) published the conditions of the 
new public tender for the lease of Cafe Slavia and Parnas 
Restaurant, both housed in the Lazansky Palace, on 30 November. 
Applicants have until December 20 to present their intentions on the 
use and restoration of the premises and pay a nonrefundable 
application fee of 30,000 crowns (about $1,000).  The AMU commission 
will then announce the winner of the tender for lease.  Once the 
lease agreement has been signed, the new lessees will be able to 
operate the premises by January 15, 1994. 

   AMU has fixed the length of the lease as between ten and fifteen 
years.  It requires the lessee of Slavia to restore the interior in 
the style of the 1930's and preserve reasonable prices and to run 
the AMU college canteen in the basement at cost price.  Slavia's new 
lessee will further be required to contribute to the cost of 
strengthening the aging structure and renovating the facade of the 
building.  The rent has been provisionally set at 4,000 crowns 
(around $140) per square meter, and the sum will be linked to 
inflation.  The AMU Senate put the palace out to tender after 
withdrawing from a lease agreement it had signed two years earlier 
with the U.S.-based company HN Gorin.  That agreement was canceled 
because HN Gorin failed to pay the rent.  Slavia, housed in a palace 
on the bank of the river Vltava beside the National Theater, was a 
favored haunt of Prague artists, intellectuals, and students since 
opening in 1863.  (Prague CTK in English 30 Nov 93 AU) 

   COAL MINES INSOLVENT, TO BE RESTRUCTURED:  Outstanding payments 
to the Czech Social Security Administration, which reached the sum 
of 707 korunas (Kc) million at the end of October 1993, and the 
company's strained financial situation in general have forced the 
management of the Ostrava-Karvina Coal Mines (OKD) to ask Komercni 
Banka for a bridge loan of Kc1 billion.  The OKD offers as 
collateral its outstanding claims, the shares of its subsidiaries, 
and proceeds from planned real estate sales.  The OKD's total 
liabilities amounted to Kc6.684 billion at the end of October, while 
the value of unsold coal in its depots was Kc960 million at the end 
of September and its customers' unpaid bills stood at Kc7.2 billion. 
According to OKD Director General Ivan Dzida, the company's claims 
exceed its liabilities by only Kc200 to Kc3O0 million, however, as 
the sum total of claims also includes "internal claims" within the 
framework of accounting between individual mines.  Ivan Dzida 
expects the OKD to produce a loss of Kc2O0-300 million this year, 
which he blames on the "flawed marketing policy of the previous 
management, which was replaced this September."  Last year, the 
company made a profit of Kc147 million.  The OKD expects to sell 
13.5 million tons of coal this year, compared with 14.1 million tons 
in 1992.  Dzida said that the OKD would be transformed into a 
holding of nine independent mines as of 1 January 1994, which should 
help eliminate the losses.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 30 
Nov 93 pp 1, 2 AU) 

   CSOB LOWERS LOAN INTEREST RATES:  Ceskoslovenska Obchodni Banka 
(Czechoslovak Foreign Trade Bank, CSOB) lowers its loan interest 
rates as of 1 December 1993.  The minimum interest rate has been set 
at 12 percent, the basic interest rate for short-term loans (under 
one year) will be 13.25 percent, for two-year loans 14.5 percent, 
and for loans of up to three years 15.5 percent.  A basic interest 
rate of 14 percent will continue to apply to loan contracts 
concluded prior to 1 December.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 
30 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   QUOTA ON APPLE IMPORTS FROM EC STATES:  EC states will be able to 
export only 15,000 tons of apples to the Czech Republic in 1994. 
The import quota for this commodity will go into effect on 1 January 
1994.  Over the last two years, apple imports from EC countries 
increased sevenfold and reached 42,900 tons (about one-fifth of 
domestic consumption) this year.  The losses of domestic growers 
caused by EC countries' subsidized apple exports are estimated at 
Kc162 million.  The wholesale price of imported apples is Kc7 to Kc8 
per kilogram, thanks to an EC subsidy of 8 European Currency Units 
per 100 kilograms, while Czech growers get an average of Kc9.83 per 
kilogram.  This year's apple harvest is estimated at 330,000 tons, 
130,000 tons of which come from commercial orchards.  This year's 
apple harvest exceeds last year's harvest by 100,000 tons and should 
cover domestic demand.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 29 Nov 
93 p 2; Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 30 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   SIXTY PERCENT OF INDUSTRIAL ENTERPRISES INSOLVENT:  Sixty percent 
of industrial enterprises were insolvent at the beginning of 
November, according to a survey carried out by the Czech Statistical 
Office in 731 industrial enterprises accounting for 62 percent of 
the Czech Republic's industrial output.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 
in Czech 30 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   REHABILITATION OF LAND DAMAGED BY MINING:  According to a study 
drawn up by the Hydroprojekt Prague company, the restoration of the 
landscape in the Sokolov area, devastated by 40 years of intensive 
mining, will cost Kc9 billion.  Under the study, the work will start 
in the near future and last until 2030, when the coal mines in the 
area will have been depleted.  Sater, a consortium of French firms 
that participated in the successful restoration of the coal basin in 
northern France, promised to help find investors who would finance 
the project.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF in Czech 30 Nov 93 p 6 AU) 

   MOST BELIEVE BUSINESSMEN GAINED CAPITAL DISHONESTLY:  Eighty 
percent of Czechs believe that those who have become "big 
businessmen" gained their capital dishonestly in the past, while a 
mere eight percent believe they did not, according to an October 
survey by the Institute for Public Opinion Research (IVVM).  The 
survey asked 777 Czechs aged over 15 the question "Who are our big 
businessmen?" and invited them to reply "yes" or "no" to each of 
five things commonly said about the new entrepreneurs in the Czech 
Republic.  Three-quarters (76 percent) believed that when starting 
businesses, entrepreneurs made use of contacts and information 
gained from their previous employment.  Only nine percent believed 
they did not.  The view that those who had begun to do business were 
entrepreneurial, clever people who had good ideas was considered 
correct by 68 percent, with 20 percent believing they were not. 
Entrepreneurs were believed to be former communist functionaries and 
apparatchiks by 65 percent.  Seventeen percent did not agree. 
Fifty-five percent said that people who had started businesses had 
had property returned to them in the restitution process, while 25 
percent thought they had not.  (Prague CTK in English 1 Dec 93 AU) 

   CZECH-RUSSIAN OIL VENTURE:  The Ural Invest Oil Corporation 
(UOIL) Izhevsk, a joint Russian-Czech venture, was registered by the 
Russian Government on 26 August 1992.  The company, which is engaged 
in the extraction, transport, storage, and sale of crude oil, 
currently employs 41 people.  It has extracted 122,000 tons of crude 
oil this year and plans to increase its production to 1 million tons 
by the year 2000.  As the company does not possess an import license 
for the Czech Republic, it uses the services of the Chemapol 
company, through which it has sold 70,000 tons of crude oil to the 
Czech Republic.  Eventually, the firm hopes to cover 15 percent of 
Czech annual consumption.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 1 Dec 93 
p 6 AU) 

   MINIMUM WAGE INCREASED:  Minimum wage rates in the business 
sector will be raised 6 to 20 percent as of 1 January 1994, the 
Czech Government decided on 1 December.  The minimum hourly wage in 
the lowest wage category will be raised from Kc12 to Kc12.80 and the 
minimum monthly wage from Kc2,200 to Kc2,340.  The minimum hourly 
wage in the highest wage category will be raised from Kc24 to 
Kc28.80, which corresponds to a monthly increase from Kc4,450 to 
Kc5,350.  Prime Minister Klaus justified the uneven increases by the 
need for greater differentiation among individual wage categories. 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 22 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   CZECH-FRENCH MAIL-ORDER FIRM:  The Magnet Pardubice AS and the 
French Camif company have signed an agreement on setting up a joint 
mail-order firm.  Magnet Pardubice, which runs a network of 35 
stores with industrial goods in east Bohemia, will have a minority 
stake in the joint enterprise.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES PENIZE 
Supplement in Czech 2 Dec 93 p 13 AU) 

   GERMANY'S HARTMAN FIRM TO INVEST KC8O0 MILLION:  Two contracts on 
the sale of shares and four plants of the Rico Veverska Bityska 
state enterprise to the German Paul Hartmann company were signed on 
the premises of the National Property Fund in Prague on 1 December. 
This act completed the privatization of the Rico state enterprise, 
the largest manufacturer of health-care and hygiene products in the 
Czech Republic.  The four plants, which together employ about 1,000 
people, are located at Veverska Bityska, Havlickuv Brod, 
Chvalkovice, and Most.  They control 30 to 40 percent of the Czech 
market.  According to Jiri Cerny, a representative of Hartmann-Rico, 
the German firm's Czech subsidiary, the two contracts guarantee an 
investment of Kc800 million over the next five years, which makes 
this the largest investment of foreign capital in the Czech economy 
in the last quarter of 1993.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 2 
Dec 93 p 2; Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 4 Dec 93 p 14 AU) 

   DUTCH SUPERMARKET CHAIN IN NORTH MORAVIA:  According to Jan 
Navratil, director of the Pramen Ostrava state enterprise, Pramen's 
11 "best-integrated" supermarkets in north Moravia with an aggregate 
book value of Kc90 million will be sold directly to the Dutch Ahold 
company.  They will be operated by Eurodomus and Euronova, Ahold's 
Czech subsidiaries, which have been leasing some of these stores for 
over a year.  The remaining parts of Pramen Ostrava will be divided 
into five independent companies and privatized separately -- by the 
coupon method, through public auctions, or through direct sale to a 
designated buyer.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 2 Dec 93 p 6 
AU) 

   LARGEST TRANSACTION ON PRAGUE STOCK EXCHANGE:  A total of 180,000 
Komercni Banka (Commercial Bank, KB) shares worth Kc936 million 
changed hands at the Prague Stock Exchange on 2 December, in what 
was the largest single sale of shares in the history of the 
exchange.  The 180,000 shares represent about 3.6 percent of the 
KB's capital stock.  Only six owners (the Czech National Property 
Fund, the Slovak National Property Fund, and four investment funds) 
control a package of KB's shares of this size, but none of them 
owned up to the sale.  In the opinion of Finance Minister Ivan 
Kocarnik, the transaction was "an excellent signal that the capital 
market is taking off." (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 3 Dec 93 p 
1 AU) 

   ELECTRIC CARS FOR GERMAN MARKET:  The ELIS company in Plzen has 
started to equip Opel Corsa passenger cars with electric drive for 
the German market.  By the end of the year it will supply to Germany 
the first 10 electricity-powered Opel Corsas at a cost of about 
42,000 German marks per vehicle.  The company already has an order 
for the delivery of 100 more vehicles in 1994.  The car's battery 
must be recharged after about 70 km.  The car runs at a maximum 
speed of 80 km per hour.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 3 Dec 
93 p 3 AU) 

   LOWER INTEREST ON SHORT-TERM DEPOSITS:  Investicni Banka 
(Investment Bank, IB) is lowering the interest rate on so-called 
"ultra-short-term" and short-term deposits by 0.3 to 0.5 percent 
effective 6 December.  The new interest rates range from 6 percent 
for seven-day deposits to 12.2 percent for 11-month deposits. 
Interest rates on 1-to-4-year term deposits remain unchanged.  The 
maximum interest rate is 15.5 percent for 4 year term deposits. 
(Prague DENNI TELEGRAF in Czech 3 Dec 93 p 6 AU) 

   DOMESTIC FIRM OUTBIDS FOREIGN CONSORTIUM:  The Pragomilk company, 
set up by two Czech businessmen (Benacek and Hladky) won the public 
tender for 51 percent of the shares of Pragolaktos, one of the 
largest and strategically most important dairy plants in the Czech 
Republic.  Pragomilk offered to pay Kc436 million for the shares and 
to invest another Kc250 million in Pragolaktos over the next three 
years.  It outbid an international consortium comprising Unilever 
and the Austrian AMF company, which was willing to pay only Kc25O 
million for the shares.  Some 21 percent of Pragolaktos shares will 
be offered to investors in the second wave of coupon privatization. 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 4 Dec 93 p 14 AU) 
   CHANGING STRUCTURE OF LABOR FORCE:  At the end of the third 
quarter (30 September 1993), 34.8 percent of the labor force was 
employed in industry (compared with 38.9 percent in 1989), 7.2 
percent in agriculture (11.6 percent), and 49.3 percent in services 
(41.7 percent).  The structure of employment has thus moved closer 
to that common in advanced Western countries.  (Prague DENNI 
TELEGRAF in Czech 7 Dec 93 p 6 AU) 

   STEEL INDUSTRY REMAINS PROFITABLE:  Speaking at a news conference 
in Ostrava on 6 December, Minister of Trade and Industry Vladimir 
Dlouhy conceded that continuous casting was a condition for Czech 
metallurgy to stay internationally competitive, but ruled out that 
the Czech Government would take over loan guarantees for all three 
north Moravian steel mills (Vitkovice, Trinec, Ostrava) that plan to 
build continuous casting units.  Dlouhy said that a "certain 
selection" was necessary and that one of the three companies would 
not receive a government guarantee.  He added that the modernization 
of the steel industry would have to be completed as soon as possible 
because the Czech Republic's current comparative advantages, 
stemming from cheap labor, would disappear within three to four 
years.  The minister noted that a reduction in profits from 
metallurgical production was becoming apparent already.  In 1991 
profits amounted to 4.9 billion korunas; this year they are expected 
to reach Kc3 billion.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF in Czech 7 Dec 93 p 6 
AU) 

   FOREIGN ENVIRONMENTAL AID CRITICIZED:  The Czech Government 
assesses the program of financial aid that has been thus far 
provided by foreign institutions for environment protection very 
critically, as the majority of these programs failed to fulfill 
expectations, Czech Environment Minister Frantisek Benda told 
journalists on 7 December.  He said the Czech Republic would 
continue to accept foreign aid only if it is provided in a different 
form.  This primarily concerns PHARE, the program of assistance to 
Eastern and Central European Countries, which he said should 
concentrate more on specific investment programs.  Financial aid 
provided on the level of partnership contacts between Czech industry 
and foreign partners, he said, is aimed at enforcing some foreign 
technologies in the Czech Republic which can only with difficulty be 
applied in advanced countries. 

   The basic problem is that the majority of foreign investment 
programs do not offer an investment model acceptable to the Czech 
Republic, they exercise pressure on the Czech Government in trying 
to receive state guarantees for each large investment, Benda said, 
adding that this is unacceptable as the state "does not have so many 
resources."  Due to this, those partners who offer more advantageous 
models of financing which do not require state guarantees have 
bigger success in the foreign aid programs.  Deputy Environment 
Minister Vladislav Bizek said that 20,000,000 ECU (European Currency 
Units) has been provided to the Czech Republic through the PHARE 
program, 75 percent of which has gone to material aid, for example 
to equipping laboratories and preparing some project documentation 
for investment.  However, in some cases financial resources have 
been spent on "monster plans" which merely indicate the state of the 
Czech environment.  Bizek said that the ministry was preparing the 
Banking Fund for Environment and that a bank is currently being 
chosen which would manage the financial resources obtained from 
foreign aid.  (Prague CTK in English 7 Dec 93 AU) 

   SALE OF BREWERY SHARES TO BRITISH COMPANY APPROVED:  The annual 
meeting of shareholders of the Prazske Pivovary (Prague Breweries, 
PP) AS, held in Prague on 7 December, approved the sale of 34 
percent of the company's shares to the Bass PLC, the largest British 
brewery company, for Kc396 million.  The British company will also 
obtain the exclusive right to market PP beer outside Central Europe. 
As its first activity, Bass will introduce the "Staropramen" brand, 
under the name "Prague Lager," in its own network of pubs.  The 
British partner was selected out of 38 contenders, mainly because of 
its marketing expertise and its distribution network in Great 
Britain and other countries.  Bass intends to invest 50 million 
British pounds in PP's production and distribution network over the 
next 5 years.  PP's Prague management will also be reinforced by six 
British executives.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 8 Dec 93 p 
2; Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 8 Dec 93 p 14 AU) 

   U.S. FIRM LEASES TEXTILE FACTORY:  The U.S. Anvil company has 
leased on a long-term basis the Miletin plant of the Tiba Dvur 
Kralove textile company where it will produce 16,000 cotton T-shirts 
a week for the Czech market.  The equipment has been supplied by the 
Japanese Juki company.  In the first stage, the plant will employ 
200 people.  Eventually, it will employ 375 people and double its 
production capacity.  The U.S. company intends to invest Kc40-60 
million in the company.  The first stage of the plant's 
reconstruction, which cost Kc18 million, has just been completed. 
(Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 8 Dec 93 p 7 AU) 

   SALARY INCREASE FOR GOVERNMENT OFFICIALS, LEGISLATORS:  At its 
meeting on 7 December, the Chamber of Deputies decided to raise the 
salaries of all constitutional officials, with the exception of the 
president, 24 percent as of 1 January 1994.  The chairman of the 
Chamber of Deputies and the prime minister will both receive a 
monthly salary of Kc38,500, Kc7,500 more than they get now.  The 
basic salary of parliamentary deputies will be raised from Kc13,000 
to Kc16,0O0.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 8 Dec 93 p 1 AU) 

   MOST LEVI'S SOLD IN COUNTRY FAKE:  Fake Levi's jeans are among 
the most frequently sold imitations of world-known brand products in 
the Czech Republic.  According to the results of an inquiry carried 
out by the Czech Trade Inspection Authority (COI), nine out of ten 
Levi's 501 bought by the COI in shops in the Czech Republic were 
fake.  The imitations cost between Kc400 and Kc990, while the only 
original Levi's 501 cost Kc1,800.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in 
Czech 8 Dec 93 p 3 AU) 

   AGRICULTURE SECTOR LOSING MONEY:  State farms will end this 
economic year with a loss of Kc8,500 per hectare, cooperatives with 
a loss of Kc1,050 per hectare, and private farmers with a loss of 
Kc157 per hectare.  This prognosis was presented by J. Netik, 
president of the Agrarian Chamber of the Czech Republic, at a 
seminar held at the Prague Agricultural College on 7 December. 
Agriculture Minister Josef Lux, who also addressed the seminar, said 
that it was the government's responsibility to guarantee at least 
"minimum profit" for the best and average-performing agricultural 
enterprises.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 8 Dec 93 p 14 AU) 

   ELECTRICITY FROM WIND POWER:  The Institute of the Physics of the 
Atmosphere of the Czech Academy of Sciences estimates that about 
three percent of the Czech Republic's electricity could be generated 
by wind-power plants.  The turbines would have to be erected in 
altitudes above 700 meters, however, where current regulations 
mostly prohibit any construction activity for environmental reasons. 
The institute has built an experimental wind-power plant in the 
Krusne Hory (Ore Mountains) and will monitor its environmental 
impact over the next four years.  According to Josef Stekl, the 
institute's director, the development of this source of energy is 
hindered by the "financial diktat" of the CEZ (Czech Power- 
Generating Works) company, the monopoly distributor of electricity, 
which procures electricity from small producers at one-third of the 
consumer price.  As a result, it takes 16 years for the builder of a 
wind-power plant to recoup his investment.  Wind-power generators 
who consume this electricity themselves recover their costs in one- 
third of the time.  (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY in Czech 8 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   MORE LAND SOWN WITH GRAIN:  The growing procurement prices of 
cereals have prompted Czech farmers to increase the area sown with 
grain crops.  Winter wheat had been grown on 754,802 hectares this 
year (20,161 hectares more than in 1992), rye on 66,976 hectares 
(increase of 1,471 hectares), and spring barley on 443,652 hectares 
(compared with 438,406 hectares last year).  Between 1989 and 
October 1993, the price of alimentary wheat increased 49.5 percent, 
the price of feed wheat 55 percent, the price of malt barley 29.3 
percent, and the price of feed barley 54.7 percent.  (Prague MLADA 
FRONTA DNES in Czech 9 Dec 93 p 14 AU) 

   CHANGING STRUCTURE OF INDUSTRY:  The average number of employees 
in Czech industrial enterprises decreased from 922 in 1989 to 467 at 
the end of September 1993.  In the same period, the number of 
industrial enterprises employing more than 2,000 people dropped from 
199 to 134 and the number of industrial enterprises employing 
between 1,000 and 1,999 people from 283 to 177.  There were 3,041 
industrial enterprises with more than 25 employees in the Czech 
Republic at the end of September 1993.  (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY 
FINANCNI NOVINY in Czech 9 Dec 93 p 9 AU) 

   GOVERNMENT APPROVES BILL ON REDRESS OF PROPERTY WRONGS:  On 8 
December, the government approved a bill on redress in cases of 
injustices regarding property, deciding to extend the time-limit for 
dealing with redress claims from one year to three.  The bill is 
designed to bring the legal norm more into line with the practical 
state of affairs concerning the speed with which property redress 
claims can be dealt with.  The present law gives the Privatization 
Ministry a year and the Finance Ministry six months to deal with 
claims, Government Spokesman Klara Pospisilova said.  Premier Vaclav 
Klaus told journalists that the government had also approved a bill 
by which ten percent would be added to property reimbursements for 
every year from the end of the time-limit until the claim was dealt 
with.  (Prague CTK in English 8 Dec 93 AU) 

   BORDER-CROSSING DELAYS HINDER CZECH-SLOVAK TRADE:  Long lines of 
trucks at Czech-Slovak border crossings are slowing down trade 
between the two countries, the general director of the Czech 
Confederation of Industry (SP CR), Bretislav Ostadal, said on 9 
December.  Representatives of Czech and Slovak entrepreneurial 
unions decided at a meeting at the end of November they would fight 
for the establishment of "green" lanes for Czech and Slovak freight 
transport.  This would mean that two of the eight border crossings 
would be reserved for freight transport between the Czech Republic 
and Slovakia.  Ostadal stated that the Czech and Slovak 
entrepreneurial unions think that the government should not require 
value-added tax amounts to be deposited at border crossings, as is 
the current practice.  Businessmen from both countries say they are 
providing credit to the state budget for 35 to 40 days while waiting 
for administrators to return the sum due to them.  (Prague CTK in 
English 9 Dec 93 AU) 

   IMPORTED HEATING OIL SOLD AS DIESEL FUEL:  It is the country's 
biggest tax evasion scandal since the fall of communism and yet it 
is scarcely reported by the media, Istvan Leko wrote in a commentary 
in the independent LIDOVE NOVINY on 9 December.  He was referring to 
the crooked business of importing heating oil and selling it as 
diesel oil.  Traders in "dirty oil" -- so called because of the 
pollutant fumes produced -- deprived the Czech Treasury of between 
three and five billion korunas (about $100 to $170 million) in the 
first eight months of this year alone.  The relevant ministries, the 
state-owned oil company Benzina, and Czech refineries have known 
about the swindle for almost a year but, Leko wrote, the police only 
started to investigate the matter deeply a few weeks ago. 
Television is silent on the story. 

   Trading in dirty oil is perhaps the most profitable illegal 
business in the Czech Republic, safer than sex or drugs, Leko wrote. 
One 50-ton tank can sell for Kc300,000 (around $10,000).  The crooks 
are hard to detect.  They are professionals.  They know all the 
loopholes in the law, many such firms are run by former refinery 
executives and one-time high-ranking state officials, whose 
erstwhile subordinates at the ministry are now tackling the problems 
of diesel.  A tradesman selling dirty oil does not have to pay 
consumer tax on heating oil and only has to pay five percent VAT 
instead of the usual 23 percent, and thus can undercut distributors 
of genuine diesel.  Running an engine on dirty oil may be cheaper 
but it destroys the fuel injection system and valves in the engine. 
What is more, the exhaust fumes contain several times the amount of 
sulfur permitted by the Ministry of Transport. 

   Agricultural workers, building firms and a range of other 
companies buy the dirty oil because they can get it for Kc11 while 
real diesel costs Kc15.70.  Their invoices show that they bought the 
heating oil and diesel separately, but they know their vehicles can 
easily run on a mixture.  If need be they can claim to have used the 
heating oil for the drying of grain or hops.  The tax evasion is 
virtually undetectable.  All three Czech refineries have pledged to 
use an invisible marking dye made by BASF to distinguish between 
heating oil and diesel.  The process is expensive and no law obliges 
them to do it.  But they cannot stand by and watch sales dwindle 
further (since 1990 they have fallen by 65 percent).  As yet no law 
exists to punish the petroleum swindlers and deputies are unable to 
say when such a bill might be debated.  If the police, ministries 
and members of parliament had waken up earlier, if they had made use 
of the experience of the legislatures of Western countries or even 
Visegrad countries (in Hungary, for example, legal action is already 
being taken against oil swindlers), the state would not have had to 
lose a sum which could have covered the costs of unemployment 
benefit for a whole year, Leko wrote.  (Prague CTK in English 9 Dec 
93 AU) 

   MOST CZECHS OPTIMISTIC ABOUT ECONOMY IN 1994:  Forty-one percent 
of Czechs do not think that any essential changes occurred in the 
development of the Czech economy in the past year, according to a 
poll conducted by ECOMA agency within an international Eco Monitor 
93 project among 410 people in November.  Over 24 percent of those 
polled considered that the Czech Republic's economic situation 
better, almost 28 percent said they believed it was worse, and 7 
percent said they did not know.  The poll showed that the Czechs 
were optimistic regarding the developments in 1994.  Over 33 percent 
of them said they expected the economy to improve in the next year. 
Over 35 percent believe the development will remain unchanged, and 
almost 21 percent said they expected the economy's decline. 
Positive developments are expected mainly by younger citizens (aged 
between 18-34), while big cities' residents said future developments 
worried them.  (Prague CTK in English 9 Dec 93 AU) 

   HUNGARY 

   TELECOMMUNICATIONS COMPANY PRIVATIZED:  Magyarcom, a German-US 
consortium comprising Deutsche Bundespost Telecom and Ameritech 
International, has acquired a 30-percent-plus stake in the Hungarian 
Telecommunications Company (MATAV RT).  The relevant agreement was 
signed by the three firms and the Hungarian State Holding Company 
(AV RT).  Magyarcom's bid for the stake in MATAV was $875 million. 
Of this sum paid on a half-and-half basis by the two members of the 
consortium, $400 million will go on an equity raise.  The deal has 
so far been the biggest one in the privatization process, and the 
price paid by Magyarcom makes up more than half of the revenue from 
privatization this year.  At present, Magyarcom has a 30.2-percent 
stake in MATAV,- -and the -International-- Finance Corporation and 
the European Bank for Reconstruction and Development together just 
under 10 percent.  The remaining shares are in the hands of AV RT, 
representing the Hungarian state.  The equity rise will make it 
possible for the company to expand the telecommunications network by 
15.5 percent in each of the next six years.  Due to the deal, the 
company will be able to meet 90 percent of demand for telephone 
lines within six months.  Magyarcom agreed to invest almost $4 
billion in developing Hungary's telecommunications network by the 
end of the century.  (Budapest MTI in English 0714 GMT 23 Dec 93 AU) 

   OPEL TIGRA TO USE ENGINES MADE IN SZENTGOTTHARD:  GM's new Opel 
Tigra, which is to go into full production at the end of 1994, will 
be equipped with engines manufactured at GM's factory in 
Szentgotthard, in western Hungary.  The Tigra will be fitted with 
the same 1.6 liter, 16-valve, engines as Opel Corsa GSIS.  These 
engines accounted for 8,900 of the 70,395 units manufactured by 
General Motors Hungary in 1993.  (Budapest MTI in English 1427 GMT 
28 Dec 93 AU) 

   IKARUS' POSITION STABILIZES:  As a result of its 1993 crisis 
management program the position of bus manufacturer Ikarus RT has 
stabilized.  Although this year Ikarus is to manufacture 3,000 
buses, as compared to 4,000 last year and an annual average of 12- 
14,000 in the 1980's, the company will close the 1993 business year 
without a loss.  In 1992 the company made an undisclosed loss on 
revenues of 23 billion forints.  (Budapest MTI in English 1420 GMT 
28 Dec 93 AU) 

   ECONOMIC NEWS IN BRIEF:  The European Investment Bank (EIB) will 
grant Hungary a 72 million ECU loan to reconstruct roads and 
bridges.  The cost of projects financed from the loan will total ECU 
151 million. 

   In the first eleven months of this year, the State Property 
Agency (AVU) received 56.99 billion forints ($0.56 billion) from 
privatization.  Almost half of this sum was paid in cash.  The AVU 
collected the equivalent of 14.48 billion forints in foreign 
currency.  Last year, the AVU's intake totalled 74.56 billion 
forints. 

   The Ministry of International Economic Relations will set next 
year's quota for the import of consumer goods at 750 million 
forints, the same as this year.  The sum will probably be 
sufficient, although applications for import licenses exceeded the 
quota this year, the amount of consumer goods actually imported 
stood at 60 percent of the quota.  (Budapest MTI in English 1808 GMT 
22 Dec 93 AU) 

   GAMBLING FIRMS TO USE HIGH TECHNOLOGY:  A satellite data 
transmission and computer control system, enabling gamblers to bet 
even an hour before the draw, has been established in Hungary.  The 
system transmits lottery and football.  The system, using American 
AT and Tridom equipment, was developed and installed by the 
Hungarian Montana Telecom company.  Gambling Inc. has put into 
operation 3,750 electromechanical stamping machines made by the 
Swedish Essnet company, used for receiving and validating lottery 
tickets.  Codes for the tickets are transmitted to the Budapest 
center, put on micro-film, and locked away.  Until the new system is 
completely introduced, it will run in parallel with the old, manual 
system.  The new system is said to exclude the chance of 
manipulation and fraud.  The only chance of error stems precisely 
from the accuracy of modern technology: If betters fail to mark 
their bets unambiguously or use, for instance, green ink, the new 
system automatically invalidates their tickets.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 1348 GMT 23 Dec 93 AU) 

   NEW BRITISH AIRWAYS FLIGHT HURTS MALEV:  The Hungarian 
authorities' decision to license British Airways' new flight between 
Budapest and London may cause a loss of 60 million forints to the 
Hungarian airline company MALEV RT. over the next six months.  MALEV 
was shocked to learn about the decision because the Hungarian- 
British air agreement stipulates that new flights can only be 
launched with mutual consent.  The company has now asked the 
minister of transport to revise the decision.  The new flight, 
licensed for half a year, will take off from London airport 45 
minutes before MALEV's.  The measure hits MALEV particularly hard 
since the company took out a loan to purchase two Boeing-767's 
earlier this year, and the operation of these aircraft on the 
Budapest-Rome-New York route caused a loss of about $2 million in 
half a year.  In a bid to reduce costs, MALEV is considering leasing 
out the two aircraft, or looking for a new partner to operate direct 
flights between Budapest and New York.  Thirty-five percent of MALEV 
shares are held by the Italian airline company Alitalia.  (Budapest 
MTI in English 1129 GMT 28 Dec 93 AU) 

   DIRECT FLIGHTS BETWEEN BUDAPEST, BANGKOK:  The first direct 
flight between Budapest and the Thai capital, Bangkok, will take off 
from Budapest on 28 December.  A Boeing 767 intercontinental 
passenger aircraft owned by the Hungarian airline MALEV, will be 
used by a travel agency for the first charter flight, carrying 193 
passengers.  Eleven charter flights are scheduled, making the 
10,000-kilometer trip without stopovers.  (Budapest MTI in English 
1811 GMT 27 Dec 93 AU) 

   PRIVATE SAVINGS IN FOREIGN CURRENCY EXCEED $2 BILLION:  In 
November this year the forint equivalent of private savings deposits 
in foreign currency grew by 2.4 billion forints to exceed 200 
billion forints for the first time, according to the Hungarian 
National Bank.  On November 30, the value of such savings deposits 
was 200.7 billion forints, or $2 billion.  Accounting in 
conversions, 31.7 billion forints was deposited and 29.4 billion 
forints recently withdrawn.  This year private savings in foreign 
currency increased by nearly 50 billion forints, half of which 
stemmed from the 15-percent devaluation of Hungary's currency. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1250 GMT 27 Dec 93 AU) 

   PARLIAMENT AMENDS CENTRAL BANK LAW:  Finance Minister Ivan Szabo 
said that an amendment to the 1991 Law on the Hungarian National 
Bank (MNB) was necessary since its deadline for narrowing the 
central bank's commercial activities has now expired.  The central 
bank can no longer keep the cash accounts of insurance companies and 
broking firms, and cannot force economic societies to keep their 
accounts with the MNB.  At the same time, the proposal provides 
another two-year extension to the MNB to market its shares in 
certain economic partnerships.  State debt rules change.  The budget 
will pay interest on its interest-bearing debts to the central bank 
at the average interest rate on the MNB's gross foreign debts plus 1 
percent.  Also the central bank will transform at least an annual 5 
percent of the gross state debt not bearing interest into interest- 
bearing state securities.  This debt would be further reduced by the 
value of central bank loans for privatization.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 1800 GMT 22 Dec 93 AU) 

   AVU CHIEF SEES PRIVATIZATION COMPLETION BY END OF 1994:  Top 
State Property Agency (AVU) official Lajos Csepi said that 
privatization of state-owned assets under temporary state ownership 
could be concluded by the end of 1994, provided bids are invited by 
the middle of the following year.  According to AVU data, 
productivity of converted companies was 20-25 percent higher this 
year than that of state-owned companies, while privatized companies 
increased their assets by 1-1.2 percent and state-owned economic 
organizations suffered a 20-percent loss of assets.  Of the 580 
companies still owned by the state, 284 are currently being 
liquidated, 82 are being wound up, and 32 are undergoing bankruptcy 
proceedings.  Domestic investors accounted for 70 percent of AVU 
privatization revenues this year, compared to 40 percent in 1992 and 
only 20 percent in 1991.  Latest AVU figures put AVU privatization 
revenues at 56.99 billion forints up to the end of November, 30.37 
billion forints of which were cash payments, with 14.48 billion 
forints in foreign exchange.  (Budapest MTI in English 1247 GMT 27 
Dec 93 AU) 

   PRICE OF GASOLINE TO DROP, DIESEL TO RISE:  The price of gasoline 
will be reduced by 0.5 forints per liter at MOL Co. filling stations 
from January 3.  However, diesel prices will rise.   Diesel and 
industrial fuel oil will go up by two forints per liter, household 
heating oil by one forint.  Accordingly, 91 and 95 octane unleaded 
gasoline at the AFOR stations will cost 73 and 75 forints, 
respectively.  Leaded 92 octane gasoline will cost 75.50 forints per 
liter, 98 octane will cost 78 forints, Diesel 65 forints, and 
household heating oil 26 forints, starting January 3.  About one- 
third of the filling stations in Hungary are owned by MOL Co.  The 
rest are operated by Hungarian private entrepreneurs, Hungarian- 
foreign joint entrepreneurs, and foreign oil companies.  On past 
years' experience they will all follow the price policy of MOL. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1720 GMT 27 Dec 93 AU) 

   NOVEMBER UNEMPLOYMENT:  The number of registered unemployed fell 
to 635,000 in November, 70,000 down from the maximum rate this 
decade -- recorded in February 1993.  The Central Statistical Office 
recently released this year's unemployment data.  Detailed analyses 
reveal that from January to late November of this year, 282,000 
jobless people ceased to be registered and eligible for unemployment 
benefits.  These people can now apply for a social allowance from 
the local authorities.  In November, there were 61,300 registered 
job openings in the country, nine for every 100 unemployed.  In 
Borsod-Abauj-Zemplen, Heves, and Somogy counties, the ratio of job 
openings to jobseekers was hardly more than three jobs to every 100, 
whereas Budapest had the highest rate, with 20 per 100.  In 
November, 30,000 vacancies were filled.  (Budapest MTI in English 
1025 GMT  28 Dec 93 AU) 

   INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVING STEADILY:  Central Statistical Office 
figures show total investment in 1993 matching 1992, but the ratio 
of infrastructure-related investment rising within this.  Of the 
242.6 billion forints invested in the first three-quarters of 1993, 
transport, post, and telecommunications, and electricity and water 
investment shared 37 percent of the full amount.  There are an 
average of 33.2 kilometers of roads per 100 square kilometers.  The 
water conduit network in 1992 was more than 55,000 kilometers:  Over 
4,000 kilometers of the network was built in the last four years. 
Piped drinking water goes to 89 percent of villages.  Three-quarters 
of homes, about 3 million homes, are linked to the public utility 
network.  The public utility sewage network in 1992 extended to 
16,000 kilometers.  Homes linked to the public sewage system rose 
from 1.6 to 1.7 million over the past three years.  This means that 
43 percent of homes are linked to the sewage system.  Piped gas was 
available in 589 villages last year, 172 of which joined the network 
after 1989.  At the end of 1992, the network covered about 30,000 
kilometers, and was linked to 1.8 million households.  Telephone 
access has gone up by 18 percent in four years, with 20 telephones 
per 100 residents at the end of 1992.  There were 40 percent more 
main lines than in 1989, 1.3 million, nationwide.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 1639 GMT 28 Dec 93 AU) 

   REGIONAL ECONOMIC DISPARITIES:  The widening gap in prosperity 
between Hungary's various regions is becoming a significant problem 
in the country's economic development.  Sociologists are concerned 
about the long-term effects of regional economic disparities on the 
population.  Internal migration has already begun, with unemployed 
skilled workers from the less advanced regions in eastern Hungary 
moving to find work in the western regions.  Experts say northwest 
Hungary has the most advanced infrastructure and economic and 
intellectual capacities, while the northeast is the most 
undeveloped.  The remaining 50 percent of the country lags behind 
the western part only in terms of infrastructure. 

   Regional inequalities in Hungary have geographical, economic and 
political causes.  Under the old regime, the state tried to 
artificially balance regional development.  Still, the western 
region that borders Austria experienced higher rates of 
infrastructure development.  About three-quarters of the country's 
international road, railway, and river freight transport passes 
through this region.  (A total of 9 million passengers and 8 million 
tons of freight were transported by the international railway line 
in northwestern Hungary this year.)  A high-standard service and 
tourism industry has also sprung up around this international 
traffic junction.  About 70-80 percent of foreign investments in 
Hungary -- and every eighth venture in East Central Europe involving 
foreign capital -- have been in this region.  The largest ones are 
the Audi engine factory under construction in Gyor and the general 
motors Opel car factory in Szentgotthard. 

   The effect of this has been the emergence of a prosperous, 
specialized labor and management force in the region.  Experts 
believe northwest Hungary continues to be an ideal investment area 
for westerners due to a skilled, inexpensive and easily retrainable 
workforce, an advanced infrastructure, and close proximity to 
Western Europe.  To further this, work has begun on the Vienna- 
Budapest motorway project and an airport in Szombathely, a regional 
center.  Urban sociologists say that the area bordered by the Danube 
and the Tisza -- comprising 50 percent of the country's territory -- 
is on an equal level with the northwest socially and economically. 
There are several important urban centers in this area possessing 
scientific and intellectual bases springing from university 
traditions i.e. Budapest, Pecs (southwest Hungary), Szeged 
(southeast), and Debrecen (east Hungary).  However, only Budapest's 
infrastructure can compete with the northwest. 

   Northeast Hungary is presently the most underdeveloped region, 
with unemployment rates of about twice the national average of 12.6 
percent.  The main reason for this is a major decline in local 
heavy-industry production over the past years and an underdeveloped 
infrastructure, such as a tiny, poor-quality telephone network. 
This is the greatest obstacle to the new job-creating investments. 

   The government and local authorities recognize the danger of this 
inequality between the regions and have taken various steps to 
rectify the situation.  A survey of 3,200 Hungarian villages has 
been carried out to find out which are most in need of state 
subsidies earmarked for job-creation and infrastructure development 
projects.  According to the Central Statistical Office, one-third of 
the villages need assistance.  In response, the Regional Development 
Council was set up in east Hungary.  EC countries recently awarded 
the council ECU 2 million for development projects.  (Budapest MTI 
in English 0840 GMT 27 Dec 93 AU) 

   CONSUMER PRICES RISE 0.7 PERCENT IN NOVEMBER:  Consumer prices 
rose by 0.7 percent in November compared with the previous month, 
the Central Statistical Office (KSH) reported.  Monthly consumer 
price inflation was 1.7 percent in October and 2.9 percent in 
September.  Consumer price inflation for the 12 months to the end of 
November stood at 21 percent (22 percent at the end of October), 
while average consumer prices for the 11 months were 22.6 percent up 
on the January-November period of last year.  Average consumer 
prices for January-October 1993 were 22.8 percent higher than over 
the same period of last year. 

   KSH figures for November consumer price increases: 
BOT 
   (December, 1992: 100)                 Change (Percent) 
Item                                        in 1 Month  in 12 Months 
Foodstuffs                122.2                0.6       24.5 
Alcoholic Beverages, 
  Tobacco                 117.5                0.5       17.9 
Clothing                  114.8                1.3       16.4 
Consumer Durables         109.5                0.9       10.5 
Household Energy          113.4                0.9       14.0 
Other Industrial 
 Articles, Fuels          118.4                1.2       20.8 
Services                  125.6                0.4       26.5 
Total                     119.5                0.7       21.0 
(Budapest MTI in English 1527 GMT  15 Dec 93 AU) 
EOT 

   GATT TALKS RESULTS SEEN AS FAVORABLE:  All in all, the results of 
the GATT talks, which ended on December 15, are favorable for 
Hungary, according to a report by the International Economic 
Relations Ministry.  According to the report, the creation of 
effective international discipline means protection for smaller 
countries dependent upon external economic ties against 
protectionist measures taken by their partners.  Clearing some of 
the obstacles from the way of international trade, especially 
curbing the export subsidies competition in agricultural trade, 
helps expand world trade and has a favorable effect on Hungary's 
export opportunities.  According to reliable estimates, implementing 
the results of the Uruguay Round will increase the size of 
international trade in goods and services by over $200 billion. 
Good international trade conditions are of the utmost importance for 
Hungary to succeed in creating a market-oriented economy, the 
ministry's report says. 

   Under the decision made at the Uruguay Round of the GATT talks, 
the sides are to submit the package of agreements to their 
authorities to make the decisions necessary for the final approval 
of the results, in line with regulations of the countries concerned. 
In the talks, Hungary sought to attain a package of agreements to 
increase the country's chances of gaining access to markets, to 
improve export conditions, and to make international trade 
regulations more predictable.  It also wanted the agreements to 
reflect Hungary's specific situation, stemming from a radical 
economic restructuring, and the country's interests and 
possibilities to accept obligations.  Hungary attaches great 
importance to the agricultural agreement, which amends the 
complicated system of import regulations on significant markets, and 
improves the chances for Hungary's agricultural exports. 

   When the agreement takes effect, all signatories are to dismantle 
non-customs import restrictions, turning them into customs duties, 
which, in turn, are to be gradually reduced in six years.  In 
Hungary's import regulations, the average level of customs duties on 
agricultural products is to double, which, along with other 
mechanisms, will offer appropriate protection against import 
competition.  In the industrial sector, the agreement envisages an 
approximately 30-percent reduction of customs duties over five 
years.  Hungary undertook an obligation of a 28-percent reduction 
only.  "Hungary's active participation at the Uruguay Round and the 
results of the talks are in line with our endeavors to integrate 
Hungary's economy into the world economy," the ministry's report 
reads.  (Budapest MTI in English 0803 GMT 17 Dec 93 AU) 

   SHELL INVESTMENTS, OPERATIONS:  Shell and Interag Kf t (Ltd) will 
convert into a Shareholders' Company (RT) named Shell Hungary Rt as 
of January 1 next year.  The company will have registered capital of 
2.911 billion forints.  Royal Dutch/Shell has been the sole owner of 
the Kf t since it bought out Interag's minority stake in May. 
Shell's 87 filling stations in Hungary give it a 22 percent market 
share.  Shell invested about 4 billion forints in Hungary in 1992 
and 1993 and doubled the number of its filling stations over four 
years.  Shell and Interag Kf t expect turnover this year of around 
31 billion forints and after-tax profits of 650 million forints. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1722 GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   HOLDING COMPANY TO DIRECT ALL IBUSZ FOREIGN OPERATIONS:  At the 
beginning of next year IBUSZ will establish a 100-percent-owned 
holding company, IBUSZ International, based in Vienna, to direct all 
the travel company's foreign operations.  IBUSZ International will 
take over from IBUSZ Rt in Budapest direct control of the 10 100- 
percent-owned foreign IBUSZ subsidiaries, probably from next 
February.  These 10, based in Austria, the Czech Republic, Slovakia, 
France, Germany, Britain, Poland, Sweden, Switzerland, and the 
United States, have a combined registered capital of under 100 
million forints and will see a combined turnover of 2 billion 
forints this year, 75 percent of which will come from services 
connected with Hungary.  IBUSZ international foresees similar 
turnover from Hungary-oriented services in 1994, while it expects 
significant expansion in its international activities. 

   The restucturing aimed at developing IBUSZ's foreign operations 
into an international agency network with extensive and diversified 
regional and local services throughout Central Europe.  As a result 
of the move, which will involve significant cost-cutting, IBUSZ's 
foreign operations are planned to break even in 1994 and may be in 
profit from 1995 on.  1993 is expected to see combined losses in 
excess of 100 million forints.  Some of IBUSZ's foreign 
subsidiaries, especially those in Austria and Germany, have become 
loss-making during the last two and a half years due to political 
and market changes.  IBUSZ Rt would have to inject some capital into 
setting up the new holding, the initial equity of which is yet to be 
decided.  Besides writing off part of the subsidiaries' losses, the 
parent company will also increase their low registered capital to 
strengthen their capital base and make future expansion possible. 
(Budapest MTI in English 0934 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   COLGATE-PALMOLIVE BUYS STAKE IN FABULON KFT:  Colgate-Palmolive 
Magyarorszag Termelo Kft (Ltd) has purchased the majority of the 
assets of Fabulon RG Kozmetikai Kf t from Richter Gedeon Vegyeszeti 
Gyar Rt (Richter Gedeon Chemical Works).  In July this year, Richter 
Gedeon established Fabulon Kozmetikai Kft as a subsidiary with a 
capital of 158 million forints.  The Kft, which makes the Fabulon, 
Fabulissimo, and Richtofit ranges of products, accounts for 1.5 to 2 
percent of Richter Gedeon's annual turnover.  Under a tender invited 
in September, bidders could bid for a majority stake in Fabulon Kft 
or could acquire a controlling stake through an equity increase. 
The tender attracted two bids but was declared unsuccessful. 
Earlier, Colgate-Palmolive bid unsuccessfully for the first 
privatization tender of Caola Kozmetikai Rt, which has a registered 
capital of 1.8 billion forints.  Gedeon Richter had net sales of 8.9 
billion forints in the first six months of this year.  (Budapest MTI 
in English 0752 GMT 22 Dec 93 AU) 

   EBRD SUBSCRIBES TO NEWLY ISSUED EGIS SHARES:  The newly issued 
shares of the pharmaceutical company EGIS with a nominal value of 
2.336 billion forints have been subscribed by the European Bank for 
Reconstruction and Development (EBRD), bringing the latter's stake 
to 30.003 percent.  The new share issue, which follows a decision to 
raise the company's equity made at a general meeting on November 27, 
brings the company's registered capital to 5.45 billion forints.  30 
percent of the shares will be introduced onto the Budapest Stock 
Exchange and a further 10-15 percent will be offered for open sale. 
The EBRD subsription will entitle EGIS to a 10-year tax concession 
of 100 percent in the first five years and 60 percent in the 
following five years. 

   EGIS expects net sales this year of 12.7 billion forints, 1 
million forints more than in 1992.  Pre-tax profits, however, are 
likely to be similar to last year's 1.4 billion forints.  First-half 
net sales this year were 5.84 billion forints, with pre-tax profits 
of 874 million forints.  Domestic sales are expected to be 7 billion 
forints this year, 1.5 billion forints up on last year.  Exports to 
ex-socialist countries are expected to be worth $30 million, the 
same as in 1992, while deliveries to western countries are expected 
to fall by $10 million to $32 million following the company's 
decision to discontinue exports of certain products.  EGIS expects 
turnover to grow further next year, and while it will continue to 
export to some 60 countries, the company expects future growth to 
come mainly from domestic sales.  The company's export policy is to 
maintain its Eastern European markets and to shift from basic 
materials to packaged medicines on Western markets.  At present, 
basic materials account for 75 percent of exports to Western 
countries.  (Budapest MTI in English 0758 GMT 22 Dec 93 AU) 

   ECONOMIC TALKS WITH RUSSIA:  Minister of International Economic 
Relations Bela Kadar and Russian Minister of External Economic 
Relations Oleg Davidov held talks on ways for Russia to repay its 
debts to Hungary.  As Hungary is a major importer of Russian crude 
and natural gas, the ministers surveyed how Hungary could increase 
its sales of oil and gas industry equipment to Russia.  They agreed 
that both governments should facilitate Hungarian and Russian 
investment in each other's countries.  (Budapest MTI in English 1520 
GMT 18 Dec 93 AU) 

   EXPORTS TO DETERMINE ECONOMIC GROWTH, BANK OFFICIAL SAYS:  Next 
year's economic growth will be determined by the extent of export 
expansion.  If only domestic consumption expands, import will 
inevitably grow causing a further deterioration in the balance of 
payments and increase in debt, said Hungarian National Bank (MNB) 
Deputy Chairman Almos Kovacs.  For increasing exports, entrepreneurs 
should receive loans under more favorable terms.  The level of 
interests should be reduced.  The wide gap between interests on 
deposits and on loans may be expected to narrow owing to credit and 
debtor consolidation.  This measure, however, will only be effective 
if no more bad debts pile up at banks.  Banks, therefore, should 
feel that a fresh growth of bad debts may have unfavorable 
consequences.  Currently, the repayment of 300 billion forints of 
the 800 billion forints credit placed out at companies is doubtful. 
The privatization of banks may also help improve their situation. 
The fear that Hungarian owners may become the minority in the 
banking sphere is outdated.  Capital is becoming international 
everywhere and this does not pose any danger for Hungary, either. 
Foreign owners with sizeable capital may help the banks a lot. 
Budapest MTI in English 1815 GMT 19 Dec 93 AU) 

   MNB DECIDES ON STRICT MONETARY POLICY FOR 1994:  The central bank 
has set improving the country's external balances and reducing 
inflation as the most important goals in its monetary policy for 
next year.  To ensure a basis for steady economic growth, the first 
goal will be given priority, the Central Bank Council announced. 
The Council approved the 1994 monetary policy guidelines.  The 
Central Bank Council says it is extremely important to halt the rise 
in the country's external debt, since the longer it continues to 
increase, the more serious the measures that will have to be taken 
to reverse the trend.  The guidelines say that is why Hungary's 
balance of payments must be improved significantly, to the point 
where the current account deficit for next year does not exceed $1.5 
to 2 billion.  The national bank is calculating on an inflow of $1.5 
billion in working capital next year. 

   To achieve the two main goals, the central bank must pursue a 
strict monetary policy next year.  However, the goals cannot be 
achieved purely through monetary means and must also involve 
economic and fiscal policy.  If the necessary improvement does not 
materialize, the MNB will turn to the government to make the 
required adjustments.  The exchange rate policy must serve both 
goals, that is promote exports and support domestic production to 
cut imports, as well as to reduce inflation.  As a result, the 
central bank will have to strive to maintain the stability of the 
forint's exchange rate in real terms.  Regarding the central bank's 
interest rate policy, domestic demand for borrowing must be covered 
by domestic savings to the highest possible extent.  The central 
bank believes it is important to reduce financial expenses to reduce 
the interest margin in an environment where deposit interest rates 
will inevitably rise.  The decrease in withholding tax and measures 
taken in connection with the bank consolidation program are 
important steps towards a reduction in interest margins.  The 
Central Bank Council also agreed to secure limited refinancing on a 
temporary basis to promote exports within the framework of a strict 
monetary policy.  (Budapest MTI in English 1716 GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   CENTRAL BANK COUNCIL CRITICAL OF 1994 BUDGET FINANCING:  The 1994 
budget approved on 14 December contains elements which are in 
contradiction to the spirit of the law on the central bank, the Bank 
Council said in a statement.  The contradiction is in regard to 
central bank financing of the budget as the budget has increased the 
upper limit on the amount of state securities that the MNB can 
purchase for 1994 and has placed an obligation on the central bank 
to guarantee to purchase state securities to that amount.  The 
Central Bank Council is concerned that these points, as well as the 
related amendment to the Central Bank Law, which amount to limiting 
the independence of the central bank, were included in the budget 
without prior consultation with the bank.  The council believes it 
is important to reiterate that the MNB's autonomy as laid down in 
the 1991 Central Bank Law is necessary for the central bank to 
operate in an effective manner with regard to monetary policy.  If a 
more extensive financing of the budget cannot be avoided, the 
central bank will use all the means at its disposal to compensate 
for the additional outflow of liquidity, the Central Bank Council 
statement says. 

   Under the budget, the increase in the stock of deficit-financing 
state bonds held by the central bank cannot exceed 80 billion 
forints on any one day next year.  Parliament has also amended the 
law on the central bank to that effect.  The 1991 law on the central 
bank set a decreasing limit on central bank financing of the budget 
in proportion to total budget revenues.  The limit for 1994 was set 
at 4 percent, corresponding to 52 billion forints, as total budget 
revenues are targeted at 1,308 billion forints.  Before the budget 
was passed, Hungarian National Bank (MNB) Chairman Akos Peter Bod 
wrote to the minister of finance and the head of the parliamentary 
committee warning of the conflict between the 80 billion forints 
limit in the budget and the limit under the law on the central bank. 
Bod said that unless the contradiction was eliminated, the central 
bank would proceed in accordance with the Central Bank Law. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1556 GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   PROLIFERATION OF CONSULTING FIRMS:  About 20 percent of Hungarian 
companies seek out external advisory firms, but experts believe this 
proportion could be 25-30 percent within two or three years.  The 
300 advisory firms here work in various business fields.  The first 
Hungarian professional consultancy firms were set up at the end of 
the 1980's, and this was followed by the appearance of prominent 
foreign firms in Hungary.  The possibility that advisory firms could 
help a business in areas where the business does not have the 
appropriate overview or special knowledge, was not recognized in 
commerce until recently.  Groups giving advice to promote effective 
operation were first set up within individual ministries, through 
internal reorganization.  Various organizations, institutes and 
independent companies evolved from these, but they frequently lost 
touch with practice, mainly preparing analyses for social 
organizations and ministries, and providing little, and often 
inadequate professional advice to their customers. 

   Foreign expert and consultancy firms first came to Hungary in 
1989 and 1990, but many of them knew very little about Hungary's 
economy, and their advice was thus not always suitable or effective. 
Thus, another few years had to pass for a favorable impression to 
emerge of the professional service called consultancy.  At present, 
about 250-300 companies advertise as economic advisors but, in fact, 
only a third of them do the job full time.  Consultancy firms offer 
their services in the most varied areas, citing the spread of 
strategic thinking and the importance of developing organizations. 
The most widely known advisory specialized areas are personnel 
(workforce) consultancy and "head-hunting," public relations and 
marketing advice, financial and banking operation consultancy, and 
public affairs political-economic consultancy. 

   There are several world-famous foreign consultancy and expert 
firms that advise state companies and institutions.  These include 
Credit Suisse First Boston, which provides advice to the Hungarian 
Government.  The French Banque Paribas assists the work of the 
National Tourism Office.  Several companies use the professional 
assistance of Ernst and Young Accountants.  The London-based 
commercial bank, N.M. Rothschild, is the economic adviser to the 
State Assets Management Co. and the Hungarian Telecommunications Co. 
One of the most prestigious head-hunters, the U.S. firm Boyden, 
opened a Budapest office in 1992. 

   Some 10-15 Hungarian advisory firms also work nationwide.  Most 
of these were founded two to three years ago as private ventures by 
young economists and psychiatrists aged 35 to 40, and include the 
Coopsystem Organizational and Management Training Institute of the 
Budapest University of Economics, and the career advisory and senior 
manager consultancy firm of Dr. Jozsef Telkes.  Experts believe that 
consultancy as a service will become even more popular.  The fees, 
considered high in the service sector, will be pushed down by 
increasing competition, and firms will begin working in new 
professional areas, including crisis and bankruptcy management, time 
management, and professional advice covering franchise and multi- 
level marketing.  (Budapest MTI in English 1037 GMT 17 Dec 93 AU) 

   IBUSZ TO COOPERATE WITH AIR CANADA:  IBUSZ, Hungary's biggest 
travel agent, plans to establish close cooperation with Air Canada 
to increase its turnover in North America.  The company's Vienna- 
based affiliate, IBUSZ International, is to conclude a general sales 
agreement with Air Canada.  Accordingly, the Canadian firm will 
close its Viennese office and move to the IBUSZ office at 
Krugerstrasse.  Cooperation with Air Canada is expected to yield a 
turnover of 70-80 million Austrian shillings (ATS) for IBUSZ next 
year.  This year IBUSZ international expects to reach a turnover of 
ATS 450 million.  According to Austrian estimates, the parent 
company will have a turnover of ATS 1.15 billion.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 0924 GMT 22 Dec 93 AU) 
   JAPANESE EXIMBANK OFFERS 11-BILLION-YEN CREDIT LINE:  The Export- 
Import Bank of Japan has offered a new 11-billion-Japanese-yen (JPY) 
credit line to Hungary.  The Japanese Government is ready to express 
its support for the transformation of the Hungarian economy through 
the new credit line.  Hungarian enterprises have already used nearly 
all of an earlier JPY 13 billion credit line aimed at small and 
medium sized businesses granted by the Japanese Eximbank in December 
1992.  The Hungarian National Bank contributed an equal amount to 
the forint-denominated loans, which are refinanced from the fund 
opened by the Japanese Eximbank.  (Budapest MTI in English 1351 GMT 
22 Dec 93 AU) 

   POLAND 

   EXPECTATIONS FROM GATT AGREEMENT:  An article in the Poznan 
weekly WPROST on the GATT system commented on what Poland should 
expect from the recently concluded GATT agreement.  Transforming the 
Marxist thesis "practice is the criterion of truth" into "free trade 
is the criterion of truth," journalist Mariola Balicka notes that 
those who "produce the best and the cheapest" will "rake in the 
loot," and this applies to Poland as well.  Poland has a chance to 
increase next year's exports by $800 million because of the newly 
agreed upon trade decontrols in agricultural and textile products, 
but this depends on whether Poland keeps pace with international 
competition, "or whether we hide from competition behind a bolted 
door."  (Poznan WPROST in Polish No 52, 26 Dec 93 p 9) 

   LACK OF CAPITAL SAID TO IMPEDE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT:  The most 
important barrier to development is the small amount of national 
capital.  Foreign credits should supplement the activity of Polish 
banks, Finance Minister Marek Borowski told the Investment-Credit 
Forum on 16 December.  The minister added that inflation is a few 
percent lower than it was four years ago, and the zloty can now be 
exchanged for western currencies.  The IMF mission that has just 
left Poland appreciated our macroeconomic coefficients, he said. 
The upward tendency may break down, however, if there are no 
sufficient financing sources, Hanna Gronkiewicz-Waltz, president of 
the National Bank of Poland, said.  She warned against inconsiderate 
money borrowing for investments that may burden national banks and 
the State Treasury, which is a guarantor for credits.  (Warsaw PAP 
in English 1327 GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   RAIFFEISEN CENTROBANK OPENS BRANCH IN POZNAN:  The Austrian 
Raiffeisen Centrobank has opened its third Polish branch in Poznan. 
The opening took place on 16 December.  The two other branches are 
in Gdansk and Katowice, while the bank's headquarters opened in 
Warsaw in 1991.  The Bank's main customers are Polish enterprises 
and banks having limited rights in international financial turnover. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1400 GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   GENERAL MOTORS COOPERATION WITH FSO:  Two General Motors 
subsidiaries, Packard Electric and Inland Fisher Guide Divisions, 
and the Polish car maker FSO's branch in Elk, Suwalki Province, have 
signed a memorandum on starting negotiations to establish a joint 
venture company.  Jerzy Kownacki, director of General Motors Poland, 
told PAP that they want to start the joint production of conductors, 
lighting elements, and parts of wood and metal.  Under the agreement 
signed with FSO on December 13, General Motors Europe committed 
itself to provide FSO subsidiaries and branches with the opportunity 
to enter the GM subsidiary system.  FSO spokesman Andrzej Smolinski 
told PAP that the factory's branch in Elk has become the biggest 
permanent Polish subsidiary of western car-makers such as Mercedes 
and Fiat.  Henryk Kucera, marketing director of tire manufacturer 
Stomil SA, said that the firm was entered in the register of 
official GM suppliers.  He did not want to disclose the amount of 
the contract, saying that the talks will be concluded next year. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1652 GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   NEW OPEL VAN ENTERS POLISH MARKET:  General Motors Poland has 
presented a new model that will be on sale in Poland.  It is a small 
van built on the chassis of the Opel Corsa and with a price tag of 
Z260 million (ca. $13,000).  John Passadis of GM Poland told 
reporters that Opel accounted for 13 percent of imported cars 
delivered to Poland during the January-October period of this year. 
This gives the company second place after the Italian Fiat which has 
a 30-percent share of the imported car market.  In absolute figures, 
Opel sold 9,235 cars, while Fiat sold some 22,000, Passadis said. 
Referring to the contract between GM Europe and FSO car maker of 
Warsaw signed December 13, he said that the planned assembly of 
10,000 Astras in Warsaw by a joint venture established by the two 
companies should fully satisfy the Polish demand for this model. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1713 GMT 18 Dec 93 AU) 

   LACK OF FINANCING FOR STEEL INDUSTRY RESTRUCTURING:  The European 
Union (EU) appreciates the problems of the restructuring of the 
Polish steel industry and agrees to extend technical assistance and 
credits from international institutions, but refuses to offer a 
direct support from its budget, according to deputy minister of 
industry Stanislaw Padykula.  Padykula was speaking after a meeting 
of representatives of the Polish Government and the steel industry 
at the European Commission in Brussels.  According to Padykula, 
Poland is the most advanced central European country in the 
restructuring of the steel industry.  He noted that the 
implementation of the restructuring program depends on the influx of 
capital.  The European Bank for Reconstruction and Development has 
pledged to support the restructuring in the form of credits for 
concrete firms while the World- Bank has vowed to-assist the 
restructuring of employment, he said.  These sums are, however, 
insufficient despite a considerable contribution from domestic 
sources.  The overall cost of the restructuring is estimated at $4.5 
billion.  There were some 123,000 people employed in the Polish 
steel industry in 1991, compared to 100,000 at present.  In the year 
2002, employment in this industry is expected to fall below 43,000 
people.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1725 GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   PROBLEMS OF SMALL BUSINESS SECTOR:  Polish small business is in 
deep crisis and needs support and protection from the government, 
new chairman of the Polish Small Business Union Kazimierz 
Modzelewski told journalists following the conclusion of the 2nd 
congress of Polish small business.  The delegates to the congress, 
representing 914 small business organizations, elected new 
authorities of the Union and adopted its statutes.  The delegates 
agreed that small business needs investment relief, a stable tax 
system and efficient banking system.  They also spoke of the need to 
work out a system of credit guarantees to give small firms access to 
new technologies and enable them to participate in privatisation. 
The participants in the congress stressed the necessity to create a 
system of information about foreign partners and to promote Polish 
small business products in the West.  The debates were attended by 
Sejm speaker Jozef Oleksy.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1839 GMT 16 Dec 
93 AU) 

   INDUSTRIAL OUTPUT INCREASES IN NOVEMBER:  Industrial production 
rose by 2.1 percent in November against October and was 9.8 percent 
higher than a year ago.  However, the performance of construction 
and assembly plants was worse in November compared to the previous 
month, with their output decreasing by 11.8 percent.  These are 
figures released by the Central Statistical Office on 16 December. 
Also, as compared with November 1992, a 1.7 percent fall in 
production of the extraction industry was noted, while the output of 
the processing industry and the construction sector rose by 10.7 and 
8 percent, respectively.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2103 GMT 16 Dec 93 
AU) 

   NEW DIGITAL TELEPHONE EXCHANGE INAUGURATED:  Telecommunications 
in Warsaw will attain world a standard by 1997, the director of the 
Warsaw branch of Telekomunikacja Polska (Polish Telecommunications) 
Andrzej Moszkiewicz said on 16 December while inaugurating a new 
digital telephone exchange in Poland's capital.  President of the 
company Zdzislaw Nowak said that during the two years of its 
existence, the company's management has worked out strategic plans 
up to the year 2000, introduced new services, completed the 
construction of an international network, and established 
cooperation with telecommunications of neighboring countries. 
Thanks to the new telephone exchange, Warsaw's central district has 
received an additional 20,000 telephone numbers.  By 1996, Warsaw, 
with its population of 1.6 million, will have 900,000 telephone 
subscribers, according to Moszkiewicz.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2300 
GMT 16 Dec 93 AU) 

   NATIONAL BANK LOAN TO COVER BUDGET DEFICIT:  The National Bank of 
Poland (NBP) will lend the government 30 trillion zlotys (Z) ($1.5 
billion) to cover the budget deficit in 1994.  A further loan of Z5 
trillion, which the government is applying for, might cause a 4 
percent rise in inflation, said NPB president Hanna Gronkiewicz- 
Waltz said in an interview for the Third Radio channel.  The 1994 
budget deficit, which is to reach Z80 trillion, may be reduced by an 
introduction of credit limits, she added.  Gronkiewicz-Waltz 
anticipates that monthly inflation next year will be maintained at 
1.6 percent, which makes over 20 percent a year, Gronkiewicz 
explained.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1314 GMT 17 Dec 93 AU) 

   INVESTMENT BY KRAFT JACOBS SUCHARD:  Kraf t Jacobs Suchard has 
invested in Poland for the second time by establishing "Kraf t 
Chorzele," a joint venture company for cream cheese production, with 
a dairy cooperative in Chorzele, Ostroleka province.  The 
investment, worth Z60 billion (almost $3 million) ensures Jacobs 77 
percent of the new company shares.  The cooperative will provide the 
new company with one third of its assets, chairman of the 
cooperative Stanislaw Zeranski told a press conference in Warsaw on 
17 December.  Within two years, Jacobs is expected to invest $16.6 
million more in the modernization of production.  The company is to 
produce cheese with the Kraf t trade mark for home and foreign 
markets.  The firm aspires to employ 140 workers.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1916 GMT 17 Dec 93 AU) 

   POLISH-SWEDISH GROUP SEEKS TV LICENSE:  Top Canal Media, a 
Polish-Swedish company set up last month, is among the ten 
contenders for the sole license to broadcast television nationally 
in Poland.  Sixty-seven percent of the shares in the venture are 
owned by Jacek Zelezik, a Polish TV broadcaster who currently 
operates a Warsaw-based local station.  AB Kinnevik and Atrium, both 
of Sweden, own 30 and 3 percent of the shares Top Canal Media 
respectively.  Kinnevik has invested in TV broadcasting in Sweden, 
Denmark and Norway and, most recently, in Estonia.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1710 GMT 18 Dec 93 AU) 

   AGRICULTURE MINISTER OUTLINES PRIORITIES:  Agriculture Minister 
Andrzej Smietanko said in Bialystok on 19 December that the creation 
of appropriate legal conditions for agricultural activity, the 
restructuring of food industry debts, and ensuring budgetary 
resources for activating agriculture are the main "things to be 
done" by the ministry.  The passing of a law on equalizing payments 
is a legal precondition for the good functioning of Polish 
agriculture.  While restructuring debts of agricultural enterprises, 
it is necessary to make sure, simultaneously, that farmers will have 
a 20 percent share in these enterprises, said Smietanko, adding that 
farmers would then be interested in the fate of restructured 
enterprises to which they deliver foodstuffs.  Food producers will 
get shares in firms on the same principles as the workforces of 
enterprises privatized within the framework of the state enterprise 
pact, said the minister.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1847 GMT 19 Dec 93 
AU) 

   UNION OF MEAT PRODUCERS FORMED:  The Polish Union of Producers, 
Exporters, and Importers of Meat was set up on 21 December.  The 
idea was initiated by representatives of meat plants and exporters 
of meat and meat products.  The union aims to eliminate competition 
among Poles on foreign markets, promote Polish products and 
services, help initiate modern methods of animal husbandry in 
Poland, prepare analyses and forecasts concerning the meat market, 
and represent the interests of the meat industry vis?a?vis the state 
                                                   ? ? 
administration.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1648 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   BRITAIN DONATES $75 MILLION FOR BANK PRIVATIZATION FUND:  British 
Ambassador to Poland Michael Llewellyn-Smith and Deputy Finance 
Minister Ryszard Michalski signed an agreement on 21 December to 
make $75 million available to the Polish bank privatization fund. 
The money originally formed part of the United Kingdom's $100 
million contribution to the Polish zloty stabilization fund.  In 
1992, the UK, along with other international donors, agreed to 
contribute the major part of its contribution to that fund to the 
process of privatizing Polish banks.  Some donors had not agreed and 
withdrew their contributions, including Germany and Italy, who 
withdrew $200 and $100 million resppectively.  Great Britain has 
donated $8 million for technical assistance to the bad debts 
departments of "Bank Depozytowo-Kredytowy" in Lublin, "Powszechny 
Bank Gospodarczy" in Lodz, and "Bank Zachodni" in Wroclaw.  Some $17 
million will be used as restructuring assistance to state-run 
enterprises, while the $19 million interest accrued on the $100 
million will be spent on the promotion of small and medium-size 
companies in Lublin and Bialystok. 

   Poland signed a memorandum to set up the Polish bank 
privatization fund in December 1992.  Michalski said that the $1 
billion stabilization fund has existed for two years, but Poland 
failed to draw on the fund's money and wanted to allocate it for the 
privatization of banks.  "This is a huge multi-billion dollar 
project," he argued.  Poland asked the New York-based Federal 
Reserve Bank to transfer the money to the bank privatiztion fund. 
It will be transferred provided Poland "has signed bilateral 
agreements with individual countries."  Some $600 million have been 
placed on the fund's account so far.  "We will be glad if we manage 
to collect some $800 million," Michalski added.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1708 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   U.S. COMPANY BUYS 36-PERCENT STAKE IN GLASSWORKS:  The U.S. 
company Owens-Illinois Inc. has bought a 36-percent stake in the 
Jaroslaw glassworks for $3.15 million.  Twenty percent of the shares 
will be sold to the workforce at a discount, the press office of the 
Privatization Ministry announced on 21 December.  The State Treasury 
has retained the rest of shares but is expected to sell its package 
to the U.S. investor within six years.  Under the agreement, the 
U.S. buyer has increased the glassworks' stock capital by $14.05 
million and, as a result, will own 75 percent of the shares.  The 
money obtained from the recapitalization will be used to repay the 
glassworks' loans and liabilities, amounting to some Z290 billion 
(some $14 million).  The U.S. investors will make $25 million in 
investments over a period of 5 years.  Owens-Illinois Inc, the 
world's biggest packaging glass manufacturer, pledges to maintain 
employment and social security benefits at the present level.  A pay 
rise will be also included in the package.  Under the October 1993 
agreement on technical assistance, Owens-Illinois Inc., with a 
network of 30 plants and a 1992 turnover of $3.8 billion, will 
provide the Polish glassworks with new technology of manufacturing 
and selling glass containers.  The modernization will save some 400 
jobs.  The glassworks in Jaroslaw, southeastern Poland, makes 
bottles and jars of colorless and orange glass.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1747 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   ROMANIA 

   OTOPENI AIRPORT MODERNIZATION:  Bucharest's Otopeni International 
Airport has inaugurated a modern passenger departure section, fitted 
with facilities on a par with European requirements.  The departure 
line consists of 12 check-in counters provided with conveyor belts 
and electronic ticket reading and luggage weighing machines, all 
made in Germany, and eight customs checkpoints.  The section 
includes a waiting room for VIP's; its air-conditioning, closed- 
circuit television, and other conveniences have also been brought up 
to date.  The modernization project was entirely designed by 
Romanian experts.  Another program, worth $70 million, will equip 
Otopeni with new installations, refurbish its runways, add outdoor 
parking platforms for planes, build a new air-station, extend car 
parks, access roads, and so forth.  When the project is completed, 
Otopeni International Airport will have doubled its capacity, 
enabling it to meet the demands of the next two decades.  (Bucharest 
ROMPRES in English 1511 GMT 22 Dec 93 AU) 

   WOOD-PROCESSING INDUSTRY IN 1993:  Production growth in the four 
sub-branches of the wood-processing industry (exploitation of timber 
and its primary processing, manufacturing of furniture, pulp and 
paper, glass, and fine ceramic goods) has registered 6-percent 
growth, while exports increased by 5.6 percent compared to 1992, 
Marin Nicolae, state secretary in the Ministry of Industry, said in 
a recent interview.  He also emphasized the concern of the economic 
units in that sector with developing a profitable market in Romania, 
meaning by that the development of a furniture manufacturing 
industry with new job opportunities.  Another success registered in 
1993 was the recapture of several foreign markets, such as the one 
in the Russian Federation, where two furniture exhibitions were 
recently organized in Moscow and Krasnoyarsk; next year, similar 
exhibitions are scheduled to be held in Baku and Saint Petersburg. 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0919 GMT 23 Dec 93 AU) 

   INDUSTRIAL PRODUCTION FIGURES:  According to the data provided by 
the National Statistics Board (INS) industrial production in October 
1993 was 0.3 percent higher than the previous month; if the number 
of overall working days is taken into account, it was actually 3.2 
percent higher.  Compared to October 1992, the increases registered 
in October 1993 were 7.4 percent and 11.9 percent respectively, 
which leads to a total production for the first 10 months of 1993 
approximating the production of the first 10 months of 1992. 
Likewise, production in the mining sector rose 1.3 percent, in the 
energy sector 5.9 percent, while the processing industry recorded a 
slight regress.  By the end of October 1993, the number of employees 
in industry was 2,544,500, that is 15,700 less than September 30. 
Productivity for the first 10 months of 1993 was 7.7 percent higher 
than the first ten months of 1992. 

   The foreign trade figures for October registered a fall, compared 
to September, both in exports and imports.  Hard currency exports 
totaled $451 million, that is 22.7 percent less than September, but 
22.5 percent more than in October 1992.  Imports totalled in October 
$471.3 million, that is 15.8 percent less than in September, but 1.7 
percent more than October 1992.  The trade balance for October 
registered a $20.3 million deficit.  For the first 10 months of 
1993, both exports and imports registered increases compared with 
the first 10 months of 1992.  Hard currency exports totalled 
$3,617.6 million (8.5 percent), while imports amounted to $4,232.6 
million (6.1 percent), which led to a $615 million trade deficit. 
The average nominal net salary in October was 6.7 percent higher 
than September and 3.3 times higher than October 1990, when the 
price liberalization started.  The ratio of the average nominal net 
salary versus the consumer price index for the first 10 months of 
1993 was 87.6 percent, compared with the same period of 1992.  The 
ratio in October was 91.7 percent compared to September; 79.9 
percent compared to October 1992; and 54.4 percent compared to 
October 1990.  The number of unemployed by 15 November was 
1,075,253, that is equivalent to an unemployment rate of 9.4 
percent.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1529 GMT 27 Dec 93 AU) 

   AGRICULTURAL INVESTMENTS IN 1994:  According to the Ministry of 
Agriculture and Food, proposed investments in agriculture for 1994 
total some 69.25 billion lei.  Most of the proposed investments are 
designed for ongoing work on 234 projects amounting to 47,063.053 
million lei, but there will also be some 103 new projects, worth 
8,709.353 billion lei.  The investment program also stipulates 3,670 
million lei for loans.  The main entries in the 1994 plan are 
irrigation works, draining and soil erosion control, flood 
prevention, and pest control.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1712 
GMT 27 Dec 93 AU) 

   CRISIS IN VITICULTURE:  Wines have turned for Romanians from 
consumer goods into luxury goods, told a news conference Viorel 
Stoian, director of the Valea Calugareasca Institute of Vine-Growing 
and Vinification Research.  Romania, the world's eighth vine-growing 
country, is undergoing a crisis in this domain, he said, showing 
that the vineyards have been steadily shrinked ever since 1980, as 
numerous areas cultivated to vine were given other uses.  In 1993, 
Romania has only 245,000 hectares cultivated with productive vine, 
as compared with about 300,000 hectares in 1970.  The production has 
kept at low levels these last few years, that is 3,760 kg of grapes 
per hectare in 1991 and 3,845 kg in 1992.  The upkeep of the 
vineyards is rather unsatisfactory in the private sector that 
currently holds 73.2 per cent of the total area.  The causes of this 
situation are the big expenditures taken to start and maintain noble 
strains, which are hard for private producers to bear, as well as 
the tough credit system.  The high cost of production shows in the 
sale price, Viorel Stoian stressed, adding that the fate of Romanian 
vine-growing depended decisively on the support the state gives this 
sector.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English  1025 GMT 21 Dec 93 AU) 

   GERMAN FIRM TO OVERSEE POLLUTION, QUALITY CONTROL:  Upon request 
of the Romanian state, the German TUV Bayern Company has opened its 
representation office in Bucharest.  Its activity is based on 
pollution-control technologies.  The company is to carry out 
controls, together with Romanian experts trained in Munich, on 
equipment in Romanian enterprises.  Periodic check-ups and equipment 
testing to observe the standards of environment protection will be 
carried out in Romanian laboratories properly equipped for testing 
operations.  After passing the tests, various industrial products 
are to receive quality certificates that will help them enter 
markets in Europe and the United States.  Moreover, the company has 
the role to find out irregularities regarding the quality of 
equipment and their products.  In that case, enterprises should 
inform the experts that are to study the case that are to bring 
solutions for recovery.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0834 GMT 21 
Dec 93 AU) 

   SLOVAKIA 

   CONSTRUCTION OF GAS PIPELINE BEGINS:  The construction of a 42-km 
gas pipeline from Surany to Vrable officially started on 3 December. 
The investor of the project, which is expected to cost 142 million 
Slovak korunas (Sk), is the SPP (Slovak Gas Works) Bratislava 
company.  (Bratislava PRAVDA in Slovak 4 Dec 93 p 4 AU) 

   EARNINGS IN AGRICULTURE LAG:  Average nominal monthly earnings in 
agriculture increased 6.6 percent in the first half of 1993, 
compared with a 22 percent increase in the industrial sector.  The 
agricultural work force shrunk by 32,500 people in the first half of 
the year.  Representatives of the strongest agricultural union in 
Slovakia warn that, if the agricultural budget is passed in the form 
proposed by the government, farmers will be forced to raise the 
procurement prices of slaughter animals, potatoes, wheat, and milk 
by an average of 15 percent.  The government's draft budget for 1994 
provides for Sk6.75 billion in agricultural subsidies, plus Sk65O 
million for the Agricultural Market Regulation Fund, while the 
government's own "Green Report" reckoned with Sk11.1 billion in 
agricultural subsidies.  (Bratislava PRAVDA in Slovak 6 Dec 93 p 3 
AU) 

   FARMS' SITUATION KEEPS DETERIORATING:  The value of the financial 
assets of private farms declined by another Sk800 million in the 
first half of 1993, that is, by one-third, while the value of the 
financial assets of state farms declined by Sk413 million, that is, 
44 percent.  The volume of loans of enterprises involved in primary 
agricultural production, on the other hand, increased by Sk1 billion 
and almost 50 percent of them are facing bankruptcy.  In the first 
half of the year, another 32,000 people left agriculture and the 
share of agricultural workers in the number of unemployed has 
reached 20 percent.  These figures were presented by Jozef Juhas, 
chairman of the Slovak Agricultural and Food Chamber (SPPK), at the 
Third SPPK General Assembly.  (Bratislava PRAVDA in Slovak 9 Dec 93 
p 5 AU) 

   TIMBER EXPORTS TO GO UP:  Export of timber continues to be 
regulated and subject to export licenses.  According to Jozef 
Konopka, director of the forestry section at the Slovak Ministry of 
Agriculture, licenses for the export of a maximum of 600,000 cubic 
meters of timber from state and private forests will be issued in 
1994.  This represents 12 percent of total annual timber cutting, 
which will amount to approximately 4.8 million cubic meters next 
year.  In 1992 administrators and owners of forests exported 140,000 
cubic meters of timber.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 7 Dec 93 p 
2 AU) 

   KOMARNO SHIPYARDS DOUBLE PRODUCTION:  The Slovenske Lodenice 
(Slovak Shipyards) Komarno company has already concluded Sk3 billion 
worth of contracts for 1994, which is twice its production volume of 
1992, Ladislav Lichtenberg, the company's commercial director, 
announced.  The Komarno shipyards have become the "most important 
producer of coasters in the under-4000-ton category in Europe," 
Lichtenberg said.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 7 Dec 93 
p 2 AU) 

   COCA COLA BUYS SOFT-DRINKS PLANT:  The Coca Cola Amatil Slovakia 
company and the Aqua Fresh company in Luka near Piestany, producer 
of mineral water and water for infants, have concluded an agreement, 
under which Coca Cola purchased Aqua Fresh's assets.  Following 
necessary investments, the plant will produce beverages of the Coca 
Cola company for the domestic market.  It will also continue 
bottling "Lucka" mineral water.  The transfer of all Aqua Fresh 
employees to Coca Cola Amatil Slovakia is part of the contract. 
(Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 8 Dec 93 p 1 AU)  The first 
production plant of the Coca Cola Amatil company in Slovakia opened 
in Luka on 8 December.  It will satisfy the growing demand for the 
company's beverages on the Slovak market.  (Bratislava SMENA in 
Slovak 9 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   TEXTILE JOINT VENTURE APPROVED:  On 7 December the Slovak 
Government approved the founding of a joint venture by the Trikota 
Vrbove company and the Italian Nuova Iva company.  The joint 
venture, called Andrea, has a capital stock of Sk10O,O00, 80 percent 
of which came from the Italian partner.  It will produce ladies' 
lingerie, initially for the German and Italian markets and, 
subsequently, for the Slovak and Czech markets as well.  In the 
initial phase, the joint venture will build four workshops for 45 
employees.  Eventually, the number of employees is to increase to 
200.  In the first year of operations, the company expects to make a 
pre-tax profit of over Sk3.7 million.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in 
Slovak 8 Dec 93 p 2 AU)  The joint venture between the Trikota 
Vrbove state enterprise and the Italian Nuova Iva company, a member 
of the Gruppo Perla consortium and one of the most important 
producers of underwear, was set up on 9 December.  The joint venture 
will operate production plants at Vrbove and Sala.  The Italian 
partner has invested Sk17 million in the venture in the form of 
machinery, know-how, and financial capital.  The venture, called 
Andrea, will specialize in the production of swimsuits and lingerie 
based on Du Pont's Lycra Jersey fiber.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY in Slovak 13 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   TAXPAYERS OWE STATE OVER SK13 BILLION:  According to a report on 
the results of an inquiry into the operations of the state internal 
revenue administration, which was discussed by the Slovak Government 
on 7 December, outstanding tax payments had reached the sum of 
Sk13.2 billion by 30 September 1993.  Within the framework of their 
audits, internal revenue authorities levied additional tax payments, 
including fines, of Sk2.888 billion in the first nine months of the 
year.  Only Sk1.058 billion, that is, 36.6 percent of the arrears, 
has actually been paid by the taxpayers.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in 
Slovak 8 Dec 93 pp 2, 5 AU) 

   RAILROADS STOP SERVING INDEBTED COMPANIES:  Gabriel Rybar, press 
secretary of the Slovak Railroads (ZSR), told the daily NARODNA 
OBRODA that, with effect from 8 December, the ZSR would stop making 
available its freight cars to 46 Slovak companies that are its 
biggest debtors.  The ZSR will cancel its decision only after the 
companies settle their debts, Rybar said.  The ZSR's claims against 
customers have reached the sum of Sk3.7 billion, while the ZSR 
itself owes other organizations Sk2.4 billion.  At the end of May, 
the ZSR's claims stood at only Sk2.4 billion, which shows their 
rapid rise in the last couple of months.  According to Rybar, the 
ZSR is unable to pay its suppliers' bills and currently pays only 
for electricity and diesel fuel.  It has also had to discontinue 485 
investment projects because it has received from the state budget 
funds for the reconstruction of only 17 km of tracks.  The companies 
affected include Duslo Sala, Chemko Strazske, the Ziar nad Hronom 
aluminum works, the Novaky Chemical Works, the Ruzomberok Paper and 
Pulp Mill, and Istrochem Bratislava.  Rybar hopes that the ZSR's 
decision would be only "temporary" and that a solution would be 
found by the end of the year.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 
8 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   COMPANY SETS UP OFFICE IN CHINA:  Kerametal AS has opened a 
representative office in Shanghai.  It is the Bratislava company's 
fifth representative office abroad, after those in Germany, the 
United States, the Czech Republic, and Switzerland.  According to 
Vladimir Duris, the company's assistant director general, the 
opening of the Shanghai office comes in reaction to the assessment 
of Kerametal's interests and opportunities in the Chinese market. 
Kerametal, which will celebrate its 25th anniversary in 1994, 
expects this year revenues slightly above last year's Sk6 billion. 
(Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 9 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   BAN ON IMPORTING CZECH POTATOES WAIVED:  The ban on the 
distribution of potatoes imported from the Czech Republic will be 
abolished with effect from 13 December 1993, while the ban on 
importing potatoes from other countries remains in force, the 
Central Agricultural Inspection and Testing Institute (UKSUP) 
announced.  The importer must furnish a certificate issued by the 
Czech Republic's Agricultural and Food Inspection Authority that the 
shipment does not contain the golden nematode.  (Bratislava 
REPUBLIKA in Slovak 9 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   UTILITY-VEHICLE MAKER HIT BY CZECHOSLOVAKIA'S DIVISION:  TAZ 
(Trnava Automobile Works) a.s., which produces S1203 utility 
vehicles in seven different modifications, clutches for passenger 
cars and trucks, and axles and other components for Tatra 815 
trucks, has had to lay off 300 people since May and employs now 
2,900 people.  The reason is that Tatra Koprivnice, the main 
customer, had suspended production until July and sales of 51203 
utility vehicles have been reduced to almost one-half.  Last year, 
TAZ produced 4,715 S1203 automobiles, 65 percent of which were 
exported to the Czech Republic.  This year only 100 S1203 
automobiles will be sold in the Czech Republic.  Sales on the Slovak 
market have been affected by customers' insolvency.  Slovak health 
care, for example, would need 130 ambulance cars but will be able to 
purchase only 30 this year.  In the first nine months of the year, 
TAZ made a profit of only Sk1.2 million, compared with last year's 
27 million.  Fifty one percent of TAZ shares are owned by the 
National Property Fund of the Slovak Republic, 30 percent by 
individual holders of investment coupons, and the remainder by 
investment funds.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 9 Dec 93 
p 2 AU) 

   LAYOFFS IN TANK FACTORY:  The more than 5,000 employees of the 
ZTS Turcianske Strojarne Martin state enterprise will stay at home 
from 18 December to 10 January 1994, owing to the company's 
difficult economic situation.  The company is owed more than Sk3 
billion by its customers, which makes it difficult for it to 
purchase materials and energy.  This month, the company has even had 
to start regulating the consumption of electricity.  During the 
extended Christmas leave, only 350 to 400 workers will come to work 
to complete orders, the sale and financing of which are guaranteed. 
One of the biggest debtors of ZTS is the Motokov Prague company with 
a debt of 500 million korunas.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 10 Dec 93 
p 2 AU) 

   PER-CAPITA HEALTH CARE SPENDING HALF OF CZECH LEVEL:  The draft 
state budget for 1994 earmarks Sk15.764 billion (about $500 million) 
for health care, which is considered absolutely insufficient by the 
Administration of the Health Insurance Fund.  According to M. 
Jancovicova, director of the Administration of the Health Insurance 
Fund, the fund would need a minimum of Sk22.56 billion next year. 
Health Minister Irena Belohorska says, however, that she does not 
want to claim more funding in 1994 than her ministry had been 
allocated by the draft state budget.  She said she would raise the 
claims only if the tax revenues developed better than generally 
expected.  She added that she saw reserves in more efficient 
exploitation of the finances the system had at its disposal.  The 
Czech budget for 1994 has designated 73 billion Czech korunas 
(almost $2.5 billion) for the health care area, almost five-times 
more than the Slovak budget, though the Czech Republic's population 
is only twice as large as that of Slovakia.  (Bratislava SME in 
Slovak 10 Dec 93 pp 1, 2; Prague CTK in English 13 Dec 93 AU) 

   TEACHERS WARN AGAINST CUTS IN EDUCATION BUDGET:  In a joint 
statement addressed to Slovak Parliament, the Conference of Rectors 
of Slovak Higher Educational Establishments, the chairmen of 
Academic Senates, and the Trade Union of Workers in Education and 
Science warned that the submitted draft budget for education in 1994 
"will lead to the devastation of education."  The signatories 
pointed out that the proposed cuts would reduce material 
expenditures to 71.7 percent of the 1993 level and 37.3 percent of 
the 1992 level, while expenditures on maintenance and repairs would 
be cut to 32 percent of the 1993 level and 17 percent of the 1992 
level.  The earmarked investment resources would cover only 20 
percent of needs and allow the completion of only four projects 
under construction.  The wage resources appropriated by the budget 
represent only 87 percent of the 1993 resources, "which does not 
cover even the legal claim to tariff wages and could lead to the 
discharge of 22,000 employees in education," the signatories warn. 
(Bratislava SME in Slovak 10 Dec 93 p 2 AU)  Juraj Svec, rector of 
Bratislava's Comenius University, said on 14 December that the 
education sector would need Sk33.6 billion in 1994, but will get 
only Sk17.4 billion, 36 percent less than in 1992.  Kamil Vajnorsky, 
chairman of the Trade Union of Workers in Education and Science, 
said that, owing to the budget cuts, the education sector is 
threatened with a 25 percent reduction in real earnings next year 
and with the loss of 15,000 to 22,000 jobs.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY in Slovak 15 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   SWINE FEVER:  Swine fever has been diagnosed in the pig stock of 
a private farmer at Chramec, Rimavska Sobota district.  The probable 
source of the infection is wild boars.  The District Veterinary 
Administration at Rimavska Sobota ensured the physical liquidation 
of all animals in the pig stock and staked out protective zones. 
Extraordinary veterinary measures have been adopted.  (Bratislava 
PRAVDA in Slovak 13 Dec 93 p 16 AU) 

   PORK EXPORTS BANNED:  In view of the recent occurrence of swine 
fever in Rimavska Sobota district, all exports of pork and wild boar 
meat from Slovakia have been banned.  According to Jozef Hojsik from 
the State Veterinary Administration, exports might be resumed after 
six months to one year.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 13 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 

   SLOVAK-HUNGARIAN JOINT VENTURES:  A total of 345 companies with 
Hungarian capital participation are registered in the Slovak 
Republic, 41 of which are 100-percent Hungarian-owneD.  The 
Hungarian partners' stakes in these companies total $2.1 million. 
(Bratislava SME in Slovak 29 Nov 93 p 2 AU) 

   ENERGY COMPANY CUTS DELIVERIES TO DEBTORS:  The Slovak Energy 
Company (SEP) announced that, starting with the 49th week of the 
year, it will reduce the amount of electricity delivered to its 
"biggest debtors" by about 10 percent.  According to SEP Secretary 
General Rudolf Kvetan, the SEP is owed between 2.5 and 3 billion 
Slovak korunas (Sk) by its customers.  The single biggest debtor, 
with unpaid bills of Sk250 million, is the Duslo Sala company. 
Kvetan stressed that no limitations were planned in deliveries to 
health care and educational facilities.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY in Slovak 30 Nov 93 pp 1, 2 AU) 

   BRUSSELS CONFERENCE ON ARMS INDUSTRY CONVERSION:  An 
international conference on conversion of the Slovak arms industry 
was held in Brussels on 29-30 November.  The organizers from the 
European Union and the Slovak Ministry of Economy invited to it 
representatives of 23 Slovak companies engaged in "heavy and special 
engineering" and representatives of more than 200 West European 
companies.  The aim of the conference, which was attended by Deputy 
Prime Minister Jozef Prokes, was to mediate contacts between Slovak 
companies and West European partners and to provide West European 
companies with information on the Slovak economy, conditions for 
foreign investors, the system of taxation, and conversion programs. 
The Slovak side seeks foreign participation in Slovak firms 
undergoing conversion, either in the form of joint ventures or 
purchase of shares.  Each Slovak company participating in the 
conference held separate talks with representatives of 6 to 10 
Western firms, which included companies such as Siemens and 
Aerospatiale.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 30 Nov 93 p 
1; Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 1 Dec 93 p 1 AU) 

   NEW INTERNATIONAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS RATES INTRODUCED:  As of 1 
December, the Czech Republic is ranked in Slovakia in the first 
international telecommunications tariff zone, in which one pulse is 
15 seconds and the rate per minute, including VAT, is 6.30 Slovak 
korunas (Sk) Slovak Television announced on 1 December.  Hungary, 
Poland, and Austria rank in the second tariff zone; Romania, 
Germany, Armenia, Bulgaria, and Belarus are among countries ranked 
in the third tariff zone; and Russia, Georgia, and Azerbaijan are in 
the fourth zone.  One pulse in automatic international calls costs 
Sk1.5, and in calls from a public telephone box Sk2.0.  Changes in 
ranking countries in tariff zones also affect telegraph and 
teleprinter services, the television said, but did not specify. 
(Prague CTK in English 1 Dec 93 AU) 

   ADIDAS DEPARTS IN SEARCH OF CHEAPER LABOR:  Almost 10 years of 
cooperation between Adidas and the ZDA Partizanske shoe factory will 
come to an end in January 1994 when the sports-gear manufacturer 
will transfer the production of sports shoes to Vietnam.  According 
to Milan Oravec, ZDA's deputy director in charge of commerce, 
Adidas' decision means the loss of 300 jobs in ZDA's Zlate Moravce 
plant that used to produce up to 500,000 pairs of Adidas sports 
shoes annually.  Oravec is optimistic, however, that the company 
will find alternative markets for its shoes.  Thanks to deliveries 
for Italian partners and the domestic market, the entire capacity of 
the Zlate Moravce plant will be utilized until the end of the year. 
(Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 3 Dec 93 p 4; Bratislava SME in 
Slovak 2 Dec 93 p 1 AU)  After 12 years of cooperation, four 
workshops of the JAS Bardejov state enterprise will stop working for 
Adidas at the beginning of February.  Some 600 JAS Bardejov 
employees have been producing 700,000 Adidas sports shoes annually, 
about 20 percent of the company's total output.  The JAS management 
is holding talks with other world producers, including PUMA, to 
utilize its vacant capacity.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 4 Dec 
93 p 4 AU) 

   GROWING GAP BETWEEN LOW-INCOME, OTHER HOUSEHOLDS:  According to 
Slovak Statistical Office data, the gap between low-income 
households and other households is widening.  While the income of 
"better-situated" households was 22.3 percent higher in the second 
quarter of 1993 than in 1992 and reached Sk3,054 per capita, the 
income of low-income households (with an income of under Sk2,0O0 per 
household member, the official sustenance level) increased only 9.7 
percent, to Sk1,888 per capita.  The physical volume of purchases by 
all households declined 9.9 percent, but purchases by low-income 
households declined 16.8 percent.  According to updated Slovak 
Statistical Office data, there are now 693,000 Slovak households 
with 2,581,000 members whose per-capita income is under Sk2,OO0 per 
month.  This represents 39 percent of all Slovak households and 49 
percent of the population.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 1 Dec 933 p 2; 
Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 1 Dec 93 p 1 AU) 

   GERMAN COMPANIES SET UP INFORMATION OFFICES:  Representative 
offices of the German EuroBayernwerk and Thyssengas companies were 
officially opened in Bratislava on 29 November.  They will serve as 
"information and contact centers" for Slovak electricity and gas 
companies.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 1 Dec 93 p 2 
AU) 

   OVERDUE SMALL-SCALE PRIVATIZATION LOANS:  In an interview for the 
tabloid NOVY CAS, Finance Minister Julius Toth rejected the charge 
that the Slovak National Bank's "conservative policy" was to blame 
for the "increasing difficulty of obtaining a bank loan."  He said 
that one of the causes of the banks' shortage of credit resources 
was the inability of many small businessmen to repay loans taken by 
them within the framework of small-scale privatization.  According 
to Toth, since the beginning of the year the volume of outstanding 
payments for small-scale privatization credits increased from Sk3 
billion to Sk38 billion.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 2 Dec 
93 p 13 AU) 

   TATRA AIR TO MEET CONDITION TO BECOME NATIONAL AIR CARRIER:  By 
adopting a new organizational structure which provides for the 
merger of Tatra Air with the Tatra Air Group, Tatra Air will meet 
the Slovak Government's condition for being awarded the status of 
national air carrier, Dusan Podhorsky, director general of the Tatra 
Air Group AS, announced.  (Bratislava PRAVDA in Slovak 3 Dec 93 p 2 
AU) 

   GERMAN FIRM TO TAKE OVER TEXTILE COMPANY:  Pavol Potocny, 
director of the Gemtex Roznava state enterprise, a manufacturer of 
ready-to-wear clothing, told the daily NARODNA OBRODA that the 
privatization commission of the Ministry of Industry had approved 
the direct sale of 100 percent of Gemtex to the German Schiesser 
holding company.  This will allow Gemtex to eliminate its debts and 
gain access to new markets through Schiesser's distribution network. 
The German firm will also secure the training of managers, the 
retraining of workers, and the supply of materials.  The takeover 
still has to be approved by the Ministry for the Administration and 
Privatization of National Property and the government's Economic 
Council.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 3 Dec 93 p 22 AU) 

   STATE TOURISM AGENCY SET UP:  On 1 November, the Slovak Ministry 
of Economy set up the SATUR (Slovak Agency for Tourism) state 
enterprise as a successor to the former CEDOK state enterprise. 
SATUR runs a network of 53 travel agencies in Slovakia and four 
abroad (Vienna, Zurich, Berlin, Budapest), which it inherited after 
the division of CEDOK's property.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 3 Dec 
93 p 3 AU) 

   INVOLUNTARY LEAVE IN ARMS FACTORY:  The Christmas holiday for the 
more than 7,000 employees of the ZTS (Heavy Engineering Works) 
Dubnica arms factory will start on 17 December, and they will not 
return to work until 10 January.  The company's growing economic 
problems are the cause of the extended holiday.  Because of cuts in 
gas deliveries caused by the company's insolvency, ZTS Dubnica had 
to suspend production in its metallurgical division at the beginning 
of November.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 4 Dec 93 p 3 AU) 

ELAG/18 January/ECONF/East Europe Division/PF 26/1636z Jan 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43215 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000004794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   28 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-010--CHINA 
<H3> <TI>      Symposium Discusses Goals for China's Foreign Economic Relations </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
According     to research papers presented at a symposium on China's 
economic and trade relations, China's priorities in foreign trade 
are upgrading its export mix and "internationalizing" production 
enterprises.  Symposium participants tended to see  prospects for 
trade relations with the United States and Western countries as only 
fair, with Asia viewed as likely to become the focus of China's 
external economic development. 

   The November issue of XIANDAI GUOJI GUANXI, an international 
affairs journal affiliated with the well-respected China Institute 
of Contemporary International Relations (CICIR), a research think 
tank, is devoted to papers presented at an October symposium 
sponsored by that institution on "China's Economy Opening to the 
Outside World."  The papers present current thinking on the full 
spectrum of China's economic and trade relations with the world by 
participants from government, press, academic, and commercial 
circles.  (The appendix to this Foreign Media Note lists the 
reported articles, authors, and affiliations represented at the 
symposium.) 

   All symposium articles dealing with further opening up China's 
economy to the world give top priority to upgrading China's export 
mix by shifting away from low-profit, labor-intensive products. 
Chinese Academy of Social Sciences researcher Zhang Shouyi argues 
that a low-cost, skilled labor pool gives China a comparative 
advantage in "knowledge-intensive, high-tech products."  Other ideas 
for expanding high-profit exports by other authors include improving 
product quality, before and after sales service, and packaging. 
JINGJI RIBAO journalist He Ming stresses the importance of in- 
country marketing agents and products responsive to consumer demand 
when targeting markets in advanced countries.  Others at this 
symposium call for implementation of international standards and 
foreign managers in China's export enterprises to expand exports. 

   In reforming the foreign trade regime by "internationalizing" 
Chinese enterprises, state-run enterprises are in the best position 
to upgrade their exports, gain overseas market share, and become 
multinational corporations.  According to Wang Zhile of the Ministry 
of Foreign Trade and Economic Cooperation International Economic 
Cooperation Research Center,  "Of all the regions of the world, 
Asia, and especially East Asia, should be the key region, the target 
of first choice for internationalizing Chinese enterprises." 

   The image of Asia as China's stepping stone to the world economy 
is a common theme in many of the articles, but there is some 
ambivalence in the respective arguments supporting that view:  Asia 
is seen both as the region of greatest potential for China's 
outward-oriented economic growth and as its stiffest competitor.  In 
many cases Chinese exports are in direct competition with exports 
from other developing Asian economies.  Moreover, low-quality 
exports and lack of experience in international business dealings 
put Chinese companies at a disadvantage in this competition.  China 
is also see as in direct competition with ASEAN countries and 
Indochina for foreign investment. 

   Nonetheless, there appears to be general agreement that China 
must concentrate on Asia and Asian markets, both for their high 
growth potential in the 9O's and to counterbalance the increasing 
protectionism of Western countries.  With Asia, as with the world, 
China's strategy for economic development is to begin with sub- 
regional and bilateral relations and then move to multilateral and 
regional fora.  Huang Fanzhang of the State Planning Commission 
Economic Research Center explains this dynamic in terms of three 
triangles.  Huang postulates a small triangle (Mainland China- 
Taiwan-Hong Kong), a medium triangle (China-South Korea-Singapore 
and other ASEAN countries), and a large triangle (China-Japan-United 
States).  The larger triangles have the potential for economic 
competition and even conflict.  Huang predicts the large triangle of 
the Asia-Pacific will be the "main battlefield" in the U.S.-Japanese 
struggle for economic leadership.  Huang sees areas of concern in 
China's economic relations with both countries.  Japan doesn't want 
to see China become a competitor, but rather wants China to always 
"fly in formation" following Japan's lead.  According to Huang, the 
United States, on the other hand, is intent on imposing its 
political agenda on China. 

   Criticism of the United States along these lines is a frequent 
theme in the articles.  CICIR analyst Ke Juhan asserts that the 
United States is "politicizing" the economic relationship between 
the two countries.  Ke says that conditionality on MFN, U.S. 
economic reprisals based on "unwarranted accusations" of China's 
violation of the MTCR, U.S. anti-dumping duties against Chinese 
exports, and U.S. unilateral reduction of China's textile quotas 
have all "harmed the bilateral relationship."  Yan Xuetong, also of 
CICIR, agrees with Ke's contentions and further states, "Hereafter 
the United States will continue to use every pretext, including 
constant use of quota limitations and anti-dumping duties, to limit 
China's exports to the United States."  Ke Juhan urges the United 
States to put the relationship on a more "practical" footing, 
stating that President Clinton's recent "intentions, statements, and 
actions" are beginning to improve the economic relationship with 
China and predicting that as more U.S. companies become involved 
with China economically, they will "play an active role" in 
improving the bilateral relationship. 

   Among the articles on bilateral and regional economic relations, 
three on Russia and Europe by CICIR analysts stand out.  Wang Lijiu 
asserts that now is the time for China to consolidate economic 
relations with Russia.  However, according to Wang, both countries 
must work to formulate a unified and coordinated trade policy.  Wang 
also proposes setting up a Sino-Russian joint venture bank to 
resolve outstanding trade payment issues and calls for increased 
technology trade between the two countries.  In an article on 
economic relations with Eastern Europe, Qi Degang advocates using 
barter trade with cash-poor Eastern European countries to edge out 
Western competition for those markets.  Finally, Guan Shufen 
characterizes prospects for economic relations with Western European 
countries as "cautiously optimistic."  Sino-German economic 
relations will drive overall Sino-European economic development.  On 
the down side, however, Guan sees increasing European trade 
protectionism, use of anti-dumping measures to protect domestic 
industries, and problems in Sino-French and Sino-British bilateral 
relations. 

   APPENDIX 

   I. The Status Quo and Prospects of China's Economy Opening to the 
Outside World:  How To Meet Challenges and Open Up Ways Forward by 
Taking Opportunities 

   "An Outline of China Economy Going Out Overseas" by Yan Xuetong 
(CICIR) 

   "Briefing on the Strategy of China's Economy Opening to the 
Outside World" by Ji Chongwei (Deputy Director General, State 
Council Development Research Center) 

   "My Views on China's Economy Spreading to the World" by Zhang 
Shouyi (China Academy of Social Sciences Institute of Quantitative 
and Technical Economics) 

   "Some Major Turnarounds and Trends in China's Opening to the 
Outside World" by Tao Jian (CICIR) 

   "Some Thoughts on China's Economy Unfolding to the World" by Yu 
Xiaoqiu (CICIR) 

   "The Focus of the Internationalized Management of China's 
Enterprises Lies in the Asia-Pacific Region" by Wang Zhile (Ministry 
of Foreign Trade and Economic Cooperation International Economic 
Cooperation Research Center) 

   "How To Move China's Enterprises and Their Products Into the 
World" by He Ming (Economic Daily) 

   "New Steps Toward Overseas Markets by Capital Iron and Steel 
Corporation" by Cai Cun (Capital Iron and Steel Company 
Headquarters) 

   "Some Views on China's Cultural Enterprises Advancing to the 
World" by Zhang Shouying (Dadi News, Culture, and S and T 
Development Company Headquarters) 

   "Some Suggestions on How to Expand China's Service Export" by Liu 
Wenhui (National Defense University) 

   II. The International Economic Environment Faced When Opening to 
the Outside World: How To Be Favored Instead of Being Harmed in 
Expanding China's Bilateral and Multilateral Foreign Economic and 
Trade Relations 

   "The Impact of the Development of International Economy on 
China's Economy" by Zhou Caiyu (State Planning Commission Economic 
Research Center) 

   "International Financial Situations and Their Impact on China's 
Economy" by Zong Liang (Bank of China International Monetary and 
Financial Institute) 

   "The Pattern of Asia-Pacific Economy and China's Strategy" by 
Huang Fanzhang (State Planning Commission Economic Research Center) 

   "Brief Comment on Asia-Pacific Economy at the Turn of This and 
the Next Century" by Du Houwen (Chinese People's University) 

   "The Development of the Economic Rims in Asia-Pacific Sub-regions 
and China" by Fu Mengzi (CICIR) 

   "An Exploration of the UN's Administrative Model in Tumen Jiang 
Development Zone" by Xia Youfu and Huang Xueqi (University of 
International Business and Economics) 

   "The Revival of the Silk Road and the Cooperation Between China 
and Central Asia" by Gu Guanfu (CICIR) 

   "Sino-Japanese Economic Relations in the New International 
Situation" by Chen Zhuang (CICIR) 

   "Sino-U.S. Economic and Trade Relations: Features and Prospects" 
by Ke Juhan (CICIR) 

   "Some Thoughts and Suggestions Concerning Further Promotion of 
Sino-Russian Economic Cooperation" by Wang Lijiu (CICIR) 

   "The Trend of the Economic and Trade Relations Between China and 
East European Countries" by Qi Degang (CICIR) 

   "Outlook for Economic and Trade Cooperation Between China and 
Western Europe" by Guan Shufen (CICIR) 

   "Economic and Trade Relations Between Western Europe and China 
and Some Suggestions Concerned" by Chen Caogao (CICIR) 

   "Economic and Trade Relations Between China and Mideast 
Countries" by Yuan Qin (CICIR) 

   "Sino-Latin America Economic Relations: Status Quo, Problems and 
Prospects" by Xu Shicheng (Chinese Academy of Social Sciences 
Institute of Latin American Studies) 

   (AUTHOR: FORNARO.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
ECONOMIC BRANCH AT (703) 733-6404) 
EAG/ 26JAN94/ECONF/CD/SM 27/1458Z JAN 94 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43216 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000004894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   28 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-011--SAUDI-PLO 
<H3> <TI>      SAUDI ARABIA: IMPROVING RELATIONS WITH THE PLO </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Summary:      The meeting between Saudi King Fahd and PLO Chairman 
Yasir 'Arafat on 24 January (reported by Saudi radio) marked the 
culmination of a steady improvement in Saudi-PLO relations in recent 
weeks.  Signs of impending rapprochement were visible as early as 
late December, when the expatriate publication AL-MAJALLAH 
prominently displayed a picture of PLO Chairman 'Arafat warmly 
greeting the Saudi Ambassador to London.  Other evidence of 
improving relations, including the recent exchanges of letters and 
PLO officials' visits to the kingdom, were chronicled in an early 
January article in the expatriate daily AL-HAYAH. 

   'Arafat Meets Saudi Ambassador in London 

   Initial evidence of Saudi-PLO rapprochement appeared in the 26 
December issue of AL-MAJALLAH, a London Arabic-language weekly 
magazine, which prominently displayed at the top of its Society page 
a picture of Yasir 'Arafat warmly greeting and shaking hands with 
Saudi Ambassador to London Gazzi al-Qusayby during the PLO 
chairman's state visit to Britain earlier that month. 

   AL-HAYAH Notes Improving Saudi-PLO Relations 

   The London-based and Saudi-owned daily AL-HAYAH published an 
article by Sulayman Nasr on 7 January that assessed improvements in 
Saudi-PLO relations in recent weeks.  Nasr emphasized several signs 
of increasingly cordial relations:  the first public exchange of 
letters since the onset of the Gulf War between Saudi King Fahd and 
PLO Chairman Yasir 'Arafat, and recent visits by several Fatah 
Central Committee members and Faysal al-Husayni, chief Palestinian 
negotiator in the peace talks. 

   Exchange of Letters 

   According to the article, 'Arafat's letter to King Fahd expressed 
"congratulations on the opening of the Consultative Council," the 
Majlis al-Shura, and "deep gratitude for the continuous brotherly 
support (he) extended to the Palestinian people." 

   King Fahd reportedly replied in a cable published by the Saudi 
Press Agency on 6 January:  "With my appreciation for what you, your 
dear people, and your brothers expressed, I ask God Almighty for all 
to succeed in benefitting our Arab and Islamic nation and to attain 
its virtuous objectives, in the forefront of which are the hopes and 
the objectives of the Palestinian people at this important stage of 
its history, as it builds its institutions as a foundation for 
establishing an independent state with Jerusalem as its capital, God 
willing."  Nasr stressed that the publication of the exchange 
between King Fahd and 'Arafat was "the first time" that Saudi media 
had published a cable from the Saudi monarch to 'Arafat since the 
outbreak of the Gulf crisis and the ensuing deterioration of Saudi- 
PLO relations. 
   Nasr further noted that 'Arafat had previously sent King Fahd 
several cables and congratulatory letters which had elicited no 
published Saudi response.  Nasr speculated that the failure to 
respond had been due to Saudi "reservations about dealing with the 
Palestinian president since the outbreak of the Gulf crisis," noting 
specifically the repeated Saudi rejection of "rapprochement with 
'Arafat," despite his attempts to visit Saudi Arabia. 

   Fatah Members Visit the Kingdom 

   In addition to the exchange of messages, Nasr reported that a 
Palestinian delegation from the Fatah Central Committee visited 
Saudi Arabia to attend the funeral of the Palestinian ambassador to 
Riyadh, Subhi Abu-Karsh (Abu al-Mundhir), who was buried in al- 
Madinah on 5 January.  The delegation consisted of Salim Za'nun, 
vice president of the Palestine National Council, 'Abbas Zaki, Nasr 
Yusuf, and Intisar al-Wazir (Umm Jihad), as well as a number of 
other officials.  According to the author, the delegation visited 
the kingdom for "humanitarian reasons" and did not meet with any 
Saudi officials.  However, Nasr observed that "this is the first 
time this many Fatah officials have visited Saudi Arabia" since the 
Gulf crisis. 

   Visit by Faysal al-Husayni 

   Nasr also underscored the importance of the month-long visit of 
Palestinian leader Faysal al-Husayni, "one of the most prominent 
officials from inside Palestine."  According to Nasr, al-Husayni's 
visit was limited "to bringing the Saudis up-to-date" on 
developments in the occupied territories, in particular those 
concerning Jerusalem, "which holds special value for Saudi Arabia." 
While there, however, al-Husayni held a private meeting with "a 
high-ranking Saudi official," in addition to his "official meeting" 
with Foreign Minister Prince Sa'ud al-Faysal on 26 December.  The 
journalist speculated that al-Husayni "no doubt" discussed with the 
Saudis political matters related to the Palestinians, including the 
roadblocks facing the implementation of the PLO-Israel Declaration 
of Principles.  The article concluded by stating that al-Husayni 
conveyed his "strong satisfaction" with his informal meetings with 
Saudi officials and with their views regarding "the Palestinian 
issue, its latest developments, the Saudi approach to this issue, 
and the continuous Saudi support for the Palestinian people, 
especially those who are under occupation." 

   (QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, PERSIAN GULF/ 
SOUTH ASIA BRANCH AT (703)  733-6518) 
ENEAG/27 Jan/POLCHF/NEASA Division/SM 27/1510Z JAN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43217 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000005094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   28 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--WEST EUROPE 
<H3> <TI>      FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-04--WEST EUROPE </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Europe     Economic Review:  WESTERN EUROPE Vol. III, No. 4, 27 
January 1994 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a series published by 
FBIS Europe/Lat in America Group featuring brief summaries of 
foreign media reports on topical issues, compiled from the most 
recent sources available to FBIS. 

   Europe Economic Review (EER) is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA 
SURVEY published by the West and East European Divisions of 
Europe/Lat in America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas 
bureaus.  The EER is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Report for West and East Europe, 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normally do not 
appear in other FBIS publications. The EER is published in two 
editions, one for Western Europe (also including media coverage of 
Canada and Turkey), and the other for Eastern Europe.  Drawing 
primarily from domestic media sources of these countries but also 
using other foreign media where appropriate, the EER focuses on 
national and regional economic issues, such as economic 
competitiveness, regional economic integration, economic reforms and 
other changes in economic policies, and foreign trade and 
investment. 

   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government.  All comment or analysis contained herein is 
attributable to the cited media source, unless otherwise indicated. 

   Europe Economic Review 

   TABLE OF CONTENTS 

   FEATURE:  Italy--Unemployment Benefits Package Passed 

   CANADA 

   New Central Bank Governor Takes Over; Commentary on Trade 
Minister McLaren 

   FRANCE 

   USTR Kantor 'Threatens' EU Audiovisual Policy; China-U.S. Textile 
Accord Impact Discussed; Bull Plan 'Irritates' EU Commission; INSEE 
on Privatization Impact on Employment; Private Yard To Build Navy 
Ships 

   GERMANY 

   Commentator Sees Recovery Producing Crisis; Telekom Starts Fiber 
Optic Link With East Europe; Hesse Creates Technology Innovation 
Foundation 

   ITALY 

   3 Million New jobs Needed by 2000 

   SWEDEN 

   Institute Says Future Looking Brighter 

   ECONOMIC BRIEFS 

   France 

   FEATURE 

   Italy: Unemployment Benefits Package Passed 

   An article in IL MESSAGGERO reports that on 7 January the Council 
of Ministers approved the 4.2-trillion-lire unemployment bill 
sponsored by Labor Minister Gino Giugni, which is designed to bring 
temporary relief to the growing ranks of the  unemployed.  Although 
the package calls for government expenditures of 1.6 trillion lire 
for 1994 and 1.3 trillion lire each for 1995 and 1996, Giugni said 
that for the present, he can only guarantee the funds for 1994. 
However, according to an article in LA REPUBBLICA, the labor unions 
are "lukewarm" to the government's measures.  Natale Forlani, 
secretary of the Italian Confederation of Trade Unions (CISL), said 
that although they contribute to solving some of the unemployment 
problems, the measures are far from meeting the need to increase 
investment and provide adequate income to workers affected by the 
industrial crisis.  The LA REPUBBLICA article details the following 
provisions of the bill: 

   * "Mobility status" Aid--Supplemental unemployment benefits that 
kick in after the regular, 36-month unemployment benefits run out 
and which are intended to assist unemployed workers in the interim 
between receiving unemployment benefits and pensions, will be 
extended to seven years.  Participation in this "mobility" program 
will be broadened to include the clothing, textile, and building 
industries.  It will also be extended to Fiat's Alfa plant in Arese, 
previously excluded because it was not classed as a company in 
industrial decline. 

   * Unemployment Compensation--The benefit will be raised from 25 
to 30 percent of the salary of the last year of employment and will 
be gradually raised to 40 percent.  The 5 percent raise will be 
accomplished in 1994 in two installments. 

   The IL MESSAGERO article adds details of the following 
provisions: 

   * Unemployment Insurance (Cassa Integrazione)--This benefit will 
be extended to small companies with 15 to 50 employees.  Benefits 
will be increased to 1.5 million lire monthly for employees with 
salaries over 32 million lire per year.  Companies such as Fiat will 
be allowed to use both the unemployment insurance program and 
private company benefits, called "solidarity contracts," which had 
been prohibited by law. 

   * Research and Development--Some 40-50 billion lire have been 
allocated for R&amp;D to boost hiring in technical fields and to improve 

products in order to become more competitive. 

   * Reduced Work Week--Contributions to the unemployment fund will 
be reduced from 0.45 percent to 0.20 percent for those companies 
that adopt flexible or reduced work weeks. (AB)  (Rome IL MESSAGGERO 
in Italian 8 Jan 94 p 12; Rome LA REPUBBLICA in Italian 8 Jan 94 p 
37) 

   CANADA 

   NEW CENTRAL BANK GOVERNOR TAKES OVER--On 1 February, Gordon 
Thiessen, currently holding the second position at the Bank of 
Canada, will replace Bank Governor John Crow.  Commenting on this 
appointment, which was made by new Finance Minister Paul Martin in 
December, LE DEVOIR deputy editor Jean-Robert Sansfacon writes that 
monetary policy may change in the long term but not in the short 
term.  The new Liberal government believes it is possible to 
navigate between price stability and job creation.  Sansfacon argues 
that Martin "is perfectly right" to maintain the goal of keeping 
inflation under 3 percent for the next five years.  At the same 
time, however, "he must not forget another objective, more 
fundamental than price stability: employment."  Sansfacon concludes 
by cautioning Martin that if maintaining inflation below 3 percent 
forces him to raise interest rates to the point of harming 
employment, he should remember that the Conservatives lost the 
October 1993 election over this issue. 

   Commenting on the Thiessen appointment in LE SOLEIL, editor 
Raymond Giroux points out that Martin "had no real choice" but to 
replace Crow "if he wanted to give Canadians the image of a really 
new and credible government."  Although Martin claims "the Bank of 
Canada will not change its monetary policy," Giroux "is willing to 
wager" that the new governor will allow inflation to rise a few 
tenths of a percent during the next several months.  After all, he 
adds, "no economy can really expand without an inflationary push." 
(SK)  (Montreal LE DEVOIR in French 23 Dec 93 p A1) (Quebec LE 
SOLEIL in French 23 Dec 93 p A-8) 

   COMMENTARY ON TRADE MINISTER MCLAREN--In his 11 January column, 
Giles Gherson, national political columnist for GLOBE AND MAIL, 
notes the "hyperactive internationalism" of Trade Minister Roy 
McLaren since assuming office two months ago.  During this time he 
concluded the North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA), 
participated in the completion of the Uruguay Round, traveled to 
Chile to assess the chances for enlarging NAFTA, and prepared for 
next month's visit by his South Korean counterpart with whom McLaren 
wants to negotiate a bilateral Canada-South Korea trade agreement. 
In Gherson's view, the reason behind this "frenetic activism" is the 
"ambitious" minister's desire to prevent Canada from losing trade 
opportunities before a new "super dynamic" World Trade Organization 
(WTO) is in place.  McLaren is quoted as saying that the WTO 
"embodies the realization that trade and investment are global 
activities--and that's new and important."  Furthermore, McLaren 
speculated that as the WTO "is built up and finds its feet," it may 
overtake existing regional trading arrangements.  (SK)  (Toronto THE 
GLOBE AND MAIL in English 11 Jan 94 p A16) 

   FRANCE 

   USTR KANTOR 'THREATENS' EU AUDIOVISUAL POLICY--According to a 
commentary in LE FIGARO, the "threats" by U.S.Trade Representative 
Mickey Kantor to apply trade sanctions against the EU in order to 
open the EU audiovisual market to U.S. products is "proof" that the 
United States wants to stop the EU from revising its audiovisual 
legislation.  A further sign of U.S. intentions was the 11 January 
meeting which brought together two European deputies with Frank 
Tonini--a representative of U.S. film producers' chief Jack Valenti- 
-and John Newbeggin.  Newbeggin is an assistant to David Putnam, 
British film producer and a member of the EU's taskforce on its 
planned audiovisual "green book."  The article contends that this 
"sudden interest" by the United States in European politics is 
taking place at the same time the French Government is lobbying its 
European Union (EU) partners to extend the EU broadcast quota system 
and industry subsidies, and to transfer the legal responsibility for 
TV broadcasting decisions from the broadcasting country to the 
receiving country.  The commentary notes that in shifting legal 
responsibility to the receiving country, such stations as Ted 
Turner's TNT would be inhibited from "inundating" Europe with U.S. 
broadcasts from Britain and U.S. broadcast freedom would be 
affected.  (DiI)  (Paris LE FIGARO Le Fig-Eco supplement in French 
15-16 Jan 94 p VIII) 

   CHINA-U.S. TEXTILE ACCORD IMPACT DISCUSSED--The textile accord 
signed in Beijing between the United States and China limiting the 
growth of Chinese exports to the United States may adversely affect 
the European Union (EU), according to an article in LA TRIBUNE 
DESFOSSES.  The ability of the United States--China's largest 
textile market--to stem the "flood" of Chinese textiles entering 
that country is a "small tour de force" for President Bill Clinton's 
administration which used to advantage the "sensitive" issue of 
China's diverting textile trade through third countries to conclude 
the accord.  The bilateral agreement will allow the United States to 
"impose a new balance" with the Chinese but may also allow it to 
"play the NAFTA card," argues Weil Besancon President Denis Weil. 
"Limiting Chinese textile export growth will allow the United States 
to favor trade relations with Mexico, where wage costs are 
competitive in textile production," Weil adds. 

   While the United States will profit from this agreement, Europe 
may not.  The EU is China's second largest textile market and EU 
industrialists fear the flow of Chinese textiles into the EU will 
accelerate as it diminishes toward the United States.  Such an 
increase would aggravate the trade balance between China and the EU. 
In 1992, the EU had a 29 billion franc (Fr) trade deficit in 
textiles with China; France alone had a deficit of Fr3.2 billion. 
The article also claims the difference in tariffs between the EU and 
China is "flagrant," with the EU tariff at 12 percent on imports 
from China and Chinese tariffs 100 percent on imports from the EU. 
The EU does not yet have the technical means to control its borders 
nor viable statistics to measure the impact of any increase in 
textile imports, according to Thierry Noblot of the Textile 
Industries Union.   (DiI) (Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 20 
Jan 94 p 7) 

   BULL PLAN 'IRRITATES' EU COMMISSION--The French Government's 
delay in communicating its plans to restructure the government- 
controlled Bull computer company "greatly irritates" the EU 
Commission, according to an article in LES ECHOS.  Furthermore, a 
report in LE FIGARO claims the Commission could block the 
government's planned Fr2.5-billion capital increase for Bull because 
of insufficient information about the deal.  The LES ECHOS article 
cites EU Competition Commissioner Karl Van Miert in an interview 
given to the Paris daily LE MONDE as stating that French plans are 
"completely illegal."  Van Miert added, "The French Government 
promised us a restructuring plan for months but nothing has come of 
it.  Meanwhile, competitors in other member states complain.  It has 
put the Commission in an impossible situation.  It can not condone 
more (French Government capital increase) payments (to Bull) and if 
this happens, there should be a hearing at the European Court of 
Justice." 

   Additionally, LES ECHOS reports that the Commission, which claims 
it has only received an "overview" of French Government plans, is 
still reviewing the Fr4 billion that the government paid to Bull in 
1992 as a capital increase and the Fr2.5 billion more supplied by 
the government and co-shareholder France Telecom in February 1993. 
In December 1993, the government supplied Bull with a new tranche of 
Fr4 billion.  "With the new payments forecast for this year, the 
total aid package could reach Fr15 billion," Van Miert claimed, 
noting the case of Air France, which the French Government tried to 
supply with Fr7 billion after having previously given the airline 
Fr1.5 billion.  (DiI)  (Paris LES ECHOS in French 10 Jan 94 p 10; 
Paris LE FIGARO Le Fig-Eco supplement 21 Jan 94 p I) 

   INSEE ON PRIVATIZATION IMPACT ON EMPLOYMENT--If the French 
Government completes its plans to sell off 21 state-owned companies, 
as envisaged in a law passed in 1992, it would affect 668,000 
employees whose jobs would be transferred to the private sector, 
according to the National Institute for Statistics and Economic 
Research (INSEE).  If foreign subsidiaries of these 21 companies are 
taken into consideration, 1,760 companies would be involved in the 
privatization effort which would bring the total number of employees 
affected to 1 million.  If the program is completed, France's public 
sector will be reduced by a third. 

   INSEE reports that at the end of 1992, the government controlled 
1,750 companies and 1.74 million workers--the largest public sector 
in Europe.  In the manufacturing industries, 9 percent of the work 
force would be involved if the privatizations are completed.  In the 
financial industry, the share of government employees will go from 
32 percent to less than 5 percent.  In the future, three quarters of 
government employees will be concentrated in seven large companies 
with a monopolistic character: electricity, gas, and coal companies 
EDF, GDF, and CDF respectively; railroad company SNCF; metro company 
RATP; the Post; and telecommunications company France Telecom. 
INSEE notes that aside from privatizations, layoffs in the public 
sector have affected 43,000 workers in 1992, or 2.4 percent of the 
work force. (DiI)  (Paris LIBERATION in French 11 Jan 94 p 16) 

   PRIVATE YARD TO BUILD NAVY SHIPS--The French Navy will soon ask 
the French Government to order two "assault" ships--new models 
called Nimis (interarmy ships for support missions)--from a civilian 
shipyard an article in LIBERATION claims.  This choice is 
revolutionary because using the private company, the Chantiers de 
l'Atlantique in Saint Nazaire, defies the tradition of constructing 
Navy ships at the government's Department of Naval Construction 
(DCN) facility in Brest.  The DCN's naval yard belongs to the 
Defense Ministry and specializes in research and construction of the 
country's most "important" military ships, employing more than 6,500 
engineers, technicians, and workers.  It had proposed a new type of 
ship for the Navy's needs, the BIP, which was to cost around Fr1.5 
billion.   However, the head of Chantiers de l'Atlantique, Alain 
Grill, offered to build two Nimis for the same price. 

   It will be some time before the government confirms the Navy's 
choice.  It is clear, the article notes, that a "serious naval 
battle" will erupt in the months ahead between these two shipyards. 
The stakes are big since, in addition to a 9-percent subsidy from 
the Ministry of Industry and advanced payments for the equipment, 
they entail in large part the future of the DCN naval yard, which 
will soon run out of new construction orders and if none are 
forthcoming will have to rely on its maintenance contracts to 
survive.  According to the article, the cost of the Nimis was not 
the only factor in the Navy's choice, however.  Military studies 
have all come to the same conclusion that the Nimis, which are not 
built to withstand heavy attack, are what the Navy needs to perform 
"showing the flag" duties rather than the BIP's, more suited for 
warfare.  While the DCN has stated that it is open to adopting new 
forms of manufacturing, it concluded, "if the most complex system 
needed on a ship is air conditioning, this is not our line of work." 
(DiI)  (Paris LIBERATION in French 22, 23 Jan 94 pp 5-6) 

   GERMANY 

   COMMENTATOR SEES RECOVERY PRODUCING CRISIS--Commentator Helmut 
Maier-Mannhart believes that ongoing cost-cutting efforts may enable 
German industry to recover international markets but worries that 
this same development may increase unemployment, leading to a social 
and financial crisis.  Writing in the 14 January Munich SUEDDEUTSCHE 
ZEITUNG, Maier-Mannhart concurs with Baden-Wuerttemberg Economics 
Minister Dieter Spoeri's thesis that German industry's recent 
restructuring efforts will yield a great increase in productivity, 
ultimately yielding substantial improvements in Germany's global 
competitiveness.  As an example of this development, Maier-Mannhart 
points to Volkswagen, where Chairman Ferdinand Piech has managed to 
make his company operate profitably at just 90 percent of capacity, 
rather than the 100 percent previously required.  Maier-Mannhart 
points out, however, that this trend toward "lean production" also 
has a downside:  increased productivity means it takes fewer people 
to turn out the same quantity of a particular product.  On a large 
scale, this means a higher unemployment rate and greater demands on 
public resources to support those thrown out of work.  The expected 
"Renaissance of industry," the author concludes, may thus coincide 
with "a social crisis" and a "state of emergency" in public 
finances.  Maier-Mannhart sees few efforts to come to terms with 
this threat and notes that, in any case, Germany is incapable of 
undertaking the necessary fundamental structural change in a year 
punctuated by so many elections. (RH)  (Munich SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG 
in German 14 Jan 93 p 23) 

   TELEKOM STARTS FIBER OPTIC LINK WITH EAST EUROPE--On 13 January, 
Deutsche Telekom began operating the first section of the Trans 
Europe Line (TEL), a fiber optic network linking Germany and East 
Europe.   According to a Telekom spokesperson, plans call for TEL 
eventually to grow to 14,000 kilometers, a goal which will require 
participating utility companies to invest about 700 million German 
marks (DM).  The initial section, which is about 3,700 kilometers 
long, runs from Frankfurt to Warsaw, Prague, Bratislava, and 
Budapest in the north, with a southern spur extending to Austria, 
Slovenia, and Croatia.  A subsequent phase of the project would 
expand the network to include Lithuania, Belarus, Ukraine, Romania, 
Bulgaria, and Moldova.  Eventual connections to Moscow and Helsinki 
are also envisioned. (RH)  (Munich SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG in German 14 
Jan 94 p 24) 

   HESSE CREATES TECHNOLOGY INNOVATION FOUNDATION--The Land 
Government of Hesse has decided to create a Hessian Technology 
Foundation to promote industrial innovation.  According to Hessian 
Economics Minister Welteke, the foundation is a response to the 
"crisis of innovation" in the economy, the country's lagging 
international competitiveness, and the failure of industry to 
exploit new areas of technology.  According to its constitution, 
which was coordinated with representatives of business, labor, and 
academia, the foundation will work primarily with small businesses. 
The Land of Hesse will provide the foundation with starter capital 
of DM10 million, which is expected to yield DM600,O00 to DM700,0O0 
annually for ongoing operations.  The Hessian Land Development and 
Trust Company, an agency of the Land Government, will manage the 
foundation, freeing up resources which would otherwise be absorbed 
by administrative costs. (RH)  (Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER 
ALLGEMEINE ZEITUNG in German 12 Jan 94 p 5) 

   ITALY 

   3 MILLION NEW JOBS NEEDED BY 2000--On 12 January Labor Minister 
Gino Giugni presented a white paper on employment stating that 3 
million new jobs must be created by the year 2000 to meet current 
and future employment needs.  Giugni claimed that while such a 
statement can be considered "provocative" given that 550,000 jobs 
were lost in 1993 and the ranks of the unemployed grew by 350,000, 
it is "exactly what Italy needs."  This is the case, he added, 
because Italy has high labor costs compared with other 
industrialized countries.  Giugni admitted that creating that many 
new jobs is a "desperate undertaking" and although Italy's GDP is 
expected to increase 3 percent per year during this time, 
realistically only 600,000 jobs can be expected to be created. 
Giugni suggests attacking the problem by providing better education 
and increasing flexibility in the labor market.  He claims that the 
market needs an additional 250,000 high school graduates and 110,000 
university graduates yearly to increase the education level of 
future workers, which is currently among the lowest in Europe.  As 
for flexibility, he suggests that part time work should be 
encouraged, along with employment mobility within industries and 
geographic areas, and that measures be taken to expose the 
underground economy where "millions of the employed are hiding." 
(AB)  (Milan CORRIERE DELLA SERA in Italian 13 Jan p 19) 

   SWEDEN 

   INSTITUTE SAYS FUTURE LOOKING BRIGHTER--According to the latest 
report from the Konjunktur Institut, new industrial orders are 
picking up for the first time in four years, and Swedish industry 
seems to be coming out of the recession.  The 1993 results were 
particularly impressive in the saw mill industry, which has begun to 
reach full capacity.  The construction industry, still suffering 
from decreasing demand, is lagging behind.  Production is responding 
only slowly to increased orders but is expected to pick up in 1994. 
Some industries, especially lumber and electronics, will begin 
hiring additional workers in the first quarter of this year. (WS) 
(Stockholm DAGENS NYHETER in Swedish 12 Jan 94 p C1) 

   ECONOMIC BRIEF 

   France 

   -Telecommunications company Alcatel has announced two new joint 
ventures in China to produce electromagnetic, cable transmission 
equipment; respectively Alcatel of Beijing Transmission Systems, 
Alcatel of Chegdu Communication Systems. . .companies to be equally 
owned by China's Post and Telegraph Ministry, Alcatel China with 
targeted market estimated to be $1 billion over next five years. (LE 
FIGARO 21 Jan 94 p I) 

   Anilla B. (703-733-6285), Robert H. (703-733-6504), Dian I. (703- 
733-6286), Susanne K. (703-733-6285), and Wendy S. (703-733-6506) 
contributed to this Foreign Media Survey. 
ELAG/27 JAN/ECONF/WED/SM 27/1741Z JAN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43218 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000005194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   28 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-012--CHINA 
<H3> <TI>      SPENDING SPREE OF "NEWLY RICH" REFLECTS INCOME DISPARITY, SOCIAL 
PROBLEMS </TI></H3>



</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Recent     Hong Kong and PRC media reporting have contrasted the 
excessive spending habits of newly wealthy individuals on food, 
clothing, entertainment, or expensive private schools, with the 
continuing struggle of people in the poor, remote areas to provide 
for their basic needs.  The lavish life style of the rich appears to 
have contributed to social uneasiness and discontent. 

   An article in the 15 November issue of the Hong Kong monthly TANG 
TAI (CONTEMPORARY) reports that some of the "upstarts" in Shanghai 
show off their wealth by purchasing expensive clothes and other 
things.  Examples cited include a boutique store owner who sold 60 
pieces of fur and leather clothing, ranging in cost from $138 to 
$1,150, in less than a month, a jewelry store which sold a diamond 
ring for over $3,448, and an entrepreneur who had made a fortune in 
the stock market who spent $11,500 on his wedding banquet.  Health 
clubs and golfing have reportedly become popular in the past few 
years with international golf club membership fees rising from 
$20,000 in 1989 to $59,000 in 1992.  Pets have also become a new 
status symbol with a pair of Pekinese recently being sold for 
$7,356, according to the article.  An article in the 18 September 
1993 issue of the Hong Kong monthly NAN PEI CHI (NORTH AND SOUTH 
POLES) reports that a "Dakuan" (nickname for the newly rich people) 
paid $5,747 to a singer for a one-song performance. 

   Luxurious private schools have emerged in the past year as part 
of the spending trend for the rich.  According to a 15 October TANG 
TAI article, nearly 100 "aristocratic schools" were established in 
the past year.  They have swanky offices, modern electronic 
classrooms, libraries with rich collections, indoor and outdoor 
gyms, swimming pools, tennis courts, and music halls.  Teachers' 
salaries reportedly range from $70 to $150 per month.  One example 
of such schools is Beijing Jinghua Elementary School which 
reportedly charges a tuition of over $115 per month per student, 
plus a one-time entrance fee of $3,450. 

   While a small number of teachers enjoy a comfortable income, most 
teachers in public schools have been struggling to make ends meet. 
According to an article in the 8 October issue of Hong Kong PAIHSING 
HSINWEN CHOUAAN (PAIHSING NEWSWEEK), a teacher's salary in the 
countryside averages only $11.50-23 per month.  Even that amount is 
not guaranteed, because many local governments are behind in paying 
their teachers, forcing them to take a second job to support 
themselves.  Beijing GONGREN RIBAO on 29 September cites a teacher 
in a remote mountain area who had to commute a long distance to 
teach two or three different grades of students, and work over 10 
hours a day just to earn 250 jin (=125 kilogram) of potatoes a 
semester which he later sold for $3. 

   The Chinese press notes that the gap between the rich and the 
poor has become so great that it may negatively affect social 
stability.  (Beijing JINGJI RIBAO of 23 September reports some 80 
million people in China are still below the poverty line.) 
According to an article in the 23 August issue of the Beijing 
monthly ZHONGGUO JINGJI TIZHI GAIGE (CHINA'S ECONOMIC STRUCTURE 
REFORM), published by the State Commission for Restructuring the 
Economy, the "wantonly extravagant" life style of a small number of 
people who have used legal or illegal means to gain a windfall has 
"polluted" society, causing strong public resentment.  The paper 
notes that some people have spent $40,230 for a table for 10 at a 
restaurant, or $46,000 for a rare breed of fish, while others go 
gambling, use drugs, or engage prostitutes.  The crime rate has 
reportedly increased and public order has steadily deteriorated. 
According to a 15 December TANG TAI article, from January to June, 
serious criminal cases in Shanghai increased 38.4 percent compared 
to the same period in 1992.  Embezzlement, murder, rape, robbery, 
drug peddling, and prostitution have increasingly been on the rise, 
the article said. 

   (AUTHOR: CHINN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
POL/MIL BRANCH AT (703) 733-6406 
EAG/27JAN/ECONF/CD/SM 27/1758Z JAN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43219 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000005294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   28 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-27JAN94-ISRAEL 
<H3> <TI>      Rabin Still Skeptical of al-Asad's Geneva Statement </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
While     reiterating his desire for a negotiated settlement with 
Syria, Israeli Prime Minister Yitzhaq Rabin continues to evince 
skepticism that Syrian President Hafiz al-Asad's statement 
following his meeting with President Clinton in Geneva on 16 
January signals an easing of Syria's position on a peace 
agreement with Israel.  In a statement broadcast by Israel's Qol 
Yisra'el radio on 24 January, Rabin said that 1994 "will decide 
which direction developments take in the longer run--especially 
with Syria," specifically, "whether there will be peace or 
deadlock and tension."  While the radio quoted Rabin as saying 
that "circumstances give peace a chance," it also reported that 
he told the Knesset Foreign Affairs and Defense Committee that 
Syria's terms for an agreement with Israel had not changed "one 
iota." 

   In a speech in Tel Aviv on 19 January, Rabin similarly declared 
that Syria had not eased it conditions for peace enough to 
satisfy Israel.  While stressing that he believed his government 
has a mandate to negotiate a "territorial compromise" with Syria, 
Rabin added that he "will make absolutely every possible effort" 
to avoid "the price we paid for peace with Egypt," an allusion to 
Syria's demand for full Israeli withdrawal from the Golan 
Heights.  Moreover, he added that he has still "not received any 
definite sign that Syria accepts our definition of peace" and 
that Israel is "far from accepting the full and painful price 
[Syria] is demanding in exchange for peace" (IDF radio). 

   The Israeli Government's pledge on 17 January that an agreement 
with Syria involving significant territorial concessions would be 
submitted to a national referendum (IDF radio) also appeared 
intended in part to signal that Israel has not yet received 
sufficient assurances of Syrian good intentions.  In a statement 
broadcast by Qol Yisra'el on the 18th, Rabin acknowledged that a 
settlement with Syria will require "a painful price from us, 
perhaps even more painful than the Israeli public expects," and 
reportedly added that in such an event it would be necessary to 
"ask the public whether it is willing to pay the price."  He was 
noticeably reserved in commenting on al-Asad's statement in 
Geneva, saying that he "expected more" but is "willing to settle 
for what was publicly said and with what we were briefed on [by 
U.S. officials]" for the sake of "continuing the negotiations." 

(AUTHOR:  MORTON.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH (703) 733-6094.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/CL 28/0031Z JAN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43220 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000004994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   28 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSP 94-02--EAST ASIA 
<H3> <TI>      PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW -- 26 JANUARY 1994 </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
JAPAN:     Economic Trends -- FEATURE: Report Assesses Consumer 
Impact of Government Regulations;  MOF Makes It Easier for Consumers 
To Monitor Prices of Imported Goods 

   Environmental Issues: STA To Begin Underwater Cable Project To 
Track Seismic Activity; KEPCO, TEPCO To Provide Environmental Know- 
how To India 

   Financial Issues: FEATURE: Japanese Banks Have 'Asia Fever'; 
FEATURE: Housing Lenders' Delinquencies Threaten Financial System 

   Foreign Trade and Investment:  CHINA:  Secom Forms Security 
Services Joint Venture in Dalian 

   NORTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Police Raid Firms Suspected of Illegal 
Exports 

   Machine Tools/Robotics:  MT Association Committee To Study 
Industry Reorganization; Yamazaki Mazak To Quadruple Its MT Product 
Line; Mori Seiki Strengthening Presence in Europe; Toyoda Machine 
Works Halts MT Production in U.S.; Tsugami To Shift MT Parts 
Production to Subsidiaries; Dijet Industrial Downgrades 43 Executive 
Positions; November MT Sales Fell 27.2 Percent, Remain at Low Level 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics:  NEC To Mass Produce Logic 
Semiconductors With 0.35 Micron Geometries; Fujitsu Attempting To 
Seize Lead in Logic Chip Production; Imports of South Korean 
Semiconductors Surge 

   Telecommunications/Satellites: NEC To Shift Production of SONET 
System Equipment to U.S.; NEC, Fujitsu Target U.S. Market For ATM 
Switching Equipment; Sanyo, Northern Telecom To Market Multimedia 
Products in Canada 

   CHINA: Domestic Developments -- Twenty State Enterprises To List 
on Hong Kong Bourse in 1994; Shanghai's Private Economy Outstrips 
Overall Economy; Registered Company Start-Ups in Shanghai Increase 
153 Percent; CElTIC To Move Gold, Foreign Currency Focus to 
Shanghai; Hunan Launches 23 High-Tech Projects in 1993; Growth in 
Individual, Private Economic Sectors in Yunnan Reported 

   Foreign Trade and Investment:  Japanese Rank First Among Foreign 
Investors in Hong Kong; Capital Steel Seeks Hong Kong Funding for 
Shandong Plant; Hong Kong-Based Firm Invests in Guangzhou Steel 
Mill; Burmah Castrol, Shenzhen Jinke To Establish Joint Venture; UK 
Firm To Establish Video-Conferencing Facilities in Hubei; Swiss 
Pharmaceutical Firm Plans $30 Million Factory in Shanghai; Shandong 
Approval of Taiwan-Invested Projects Up 180 Percent in 1993 
   Taiwan:  Lowest Trade Surplus in 10 Years Reported; Procedures 
for Foreign Investment To Be Simplified; Survey Shows Over 30 
Countries Impose Trade Barriers on Taiwan; Labor Productivity Growth 
Expected To Show Decline for 1993; Minister on World Economic Blocs, 
Future Trade Focus; Cross-Strait Trade Expected To Total $20 Billion 
in 1994; Company To Examine Tenders for Nuclear Power Plant No. 4; 
Relief Measures Drafted To Help Industries Hit by Imported Goods; 
Export Growth, Industrial Output Projections Reported; Export 
Exchange Earnings for December Reach Record High 

   NORTH KOREA:  Light Industry To Focus on Production, Quality 
Control Goals 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Business Plans of Major Conglomerates for 
1994 Highlighted; FEATURE:  S and T 1994 Budget, S and T 
Accomplishments for 1993 Reported; FEATURE:  Record Sales, Profits 
Reported for Electronics in 1993; FEATURE:  Intelligence Agency 
Emphasizing Industrial Espionage; FEATURE: Press View Developments 
in ROK-Vietnam Trade; Research Institutes Raise 1994 Growth Rate 
Estimates; Rail Car Orders Expected To Drop 34.5 Percent in 1994; 
ROK To Switch to Metric System for Measuring Rice, Barley; New 
Center To Promote Design, Manufacture of ASIC's; Ministries Funding 
Development of 256M DRAM; Daewoo To Establish Aviation Technology 
Research Center in Russia; Euro-Asia Business Center To Be 
Established in Amsterdam; Daewoo To Invest in Auto Joint Venture in 
Romania; Kia To Assemble Cars in Pakistan; Hyundai Motors To 
Manufacture Cars in Egypt; Samsung To Build TV Parts Plant in 
Mexico; HalIa Group To Export Cement Plant to Papua New Guinea 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA:  INDONESIA -- Minister Comments on Unemployment 
Rate; Economist Estimates 5.7-Percent Growth for 1994; Habibie 
Seeking Consortium To Produce 'People's Car'; Companies Interested 
in Setting Up Telecommunication Network; ADB Approves Loan for 
Eastern Islands 

   MALAYSIA: High-Technology Cooperation With Indonesia Planned 

   PHILIPPINES:  Brownouts in Manila To Continue in 1994 

   THAILAND: Government Approves Financial Liberalization for 
Offshore Banking; New Measures To Promote Greater Capital Outflow; 
Lower Tariffs Approved for Nonferrous Metal Products, Devices 

   VIETNAM:  Foreign Investment Projects Licensed in 1993 Listed; 
Investor Countries in 1993 Reported; Auto Assembly Venture With 
Daewoo Licensed; Workers at Foreign-Invested Firms Reportedly 
Underpaid; Foreign Firms Plan To Manufacture, Assemble Cars in 
Vietnam; Increase in 1993 Foreign Investments Reported; Ship Repair 
Joint Venture Established; Foreign Investment in Dong Nai Province 
Reported; Taiwanese, French Firms To Help Build Refinery; Increase 
in Ho Chi Minh City Private Sector Output Reported; Hanoi Industrial 
Sector Marks 22.7-Percent Increase; Bank of Commerce and Industry 
Begins New Service; Shipping Firm Signs Contracts With Japan, ROK; 
Construction Begins on Joint Venture Hotel; 'Cost-and- Freight' 
Crude Oil Export Noted; Power Supply for Southern Provinces 
Increases; Three Foreign Investment Projects Approved 

   Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-02) 

   JAPAN:  Economic Trends -- FEATURE:  Report Assesses Consumer 
Impact of Government Regulations -- SUMMARY:  According to a report 
written by the Daiwa Research Institute (DRI), prices in Japan for 
public utilities, transportation, food, and gasoline--all industries 
protected by government regulations--are much higher than prices in 
the United States, while the prices of automobiles and electrical 
machinery--industries which are not regulated--are roughly 
comparable or lower.  The report urges deregulation to eliminate 
price differences and to realize Japan's full growth potential. 
Also, in an article published on 24 December, Seiji Shimpo, a 
Ministry of Finance (MOF) economist, urges deregulation so that 
Japan can harmonize its economy with the world economy "if it is to 
survive." 

   To analyze the difference between Japanese and U.S. consumer 
prices, the DRI surveyed the prices of 23 items in various 
industrial categories in both countries between August and November 
1993, according to a DRI report published in the 18 December issue 
of SHUKAN TOYO KEIZAI, a leading business weekly.  At an exchange 
rate of 107 yen to the dollar, Japanese prices are from 1.1 to 2.0 
times higher than U.S. prices.  Even using the 1992 OECD purchasing 
power rate of 190 yen to the dollar, Japanese prices are 0.6 to 1.5 
times higher than U.S  prices. 

   Based on the survey, the DRI calculated "parity exchange rates" 
for each of the 23 items.  They range from 1,180 yen to $1 for 
wheat, 700 yen per $1 for gasoline, 540 yen for butter, 290 yen for 
long-distance telephone calls and electricity, 135 yen for 
automobiles, 120 yen for audio-visual equipment, and 50 yen for 
pharmaceutical products sold to hospitals. 

   Big Price Disparities Due to Productivity Differences -- The DRI 
report points out that price differences among Japanese goods and 
services caused by differences in productivity are "far greater" 
than differences between foreign and domestic prices, which are 
mainly caused by a "strong yen that does not reflect actual 
purchasing power."  Those items whose Japanese prices are higher 
than U.S. prices, based on either the current yen to dollar rate 
(107:1) or the OECD's 190:1 rate, or the purchasing power rate 
are foodstuffs, petroleum products, public utilities, housing, 
apparel, and polyethylene, products which are for the most part are 
regulated by the government and "whose productivity is low." 

   In the case of automobiles, audio-visual equipment, ethylene, 
steel, copper, high-quality paper, and oil tankers, whose production 
is not regulated by the government and which are manufactured in 
highly productive processes, Japanese prices are still slightly 
higher based on the current exchange rate, but would be lower based 
on a purchasing power rate. 

   According to the report, pharmaceutical products sold to 
hospitals are the only items whose prices are "remarkably" lower 
based on either the current or purchasing power rate.  The report 
notes, however, that since Japanese doctors and hospitals tend to 
prescribe "excessive quantities" of drugs, consumers end up paying 
much money for drugs. 

   Prices Remain High Even Though Yen Has Appreciated -- Concerning 
manufactured and processed goods other than dairy products, 
textiles, color television sets, and semiconductors, domestic prices 
have not come down even though the yen started appreciating in 1985. 
The primary reason, according to the DRI report, is that Japanese 
imports have not increased sufficiently to cause domestic prices to 
drop.  The report explains that government regulations, standards 
and certification systems, and a variety of Japanese business 
practices work to prevent foreign products, whose prices have 
dropped due to the strong yen, "from gaining market share in Japan." 
The report argues that because of such barriers, the "commonly 
understood logic" that yen appreciation will lead to increased 
imports, which in turn will promote competition in the Japanese 
market, increase Japanese productivity, and lower prices, "does not 
work in Japan." 

   Concerning services, such as public utilities, distribution, and 
personal services, the report adds that Japanese prices have 
remained basically the same regardless of the exchange rate, because 
the exchange rate does not affect "competitive conditions" in these 
industries. 

   Deregulation Urged To Realize Full Growth Potential -- The report 
urges deregulation measures be adopted by the government to raise 
productivity in protected industries and eliminate price 
differences.  The report claims that the automobile and electronics 
industries, which have led Japan's exports and contributed to its 
economic growth, are not regulated and therefore have achieved high 
productivity and international competitiveness in the face of 
"severe competition."  In the public utilities, communications, 
food, and petroleum industries, on the other hand, protection by 
government regulations has kept both productivity and 
competitiveness low. 

   The DRI concludes that when the government deregulates the 
protected industries to raise their productivity to U.S. levels, 
Japan's gross domestic product (GDP) would be 10 percent, or 45 
trillion yen ($421 billion), higher than if no deregulation occurs 
in the next 10 years.  It also notes that when productivity is 
raised by deregulation, approximately 6.4 million workers, or about 
10 percent of the total labor force, will become "surplus." 

   MOF Economist Urges Deregulation To Help Japan's Economic 
Recovery -- In an article published in the 24 December NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN (NIKKEI), Seiji Shimpo, deputy director of Ministry of 
Finance's (MOF) Institute of Fiscal and Monetary Policy, argues that 
Japan should implement deregulation for two basic reasons: 1) 
Japan's system must be "compatible" with those of other 
industrialized countries; and 2) Japan needs to expand opportunities 
for new businesses "to escape the current recession."  Shimpo notes 
that contrary to the international trend toward deregulation 
following the collapse of the planned economies, "the number of 
regulations has been increasing in Japan."  In 1987, for example, 
40.1 percent of Japan's gross domestic product (GDP) was produced by 
industries that are "regulated to some extent," and 21.8 percent of 
GDP was produced by industries that are "tightly regulated."  In 
1989, these percentages increased to 40.8 percent and 24.1 percent 
respectively. 

   In addition to intense lobbying by interest groups, Shimpo points 
out that the value Japanese place on "coexistence" and "harmony" is 
an obstacle to deregulation.  Shimpo rejects the Federation of 
Economic Organizations' (Keidanren) policy of "coexistence" (kyosei) 
by asking why consumers want "inefficient firms" and "incompetent 
managers" to coexist.  Shimpo notes that the government, Keidanren, 
and even the media have a perception that government guidance and 
the observance of guidance by industry are "ethical."  In the same 
vein, "order" and "mutual assistance" among companies in an industry 
are "virtues."  Shimpo asserts that all this contradicts the 
principle of competition upon which market capitalism is founded. 
The Japanese people should remember, he observes, that the basic 
factor generating economic development in Japan has been "market 
competition," not government regulation. 

   Shimpo is critical of Japan's media for tending to report 
economic issues in a manner that appeals to the "heart" rather than 
the "mind" of readers.  This helps "the so-called revisionists in 
the United States" justify their calls for discrimination against 
Japan in international trade by highlighting "alleged differences" 
between Japan and the other industrialized nations.  Shimpo asserts 
that it is Japan's responsibility "to prove that the revisionists 
are wrong" by reforming Japan's economic society. 
   In conclusion, Shimpo restates his view that deregulation is an 
"unavoidable step in harmonizing the Japanese economy with the world 
economy, from which Japan cannot be isolated if it is to survive." 
He urges politicians to "institutionalize the economic logic and 
analyses of deregulation" that have been recommended by economists. 

   MOF Makes It Easier for Consumers To Monitor Prices of Imported 
Goods -- As part of the Hosokawa cabinet's policy of sharing the 
benefits of the current strong yen with consumers, the Ministry of 
Finance (MOF) published in the November issue of FINANCE, the 
ministry's monthly journal, a report on the custom clearance prices 
of "30 consumer products" imported in September 1993.  The MOF 
selected 30 consumer goods which it considers of "the highest 
interest" to consumers and, for the first time, published their 
prices separately from the detailed custom clearance data appearing 
in its monthly trade statistics. 

   According to the report, the import prices for 25 of the 30 
products dropped compared to September 1992, ranging from a 43- 
percent drop in the price of bananas, a 38.7-percent decline in the 
price of Italian dress shirts, a 5.6-percent drop for U.S. 
cigarettes, and a 4.5-percent drop for Scotch whisky.  The weighted 
average of the 30 custom clearance prices dropped 14.8 percent 
compared to September 1992.  The report concludes that the primary 
cause for the drop in import prices is the appreciation of the yen, 
which has appreciated by 16.1 percent, from 124 yen per dollar in 
September 1992 to 104 in September 1993.  The report notes that some 
of the goods were paid for in currencies other than the U.S. dollar. 
For example, English tea was priced in British pounds, which 
depreciated about 30 percent against the yen, and Italian dress 
shirts were priced in Italian lira, which depreciated about 42 
percent against the yen.  Some goods were contracted for in yen, 
such as frozen tuna, American beer and cigarettes, and German 
automobiles, and their import prices "were not affected by the 
foreign exchange rate." 

   The MOF report also contains Tokyo retail prices compiled by the 
Economic Planning Agency (EPA) as of October 1993 for 20 of the 30 
imported consumer goods.  The MOF claims that by comparing retail 
prices continuously, everyone will see the extent to which the 
benefits of a strong yen are distributed.  The MOF urges consumers 
to "strictly monitor" trends in import and retail prices. 

   According to the EPA data contained in the MOF report, the Tokyo 
retail prices of the 20 imported products "rarely reflect" the 
decreases in import prices.  For example, the custom clearance price 
of Italian spaghetti dropped 35.7 percent, while the retail price 
dropped only 4.1 percent, and the custom clearance price of U.S. 
golf balls dropped 10.3 percent, but the retail price rose 1.0 
percent.  Of 16 imported consumer goods whose custom clearance 
prices had fallen, the retail prices of 13 goods dropped; two (U.S. 
beer and U.S. cigarettes) remained the same; and one (U.S. golf 
balls) rose.  Of the four products whose custom clearance prices had 
risen, the retail prices of two (oranges and tennis rackets) 
dropped, while two (EC-made electric shavers and lemons) rose. 

   Environmental Issues:  STA To Begin Underwater Cable Project To 
Track Seismic Activity -- The Science and Technology Agency (STA) 
this year will begin a 10-year project to lay an underwater fiber 
optic cable, fitted with seismometers, around the Japanese 
archipelago as part of a comprehensive marine environmental 
observation network to track and monitor undersea seismic activity. 
Basically the STA will use the fiber optic network in place of 
observation vessels and submarines to detect earthquakes and tidal 
waves and to provide timely, detailed information on their scale and 
potential impact.  The STA also hopes to attach other sensors to the 
fiber optic cable to measure underwater temperatures, ocean 
currents, and earth plate and volcanic activity, as well as to 
collect data on the levels of carbon dioxide in sea water for 
research on global warming.  The research results gained from the 
project will also be used to develop technology for using the 
optical fiber itself as a type of thermometer. 

   Twenty public and private enterprises will participate in the STA 
project, including research organizations of the Ministry of 
International Trade and Industry and the Ministry of Transport, 
Tokyo University, NEC, Mitsubishi Heavy Industries, and Oki Electric 
Industry.  The STA will spend the first five years of the project 
developing the basic technology related to the seismometers and 
developing methods to transmit the data.  Then the agency will begin 
laying the fiber optic cable off the Japanese islands and later at 
deeper levels, closer to submarine trenches.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 4 Jan 94 p 1) 

   KEPCO, TEPCO To Provide Environmental Know-how To India -- Kansai 
Electric Power Co. (KEPCO) and Tokyo Electric Power Co. (TEPCO) will 
provide environmental technology and know-how to the nine thermal 
power plants in India with a total generating capacity of 18.2 
million kilowatts. The two companies will work with the public 
thermal power companies which manage the plants as part of an 
agreement reached at a 1992 meeting of power company executives from 
throughout the world. 

   KEPCO will transfer its environmental technology and plant 
management know-how to control sulfur oxide and nitrogen oxide 
emissions.  TEPCO will provide guidance on improving the fuel 
efficiency of boilers to reduce the amount of coal consumed, and 
also will instruct the companies on reducing and controlling the 
volume of gas emissions from their thermal power plants.  (Tokyo 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 4 Jan 94 p 11) 

   Financial Issues:  FEATURE:  Japanese Banks Have 'Asia Fever' -- 
SUMMARY:  According to the Japanese press, Japanese banks are making 
a special effort to penetrate financial markets in Thailand, 
Malaysia, and China. 

   The 7 December MAINICHI SHIMBUN reports that presently there are 
18 Japanese banks in Thailand, including six that opened branches in 
Bangkok in 1993--Industrial Bank of Japan (IBJ), Long-Term Credit 
Bank of Japan (LTCB), Sumitomo Bank, Mitsubishi Bank, Dai-Ichi 
Kangyo Bank (DKB), and Sanwa Bank--and two that established 
representative offices there in 1993, Bank of Fukuoka and Sumitomo 
Trust Bank.  The banks are reportedly responding to the Thai 
government's financial liberalization policy and promotion of 
offshore markets.  According to one Japanese branch manager in 
Thailand, "the rate of profit at Thai branches is first or second 
among our branches worldwide."  The banks say that their objective 
in going into Thailand is to supply Japanese companies with funds to 
expand their operations there. 

   Meanwhile in Malaysia, according to the MAINICHI, Japanese banks 
are participating in creating an international financial center 
(kokusai kinyu center) on Labuan Island, an offshore market located 
in the north of Borneo.  DKB and Sanwa opened branches there in 
November 1993 while IBJ and Sakura were scheduled to follow suit in 
December. 

   In addition, the 17 January NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN reports that the 
Singapore branches of DKB, Sumitomo, Tokai Bank, and IBJ have 
formally agreed to provide $250 million to the Malaysia Highway 
Authority (Malaysia Kosokudorocho) in cooperation with two Malaysian 
commercial banks.  The loan will be registered in an account in the 
Labuan market.  The Malaysian government has been promoting the 
Labuan market for the past few years, but by year-end 1992 its 
outstanding transaction balance was only $1 billion. The recent loan 
by the Japanese banks is the largest since they began entering that 
market in the spring of 1993.  Malaysia expects the Japanese banks 
to be the driving force behind the growth of the Labuan market. 

   Banks Financing Hong Kong Real Estate Development -- Major 
commercial and long-term credit banks are stepping up real-estate- 
related financing in Hong Kong, according to the 3 January NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  In September 1993, the Bank of Tokyo, 
Fuji, Sanwa, Sumitomo and LTCB syndicated a loan amounting to 
HK$2.65 billion (roughly $343.3 million) to Cheung Kong (Holdings) 
Ltd., a large Hong Kong real estate developer.  In addition, 
Mitsubishi Bank and Sumitomo, among others,  provided funding to Sun 
Hung Kai Properties, another major real estate developer, when it 
raised HK$900 million (roughly $116.8 million) to renovate office 
buildings. 

   According to NIKKEI, in Hong Kong, which is considered the 
gateway to investment in China, the demand for office buildings and 
housing continues to grow while prices continue to rise.  Hong 
Kong's large corporations rely largely on Japanese banks for 
financing in the competitive real-estate development market. 

   MOF Appeals to Chinese Government on Behalf of Japanese Banks -- 
The Ministry of Finance (MOF) is reportedly asking the Chinese 
government to allow Japanese banks to deal in the Chinese yuan. 
According to the 15 January NIKKEI, currently, it does not allow 
foreign banks to deal in yuan. Thus, Japanese banks can only make 
loans and conduct foreign exchange in dollars or yen, while Japanese 
companies in China, as a result of a revision in the foreign 
exchange system on 1 January, are prohibited from holding or using 
anything but the yuan.  Consequently, Japanese banks cannot satisfy 
the need of Japanese companies for interim operational funds. 

   NIKKEI reports, by the end of 1993, 10 Japanese banks had opened 
17 branches and 54 representative offices in China in response to 
the government's reform and liberalization policy begun in the late 
l97Os.  But foreign banks are concerned that the recent revision of 
China's foreign exchange system will be a major hindrance to their 
business there.  Upon appeals from the banks, MOP has "unofficially" 
started working on getting authorization from the Chinese government 
for the banks to deal in yuan. MOF's goal is not only to promote 
penetration by Japanese banks into the Chinese market but also 
indirectly to assist Japanese companies to invest there. 

   FEATURE:  Housing Lenders' Delinquencies Threaten Financial 
System -- SUMMARY:  Japan's housing loan corporations continue to 
pose a major threat to the stability of the financial system, 
according to press reports. Although virtually all of these 
corporations implemented restructuring plans in the spring of 1993, 
because of the sluggish real estate market and the erosion of their 
traditional lending market by other banks and the government-run 
Housing Loan Corporation (HLC), the housing lenders are reportedly 
straining the major financial institutions that founded them. 

   A total of eight housing loan corporations were established 
jointly by banks, securities firms, and insurance companies between 
1971 and 1979 in conjunction with the government's policy to improve 
housing opportunities, according to the 15 March KINYU ZAISEI JIJO, 
a financial weekly.  There is also a government-run housing lender, 
the HLC, which is under the joint jurisdiction of the Ministry of 
Finance (MOF) and the Ministry of Construction (MOC).  The eight 
corporations and their parent companies are as follows: 


Housing Lender        Founded  Founding Parent Institutions 
Nippon Housing Loan    1971  Nine commercial, trust, and regional 
   Co.                          banks, including Sanwa, Sakura, and 
                                Daiwa 
Juso Inc.              1971  Seven trust banks 
Housing Loan Service   1971  Seven commercial banks 
   Co. 
Sogo Jukin Co.         1972  Second-tier regional banks 
Dai-Ichi Housing       1975  LTCB and Nomura Securities, among 
others 
   Loan Co. 
Chigin-Seiho Housing   1976  First-tier regional banks, insurance 
   Loan Co.                     firms 
Japan Housing Loan     1976  IBJ, Nippon Credit Bank 
   Inc. 
Kyodo-Jutaku Loan      1979  Central Bank for Agriculture and 
                                Forestry 



   During the 1970s, the private housing lenders experienced double- 
digit growth, both in terms of the number and total amount of loans 
extended.  In the l98Os however, their position gave way to the 
banks and the HLC, which gradually assumed larger portions of their 
traditional home mortgage market, according to the 5 July 1993 
NIKKEI BUSINESS.  Subsidized by the national treasury, the HLC can 
lend at rates nearly 3 percent lower than those charged by the 
private housing lenders.  In addition, its requirements ensure that 
it makes only "relatively good loans," prompting charges from the 
private lenders that the HLC "grabs only the best."  As of FY92, the 
HLC's share of new housing loans was 32.9 percent.  The 29 December 
NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN reports that new lending by the HLC in the 
second quarter of FY93 increased 13.8 percent over the previous 
quarter. 

   To compensate for their diminished market share, NIKKEI BUSINESS 
observes, the housing lenders began to finance commercial real 
estate deals.  A Bank of Japan executive reportedly states that "one 
reason the private housing lenders rushed into high-risk real estate 
lending is that choice properties were taken by the HLC."  But the 
number of bankrupt commercial borrowers is increasing, along with 
the amount of nonperforming loans. 

   Housing Lenders Are 'Dead,' Despite Restructuring -- According to 
the 28 December MAINICHI SHIMBUN, seven of the eight housing lenders 
(Kyodo Jutaku did not participate) conferred with the MOF and the 
financial community in the spring of 1993 over a 10-year 
restructuring plan led by their parent banks.  As of the end of 
March 1993, three of the eight companies--Chigin-Seiho, Sogo Jukin, 
and Juso--were insolvent.  According to the restructuring plan, the 
parent banks stopped charging interest on existing loans to the 
housing lenders, other financial institutions reduced their interest 
rates to 2.5 percent annually, and financial institutions affiliated 
with the Central Bank for Agriculture and Forestry (CBAF) reduced 
their loan interest rate to 4.5 percent annually. 

   In addition, MAINICHI reports, financial institutions extended 
about 150 billion yen ($1.364 billion) in new funding to the seven 
housing lenders during the first half of FY93 as part of this "life- 
support policy."  The outstanding balance of loans payable by the 
housing lenders totaled 12.86 trillion yen ($116.9 billion) as of 
the end of September 1993, broken down as follows (figures are in 
billions of yen--I billion yen equals $9.09 million--except the 
"Total" column, where the yen figures are in trillions and the 
dollar equivalents are in billions; LTCB denotes long-term credit 
banks): 


   Loans Owed by Housing Lenders as of September 1993 by Lending 
Sector --       Commercial LTCB  Trust CBAF-      Other     Totals 
               Banks            Banks  Affiliated Instit.(tr Y/$bil) 

Nippon 
Housing         694      281    167    892        304      2.34  $21 
Juso Inc.       70       121    903    777        148      2.02  $18 
Housing Loan 
 Service        391       89    151    861        193      1.69  $15 
Sogo Jukin Co.  31       176    126    735        338      1.41  $13 
Dai-Ichi 
 Housing        80       220    369    877        250      1.80  $16 
Chigin-Seiho    73        32     54    460        573      1.20  $11 
Japan Housing   113      543    336    993        422      2.41  $22 

Totals          1,454     1,463        2,107 5,597        2,236 
12.86 
$117 



   As part of the restructuring plan, it was agreed that the new 
loans to the housing lenders would not be classified as 
"nonperforming assets" in the banks' financial statements, according 
to MAINICHI SHIMBUN.    "Officially" the nonperforming assets of 
Japan's 21 major commercial, long-term credit, and trust banks 
totaled 13.75 trillion yen ($125 billion) as of the end of September 
1993, but if the roughly 5 trillion yen ($45.45 billion) in loans 
extended to the housing lenders are included in the banks' 
nonperforming loan total, the figure comes to almost 19 trillion yen 
($172 billion). 

   In addition, the 21 January 1994 CHUNICHI SHIMBUN reports that 
the September 1993 balance of nonperforming assets held by the seven 
housing lenders increased by about 630 billion yen ($5.727 billion), 
or 13 percent, during the first half of FY93.  Totaling 5.21 
trillion yen ($47.3 billion), the nonperforming loans constitute 46 
percent of the seven lenders' total loans receivable.  Nippon 
Housing holds the largest amount of nonperforming assets, about 1.1 
trillion yen ($10 billion), while another private lender, the 
Housing Loan Service, holds the greatest proportion of nonperforming 
assets to total loans receivable, at 65 percent. 

   Commenting on the restructuring plan, an executive of a major 
commercial bank states that "essentially the seven housing lenders 
are dead," despite the plan, according to the MAINICHI article. 

   Ultimately, the MOF envisions that the housing loan sector will 
shrink from the current eight housing loan corporations to two or 
three, according to the 8 January SANKEI SHIMBUN.  The paper points 
out that many in the financial community view the original 
restructuring plan simply as a means to "postpone the issue" of 
dealing with the housing lenders.  The 12 December NIKKEI KINYU 
SHIMBUN reports that some sources in the financial community predict 
that the whole system of assistance to the housing lenders "will 
fall apart by March 1994, or at the latest, by September 1994." 

   Foreign Trade and Investment:  CHINA -- Secom Forms Security 
Services Joint Venture in Dalian -- Secom Co., a major Japanese 
security services company, will begin a security-services business 
in Dalian in May.  Secom's holding company, Secom (China) Company 
Ltd., headquartered in Beijing, and the Dalian Huaxing Import-Export 
Company, a general trading company owned by the city of Dalian, have 
formed a joint venture (JV) company to provide online electronic 
security services to banks, factories, and office buildings in 
Dalian.  The JV will be capitalized at $2 million, with Secom 
(China) investing 80 percent and Dalian Huaxing 20 percent. 
The joint venture will connect customers with online sensors, 
which can detect and report intruders and equipment malfunctions, 
whereupon security personnel or engineers, on duty 24-hours a day, 
will be dispatched to check out the problem.  Secom expects the 
demand for this kind of service, which costs less than having 
security guards stationed at each site, to increase greatly in 
China.  Later it will extend this type of service to other cities 
with adequate telecommunications infrastructures, such as Beijing 
and Shanghai.  So far Secom and the general trading company Itochu 
are the only Japanese firms to have holding companies in China. 
(Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 6 Jan 94 p 10) 

   NORTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Police Raid Firms Suspected of Illegal 
Exports -- SUMMARY:  According to the Japanese press, the Tokyo 
Metropolitan Police (TMP) raided the offices of several Japanese 
companies and the homes of company executives for suspected illegal 
exports of high-performance spectrum analyzers to North Korea in 
1989.  Export of these instruments is restricted under Coordinating 
Committee for Multilateral Export Controls (COCOM) rules and 
Japanese law.  Several papers speculate that the analyzers might 
have been used by North Korea to develop its "Nodong I" missile. 

   According to the 14 January evening editions of several Japanese 
newspapers, the TMP Public Security Department on 14 January raided 
several firms and their executives' homes concerning sale of the 
spectrum analyzers, whose export would be a violation of Japan's 
Foreign Exchange and Trade Control Law.  The TMP suspects that three 
high-performance spectrum analyzers manufactured by Anritsu 
Corporation, and which were on the COCOM restricted list, were 
exported to North Korea by Yokohama Machinery Trading Company via 
China in January and March 1989.  The firms searched by the TMP 
included Anritsu in Tokyo, and Yokohama Machinery Trading and Fuji 
Trading in Yokohama. 

   The 15 January NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN, YOMIURI SHIMBUN, and NHK TV 
NEWS (which is in the Nikkei Telecom database) all report that the 
TMP suspects the three analyzers were exported to North Korea after 
being passed through various trading companies in Japan and via 
China to conceal the illegality of the transaction.  According to 
the papers, the three analyzers were sold for 3 million yen 
($27,300) each by Anritsu to a trading company in Tokyo specializing 
in trade with China, resold to another unidentified trading company, 
and then sold to Yokohama Machinery Trading.  Yokohama Machinery 
Trading is suspected of having exported the analyzers first to China 
and then to North Korea without proper documentation.  According to 
the papers, Anritsu claims that it warned the trading company in 
Tokyo that the analyzers were on the COCOM restricted list.  Anritsu 
has denied knowing they were diverted to North Korea. 

   Two Yokohama Firms Implicated in Diversion -- The 14 January 
YOMIURI SHIMBUN reports that Yokohama Machinery Trading and Fuji 
Trading are small companies in Yokohama with capital of 1 million 
yen ($9,090) each, with three or four employees.  Both companies are 
managed by the same president, Masahiko Kondo, and are located in 
the same building.  They export plastic molding machinery, used 
cars, and electrical machines exclusively to China, Vietnam, and 
North Korea.  YOMIURI reports that Yokohama Machinery Trading once 
had representative offices in North Korea and Beijing.  According to 
the 15 January SANKEI SHIMBUN, the TMP obtained documents revealing 
that employees of Yokohama Machinery Trading and Fuji Trading had 
traveled to North Korea via China several times in the past for 
"business negotiations." 

   Anritsu, the manufacturer of the spectrum analyzers, is a major 
testing and measurement equipment manufacturer headquartered in 
Tokyo.  According to the 14 January YOMIURI, Anritsu sells cable and 
radio communications equipment and measurement equipment to the 
Japan Defense Agency (JDA). 

   MITI Surprised, MOFA Not Concerned About U.S. Reaction -- 
According to the 14 January evening editions of SANKEI SHIMBUN and 
other Tokyo papers, the Export Division of the International Trade 
Bureau of the Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI), 
which administers COCOM-related issues, does not appear to have 
known about the case.  MITI officials were surprised by the news and 
were "busy in emergency meetings all day," SANKEI SHIMBUN reports. 
MITI Minister Hiroshi Kumagai said in a press conference on 14 
January that he had not been briefed, but instructed MITI officials 
to investigate the case and to come up with countermeasures as soon 
as possible. 

   According to the 15 January NHK TV NEWS, a source in the Ministry 
of Foreign Affairs (MOFA) commented that "unlike the Toshiba Machine 
Case of 1987, where Toshiba Machine exported advanced milling 
machines to the then Soviet Union and allegedly helped the Soviets 
improve their submarines," this case would "not directly threaten 
U.S. national security," and therefore "the United States had not 
reacted so much to the case." 

   JDA Concerned Over Suspected Use to Develop Missile -- The 14 
January evening edition of YOMIURI SHIMBUN and other papers comment 
that the spectrum analyzers illegally exported to North Korea in 
1989 "may have been used by North Korea to develop Nodong I 
missiles."  According to YOMIURI, defense sources are "gravely 
concerned" about the case, stating that Nodong I missiles would be a 
considerable threat to Japan, since all of Japan's territory would 
be within the range of Nodong missiles if they are deployed.  A JDA 
source commented to YOMIURI that "if the spectrum analyzers were 
used to develop the Nodong I, they must have been used to analyze 
engine vibrations and flight patterns." 

   Also according to the 14 January YOMIURI, the TMP Public Security 
Department commented that the analyzers would be effective devices 
to help develop "electrical parts of a control system for nuclear 
reactors." 

   Machine Tools/Robotics:  MT Association Committee To Study 
Industry Reorganization -- The Japan Machine Tool Builders' 
Association (JMTBA) has established an ad hoc committee to study the 
supply and demand situation in the machine tool (MT) industry.  Some 
industry observers believe the formation of the committee could 
initiate negotiations on "cooperation" within the industry.  The 
committee is expected to calculate an appropriate workforce size for 
the industry based on the supply and demand projections and 
production capacities of all companies.  Goro Tejima, chairman of 
the committee, who is also JMTBA chairman and president of Hitachi 
Seiki, observes:  "The MT industry is facing its biggest crisis 
since the end of the war.  Even now we are planning for orderly 
competition and cooperation."  Others in the industry believe that 
for a debate on reorganizing the industry to begin, "talks on 
cooperation by all industry colleagues must emerge through this 
committee." 

   The committee is to issue "guidelines" for the industry's medium- 
term prospects to the Ministry of International Trade and Industry 
(MITI) by the end of February 1994.  The MITI bureau responsible for 
the MT industry has stated that "we will accept the report from the 
committee, and we hope that the companies are unanimous in their 
understanding." 

   Vice chairman of the committee is Toyo Kato, president of Toyoda 
Machine Works.  Members of the committee include Taizo Hosoda, 
president of Okamoto Machine Tool Works, and Jiro Makino, president 
of Makino Milling Machine. (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 6 Jan 94 p 
11) 

   Yamazaki Mazak To Quadruple Its MT Product Line -- In 1994 
Yamazaki Mazak, a major manufacturer of machine tools (MT), will 
quadruple the number of product types it offers to about 20 and 
increase its product differentiation to more closely match the needs 
of its customers.  Yamazaki Mazak will make machining centers, 
laser-processing machine tools, and multifunctional numerically 
controlled lathes the core of its product line; the new products 
will emphasize ease of use and will combine the functions of two or 
three separate machine tools.  The first of the products will be 
introduced as early as February. 

   In addition to targeting the Japan International Machine Tool 
Fair, to be held Osaka in 1994, and the U.S. International Machine 
Tool Fair in Chicago, Yamazaki Mazak will hold "private showings" 
for customers.  (Tokyo NIKAAN K0GY0 3HIMBUN 6 Jan 94 p 12) 
Mori Seiki Strengthening Presence in Europe -- Mori Seiki, a 
major machine tools (MT) manufacturer, will strengthen its European 
presence this year by opening technical centers in Italy and 
Germany.  Mori Seiki is doing this to better position itself in the 
European market, which is "showing signs of bottoming out," and to 
compensate for the slump in domestic orders. 

   The Italian technical center will cost nearly 500 million yen 
($4.5 million) and will be built in Milan on land Mori Seiki already 
owns.  Sales by the technical center will replace Mori Seiki's MT 
exports to Italy, which have averaged about 5.6 units per month. 
The German technical center, to be built at a cost of 600 million 
yen ($5.5 million), will be located in Stuttgart in a building owned 
by Mori Seiki.  It will absorb the functions of the company's 
existing business office.  Mori Seiki had been exporting 10 MT units 
per month to Germany.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 4 Jan 94 p 14) 

   Toyoda Machine Works Halts MT Production in U.S. -- Toyoda 
Machine Works, a machine tool (MT) and auto-parts manufacturer 
belonging to the Toyota Motor Group, will halt its MT manufacturing 
operations in the United States, according to the 17 January ASAHI 
SHIMBUN.  Currently Toyoda Machine Works makes MT equipment at its 
Arlington Heights, Illinois subsidiary, Toyoda Machinery USA. 
Toyoda decided that with the abolition of the MT voluntary restraint 
agreement (VPA) with the United States at the end of 1993, it could 
meet U.S. demand for its products by exports from Japan.  Toyoda 
Machinery USA will continue to operate its service, repair, and 
business departments. 

   The 25 December NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN reported that the Ministry 
of International Trade and Industry (MITI) formally announced on 24 
December that at the end of 1993 it would abolish its MT VRA with 
the United States and its "lowest export price restraint" agreement 
with 16 European countries. 

   The 16 January CHUNICHI SHIMBUN adds that workers at Toyoda 
Machinery USA's Arlington Heights plant will be cut by about half, 
from 200 at the end of 1993 to about 100.  MC production at the 
plant had been about 3 units per month, down from peak output of 15 
per month.  Toyoda Machine USA has incurred cumulative losses of 
about 20 billion yen ($181.8 million). CHUNICHI SHIMBUN adds that 
Toyoda Machinery USA closed its Howell, Michigan plant in 1992, 
leaving Toyoda Koki Brazil (TKB) as Toyoda Machine Works' last 
overseas production base.  The Brazilian plant's current production 
of lathes "is in the single digit range." 

   Tsugami To Shift MT Parts Production to Subsidiaries -- Tsugami, 
a major machine tools (MT) manufacturer, will shift production of MT 
precision parts to two subsidiary companies, Tsugami Tool and 
Chikuma Engineer, to reduce fixed costs.  Tsugami Tool's Nagaoka 
plant, located in Nagaoka City, Niigata Prefecture, which now makes 
collet chucks, will assume responsibility for producing small 
precision automated lathes.  Chikuma Engineer's Shinshu plant in 
Saku City, Nagano Prefecture, which currently makes parts and 
overhauls machinery, will assume responsibility for manufacturing 
industrial machinery.  In addition, Tsugami was to have temporarily 
transferred ten workers to each subsidiary by the end of 1993. 
(Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 7 Jan 94 p 12) 

   Dijet Industrial Downgrades 43 Executive Positions -- Dijet 
Industrial Co., a major manufacturer of cutting tools used in the 
machine tools (MT) industry, will downgrade the positions of three 
managing directors and 40 division chiefs due to the prolonged 
recession in the industry.  Dijet's sales for FY93 are expected to 
total 8.5 billion yen ($77.3 million), down about 10 percent from 
FY92, and its current losses will be about 1.6 billion yen ($14.5 
million). 

   Dijet will reorganize its production plant and streamline its 
organization.  This will result in the positions of managing 
directors in charge of the business, production, and technical 
departments being downgraded to the rank of director and their 
salaries cut.  Also, 40 of Dijet's 80 division chief positions will 
be downgraded to deputy division chiefs and the salaries of these 
officials will be reduced accordingly.  (Tokyo ASAHI SHIMBUN 12 Jan 
94 p 13) 

   November MT Sales Fell 27.2 Percent, Remain at Low Level -- A 
survey conducted by the Japan Machine Tool Builders' Association 
(JMTBA) and released on 10 January reports that November machine 
tool (MT) sales fell 27.2 percent from November 1992 to 37.816 
billion yen ($343.8 million).  This is the second consecutive month 
that overall sales have remained under the 40 billion yen ($363.6 
million) level.  Total domestic sales in November came to 20.907 
billion yen ($190.06 million), down 32.3 percent.  MT orders from 
the auto, general-purpose machinery, and electrical equipment 
industries increased, but orders from the machinery manufacturing 
industry fell 35.8 percent.  Export sales were down 19.7 percent 
year-on-year to 16.99 billion yen ($154.45 million). 

   Cumulative sales for the first 11 months of 1993 totaled 491.729 
billion yen ($4.47 billion), down 25.7 percent.  The JMTBA predicts 
that sales for the entire year will probably not exceed 530 billion 
yen ($4.82 billion).  (Tokyo NIH0N KEIZAI SHIMBUN 11 Jan 94 p 13) 
Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics -- NEC To Mass Produce Logic 
Semiconductors With 0.35 Micron Geometries  --  On 3 January NEC 
announced that it will begin the world's first mass production of 
logic semiconductors incorporating "leading edge" 0.35 micron design 
geometries.  In 1993, NEC used the 0.35 micron design in its 64- 
megabit (MB) dynamic random access memory (DRAM) chips.  The new 
logic chips will have the ability to instantaneously control audio 
and video information, and will be used in next-generation 
multimedia workstations and personal computers.  NEC plans to 
produce the chips at its No. 8 plant in Kyushu, which will be 
completed in August 1994, and to have samples ready for shipment by 
yearend. 

   NEC's mass production of logic chips in Kyushu is expected to 
reinvigorate the semiconductor industry there.  Kyushu currently 
produces 40 percent of Japan's semiconductors by volume and 30 
percent by value, which came to 850 billion yen ($7.73 billion) in 
1992.  (Tokyo ASAHI SHIMBUN 4 Jan 94 p 7) 

   Fujitsu Attempting To Seize Lead in Logic Chip Production -- 
Fujitsu will build a "leading-edge" production line to manufacture 
logic chips with 0.35-micron design geometries.  The line will be 
built at Fujitsu's Aizuwakamatsu plant No. 2 in Fukushima, next to 
an existing 0.5-micron logic chip production line.  The investment 
for manufacturing equipment alone is estimated at 5 to 10 billion 
yen ($45-90 million).  Fujitsu expects to complete the line by the 
end of 1994 and, following test operations, will begin mass 
production in 1995.  The initial processing capacity will be on the 
scale of 5,000 6-inch wafers per month. 

   Until now, Japanese semiconductor manufacturers have always first 
introduced leading-edge technology in memory chips, where they have 
been strongest, and then have applied the technology in making logic 
chips.  However, Fujitsu has decided to change its strategy and 
attempt to seize the lead in microprocessors from U.S. semiconductor 
manufacturers by using the O.35-micron design on logic chips. 
Fujitsu is the first domestic manufacturer to adopt this strategy, 
but it will not necessarily be the last.  The change is seen as 
"essential" in competing with U.S. manufacturers and in improving 
Fujitsu's earnings, which have suffered because of competition from 
South Korean chip manufacturers.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 7 Jan 
94 p 1) 

   Imports of South Korean Semiconductors Surge -- Japanese imports 
of South Korean semiconductors are surging after a period of gradual 
expansion with demand for memory chips particularly strong.  Since 
May, South Korean memory chips have accounted for over 40 percent of 
monthly import totals, and in November the rate reached 56 percent, 
2.4-times greater than total memory device imports from the United 
States.  In addition, as regards the entire Japanese semiconductor 
market, South Korea has surpassed Europe and now holds more than 3 
percent of the market. 

   In November imports of memory devices from South Korea totaled 
9.4 billion yen ($86 million), of which the main component was the 4 
megabit (MB) dynamic random access memory (DRAM) chips.  Japanese 
firms are also interested in importing South Korean mask read-only 
memory (ROM) chips.  According to an official of a Japanese 
subsidiary of a South Korean semiconductor company, Japanese firms 
"never before showed any interest" in South Korean chips, but now 
are approaching the subsidiary for discussions. 

   There are several reasons for the large increase in imports from 
South Korea.  First, the rapid expansion of the U.S. personal 
computer market has led to tight supplies of memory chips.  U.S. 
producers reportedly "have their hands full" supplying domestic 
demand and have "no extra" chips to export to Japan.  In fact, 
exports to the United States of Japanese-made memories are also 
increasing; domestic Japanese chip consumers, who have had 
difficulty securing adequate memory supplies, are turning to South 
Korean manufacturers.  Second, this trend has been facilitated by 
the appreciation of the yen and the depreciation of the won. 
Consequently, as South Korean semiconductor makers continue to 
expand production capacity, it is likely that semiconductor imports 
from South Korea will continue to increase.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN Evening Edition 27 Dec 93 p 3) 

   Telecommunications/Satellites -- NEC To Shift Production of SONET 
System Equipment to U.S. -- NEC will transfer all production related 
to its SONET (synchronous optical networks) systems to its NEC 
America subsidiary by March 1994 and begin manufacturing all SONET 
equipment targeted for the U.S. market at its NEC America plant in 
Oregon in an effort to improve production efficiency.  Currently NEC 
Miyagi, an NEC subsidiary, jointly coordinates business activities 
related to U.S.-bound SONET systems equipment with NEC America. The 
Miyagi plant supplies equipment with high-speed transmission 
capacities of 150 megabits per second, 600 megabits per second, and 
2.4 gigabits per second to several "Baby Bell" companies, including 
U.S. West. 

   NEC decided to shift production to the United States because of 
the yen's appreciation and because of an expected surge in demand 
for this type of equipment as a result of the Clinton 
administration's "information superhighway" initiative.  As a result 
of the shift, the Oregon plant will increase its current output of 
2,500 systems annually to 4,000.  NEC is targeting U.S. orders worth 
$120 million over the next two years.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 
10 Jan 94 p 6) 

   NEC, Fujitsu Target U.S. Market For ATM Switching Equipment -- 
NEC will produce ATM (asynchronous transfer mode) switching 
equipment--new systems that are considered the "heartbeat" of the 
Clinton administration's "information superhighway" plan--in the 
United States, according to the 13 January NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN. 
NEC has been manufacturing ATM switching equipment in Japan at its 
subsidiary, NEC Tohoku, located in Ichinoseki City, Iwate 
Prefecture, for export to the United States, but decided to shift 
production to the United States because of the yen's appreciation. 
NEC is also seeking to "nip in the bud" any potential U.S.-Japan 
friction in the communications industry, because communications 
technology is often linked with U.S. national security issues. 

   According to NIKKEI, NEC plans to launch a "marketing offensive" 
toward the U.S. "Baby Bell" companies in anticipation of a rapid 
increase in demand for ATM equipment.  It has already supplied the 
Williams Telecommunications Group, a U.S. long-distance 
communications company, with 19 sets of its "NEAX-61 ATM service 
node" and is currently negotiating a contract with Bell Atlantic. 

   Fujitsu, also a major manufacturer of communications equipment, 
is planning to make ATM switching equipment a new "pillar" of its 
operations, according to the 7 January SANKEI SHIMBUN.  Fujitsu 
focused its efforts on ATM technology in the early 1980's and is 
ahead of other manufacturers in developing ATM switching equipment. 
Currently two "Baby Bell" companies, BellSouth and Nynex, are using 
about 20 Fujitsu ATM switching systems, and two others are using 
Fujitsu equipment on a trial basis. 

   SANKEI notes that Fujitsu has "pushed aside" U.S. 
telecommunications giant AT and T to become the "sole leader" in the 
ATM switching equipment industry.  It anticipates a "trillion dollar 
market" in the future, when the use of ATM switching systems--valued 
at several billion yen each (1 billion yen equals $9 million)- 
-quickly expands as the "information superhighway" is completed 
throughout the United States.  AT and T and global communications 
manufacturers such as France's Alcatel Alsthom have launched ATM 
development projects in an attempt to compete with Fujitsu, SANKEI 
observes, so that the "communications battle" to be world leader of 
the "information revolution" has begun. 

   Sanyo, Northern Telecom To Market Multimedia Products in Canada 
-- Sanyo Electric has announced that it will cooperate with Canada's 
Northern Telecom to jointly develop and market communications and 
multimedia equipment in Canada.  Sanyo will market two cordless 
telephone models, the "NOMAD6500" and "N0MAD630O," which the two 
companies jointly developed.  Sanyo will supply its technology for 
cordless telephones, batteries, and liquid crystal displays, while 
Northern Telecom will contribute its digital technologies to jointly 
develop next-generation telephones, components, and semiconductors 
for the multimedia market. 

   In addition, the two companies will cooperate on developing 
markets for other communications products, including mobile 
telephones and facsimile machines.  The two firms will have a 
combined market share of 40 percent in Canada for telephones and 
related products, and hope that by joining together they can 
penetrate the consumer market even further.  After they are 
successful in Canada, they will expand their cooperative efforts to 
the United States and the rest of the world.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 6 Jan 94 p 3) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments  --  Twenty State Enterprises To 
List on Hong Kong Bourse in 1994 - Professor Liu Hongru, chairman of 
China's Securities Supervision and Administration Committee, has 
said that 20 state-owned enterprises will list on the Hong Kong 
Stock Exchange this year.  Some will also have secondary listings on 
the New York and London stock exchanges, with a small number having 
their primary listings in New York.  Professor Liu said that Hong 
Kong was a financial center in which international investors had 
great confidence, and that after 1997, the "one country, two 
systems" policy would enable Hong Kong to maintain its bridging 
role.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 19 Jan 94 p AS) Hong Kong Bureaus 

   Shanghai's Private Economy Outstrips Overall Economy -- The year 
1993 saw a 30 percent increase in Shanghai's private economy for the 
second consecutive year compared to a 15 percent rise in Shanghai's 
overall economy.  As of the end of the year, there were 126,600 
individually owned business households in the city, employing 
178,600 people.  There were also 7,610 privately owned enterprises 
employing 108,400 people, compared to none in the beginning of 1988. 

   Privately owned enterprises have begun operating on company 
lines, and the number of limited liability companies increased by 
1,715 last year.  Privately owned joint ventures, which were first 
seen in August 1992, numbered 22 at year's end.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO 
XINWEN SHE 0450 GMT 15 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureaus 

   Registered Company Start-Ups in Shanghai Increase 153 Percent -- 
Almost 34,000 registered companies were established in the January 
to September period of 1993 in Shanghai, an increase of 153 percent 
over the figures for the same period of 1992.  Of the 33,824 
companies set up, 11,579 were state-owned companies, 17,357 were 
collectively owned companies, and 4,888 were companies of other 
types.  The number of companies involved in tertiary industry stood 
at 28,155, constituting 83.2 percent of the total.  (Hong Kong 
ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 0901 GMT 31 Dec 93)  Hong Kong Bureau 
CEITIC To Move Gold, Foreign Currency Focus to Shanghai -- The 
China Everbright International Trust and Investment Corporation 
(CElTIC) will start trading foreign currencies and gold in Shanghai 
early in 1994.  "Well-placed sources" revealed that Shanghai would 
lead the nation in foreign currency and gold business.  Ye Kequan, 
director of CEITIC's Shanghai branch, said they were preparing to 
set up a swap market in Pudong "which binds insurance and trading of 
securities, foreign currencies, gold, real estate, and futures 
together."  He also said CElTIC would move its business focus to 
Shanghai in anticipation of a new economic and financial boom. 
(Beijing CHINA DAILY 8 Jan 94 p 2)  Hong Kong Bureau/ 

   Hunan Launches 23 High-Tech Projects in 1993 -- On 31 December 
the casting and fireproofing material development project sponsored 
by the China Building Material Research Institute and 22 other high- 
tech projects were ready to be implemented in the high-tech 
development zones in Changsha, Zhuzhou, Xiangtang, and other cities 
of Hunan Province.  By the end of 1993, 478 high-tech enterprises 
had been established and 640 high-tech projects had been launched in 
the new high-tech corridor, turning in an annual output value of 
more than 700 million yuan.  The new high-tech corridor, which has 
drawn in 1.78 billion yuan worth of investment, comprises the five 
new and high-tech development zones of Changsha, Zhuzhou, Xiangtan, 
Yueyang, and Hengyang and covers more than 20 counties and cities. 
(Changsha Hunan People's Radio Network 2300 GMT 2 Jan 94)  Hong Kong 
Bureau- 

   Growth in Individual, Private Economic Sectors in Yunnan Reported 
- Individual and private economic sectors in Yunnan Province 
developed rapidly in 1993.  As of the end of December there were 
more than 442,200 individual industrial and commercial households in 
the province, involving more than 646,000 people, an increase of 
18.71 percent and 19.8 percent respectively over the previous year. 
There were also 1,563 private enterprises, an increase of 49.86 
percent over the previous year.  The proportion of people engaged in 
individual and private enterprises to the province's total 
population rose from 1.47 percent in 1992 to 1.78 percent.  (Kunming 
Yunnan Radio Network 1000 GMT 7 Jan 94)  Hong Kong Bureaus 

   Foreign Trade and Investment:  Japanese Rank First Among Foreign 
Investors in Hong Kong -- In recent years, Japanese companies have 
continued to increase their investments in Hong Kong, many of them 
attracted by the economic growth of mainland China.  In the last 10 
years, Japanese companies have replaced American and British firms 
as the largest foreign investor in Hong Kong.  In order to lower 
operational costs and compete for greater market share, Japanese 
manufacturing enterprises have been increasing their overseas 
investments, and Hong Kong is a key point for such investment 
because of its proximity to China.  According to Hong Kong 
Government statistics, by the end of 1992, cumulative investment 
from Japan amounted to HK$124.45 bilLion, and Japanese companies 
fixed assets in Hong Kong totaled HK$85.16 billion, exceeding that 
of American corporations, who ranked second.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO 
TONGXUN SHE 0812 GMT 11 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau/ 

   Capital Steel Seeks Hong Kong Funding for Shandong Plant -- The 
parent company of Hong Kong-listed Shougang International has 
announced its involvement in a project to build a HK$45 billion 
steel plant in Shandong.  Capital Iron and Steel Company Limited 
(Shougang) will raise more than HK$22.5 billion on overseas markets 
and through the introduction of foreign investors.  The plant, which 
will be situated in Quli, Shandong Province, will have an annual 
capacity of 10 million tonnes.  Sources said they expected Capital 
Iron and Steel's Hong Kong-listed subsidiary Shougang Concord 
Holdings to play a key role in raising overseas capital for the 
joint venture project with the Shandong provincial government.  The 
state would not provide funds for the project, but the new firm is 
expected to enjoy the same benefits and concessions as Sino-foreign 
joint ventures. (Hong Kong HONG KONG STANDARD (FINANCIAL REVIEW) 17 
Jan 94 p 1) Hong Kong Bureaus 

   Hong Kong-Based Firm Invests in Guangzhou Steel Mill -- The Hong 
Kong-based Guangzhou Enterprise (Group) Company Limited is one of 
five underwriters for the Guangzhou Zhujiang Steel Plant, the 
largest construction project in the Guangzhou Development Zone. The 
plant, recently approved by the State Council, requires HK$620 
million for its first phase of construction.  It will begin 
production in July 1996.  The other underwriters are Guangzhou 
Economic Construction and Development Company, Guangzhou Metallurgy 
Company, Guangzhou Development Zone State-Owned Asset Investment 
Company, and the Guangzhou International Trust and Investment 
Company.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1118 GMT 18 Jan 94) Hong 
Kong Bureau/ 

   Burmah Castrol, Shenzhen Jinke To Establish Joint Venture -- 
British lubricants and specialty chemicals manufacturer Burmah 
Castrol is to establish a HK$15 million joint venture in Shenzhen to 
manufacture and market products used in the aluminum industry. 
Linking up with Shenzhen Jinke, which supplies grain refining 
tablets and fluxes to Chinese primary and secondary users, the new 
firm is to be called Foresco Jinke.  The initial capital will be 
used to set up a new factory close to Jinke's existing production 
facilities.  Under the deal both companies will hold 50 percent 
stakes in the company, though the HK$15 million cash investment is 
being made in Castrol, with Jinke reciprocating through assets and 
their established market base.  (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST 
(BUSINESS POST) 12 Jan 94 p 2) Hong Kong Bureaus 

   UK Firm To Establish Video-Conferencing Facilities in Hubei -- 
GPT Video Systems, a subsidiary of GPT Limited of Britain, has 
signed a $3 million deal with the Hubei Post and Telecommunications 
Administration for the provision of advanced video-conferencing 
facilities in Wuhan, Hubei Province.  A GPT official said this will 
be the largest video-conferencing network in China.  This contract 
represents GPT's first deal with a Chinese customer in 1994, 
following five contracts for similar equipment signed in 1993 with 
Hunan and Shaanxi Provinces and the Capital Iron and Steel 
Corporation in Beijing.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 12 Jan 94 p 2) Hong 
Kong Bureau/ 

   Swiss Pharmaceutical Firm Plans $30 Million Factory in Shanghai 
-- Swiss pharmaceutical company Hof fman-La Roche is to set up a $30 
million factory with Shanghai San Wei Pharmaceutical Corporation to 
make pharmaceuticals.  The joint venture, to be known as Shanghai 
Roche Pharmaceuticals Company, will be 70 percent owned by Roche and 
30 percent owned by San Wei, Shanghai's largest pharmaceutical 
factory.  The factory, to be located in the Zhangjiang High-Tech 
Zone in the Pudong Industrial Area, will begin full operations in 
late 1996, making products such as anticancer and cardiovascular 
drugs, antibiotics, and multivitamins.  Until the factory is 
completed Roche will help upgrade production facilities at San Wei's 
plant to process some products of the joint venture.  These will be 
sold under the joint venture trademark between 1994 and 1996.  (Hong 
Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 8 Jan 94 p 2) Hong 
Kong Bureau/ 

   Shandong Approval of Taiwan-Invested Projects Up 180 Percent in 
1993 -- In 1993 Shandong Province witnessed noticeable achievements 
in developing economic and trade contacts with Taiwan.  According to 
statistics, the province approved 1,154 Taiwan-invested projects, up 
180 percent over 1992.  These projects involved a total investment 
of $1.875 billion, up 140 percent over 1992; and the contracts 
signed with Taiwan businessmen involved a total investment of $942 
million, up 150 percent over 1992.  (Jinan Shandong Radio 2300 GMT 
12 Jan 94) Seoul Bureaus 

   Taiwan:  Lowest Trade Surplus in 10 Years Reported -- Taiwan 
broke four foreign trade records in 1993.  The total volume of 
import-export trade reached a record $162.03 billion, up 5.6 percent 
over 1992.  The trade surplus with Hong Kong topped $16.72 billion, 
a record for a single region.  The trade deficit with Japan reached 
a record $14.22 billion.  The proportion of heavy-industry and 
chemical products exceeded half of exports for the first time. 
However, the Ministry of Finance's report released on 6 January 
shows the total trade surplus of $7.87 billion was the lowest since 
1984.  Taiwan's trade surplus with the United States was down to 
$6.76 billion, and its trade with Europe showed a deficit of $670 
million, the first in two decades.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-BAO 7 Jan 
p 2) Okinawa Bureau/ 

   Procedures for Foreign Investment To Be Simplified -- On 30 
December the Ministry of Economic Affairs (MOEA) decided that in the 
future overseas Chinese may continue to invest in Taiwan in the 
capacity of natural citizens, but the procedures for accepting 
investment from overseas Chinese and foreigners would be simplified 
from the current system of evaluation and approval to merely 
registration.  The MOEA, which held a meeting on 30 December to 
discuss amending regulations governing investment in Taiwan by 
overseas Chinese and foreigners, also proposed to abolish the 
stipulation restricting overseas Chinese and foreigners from 
converting foreign exchange in the first year of operation so they 
may directly invest with New Taiwan (NT) dollars.  According to the 
Investment Commission under the MOEA, the proposed amendments are 
designed to boost foreign investment, make the island an operational 
center in the Asia-Pacific region, and facilitate Taiwan's accession 
to the General Agreement of Tariffs and Trade.  (Taipei CHING-CHI 
JIH-BAO 31 Dec p 2) Okinawa Bureaus/ 

   Survey Shows Over 30 Countries Impose Trade Barriers on Taiwan -- 
A recent survey conducted by the Chinese Federation of Industries 
showed that presently over 30 countries have imposed trade barriers, 
both tariff and otherwise, against Taiwan.  These include Japan, the 
United States, Australia, most European nations, and Southeast Asian 
nations such as Thailand, Malaysia, Indonesia, and the Philippines. 
Industries affected include steel plating, foodstuff, computers, 
auto parts and accessories, and information.  Manufacturers strongly 
urged the government to fight for the rights and opportunities of 
fair competition.  Koo Chen-fu, chairman of the Chinese National 
Association of Industry and Commerce, said, "Since the government 
promotes trade liberalization, it should help manufacturers compete 
internationally on an equal footing with the same industries in 
every country."  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-BAO 1 Jan p 9) Okinawa 
Bureau/ 

   Labor Productivity Growth Expected To Show Decline for 1993 -- 
The Executive Yuan's Council for Economic Planning and Development 
pointed out that labor productivity growth in 1993 is not expected 
to exceed 3.5 percent, the lowest growth in nine years. The council 
cited as major reasons for the decline readjustments in the 
industrial structure, transfers of industries overseas, an increase 
in foreign laborers, and failure of enterprises to invest in 
automation and personnel training.  Therefore, the government should 
address these areas to promote labor productivity growth, and 
economic development.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-BAO   3 Jan p 2) 
Okinawa Bureau/ 

   Minister on World Economic Blocs, Future Trade Focus -- With the 
world divided into three economic blocs following the establishment 
of the European Union and NAFTA on 1 January, Minister of Economics 
Chiang Ping-kun said the pivotal axis of Taiwan's future development 
will lie in Asia, though attention will still be given to its 
development in other economic regions.  He envisaged that Taiwan's 
exports to the Asian market in 1994 will proportionally account for 
over 50 percent of its total exports to world markets.  His ministry 
has decided to substantially readjust the focus of Taiwan's 
investments and exports; the Asia region will feature prominently in 
this respect.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-BAO 2 Jan p 2) Okinawa Bureau/ 

   Cross-Strait Trade Expected To Total $20 Billion in 1994 -- The 
Ministry of Economic Affairs estimates cross-Strait trade will total 
$20 billion in 1994, and Taiwan's imports from the PRC will 
increase.  However, Taiwanese investors will reconsider their 
investment plans for the PRC in view of the uncertain factors caused 
by PRC macroeconomic regulation and control. According to the 
ministry's statistics, 9,470 enterprises invested in the PRC last 
year with a total capital of $3.52 billion.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH- 
BAO 4 Jan p 2) Okinawa Bureaus 

   Company To Examine Tenders for Nuclear Power Plant No. 4 -- The 
Taiwan Power Corporation will begin examining tenders for two U.S. 
firms and one French firm beginning 10 January for the construction 
of its fourth nuclear power plant, which is expected to be 
operational in January 2001 at the earliest.  The corporation's 
deputy general manager said the current tenders are for the 
construction of the nuclear reactor and for the supply of nuclear 
fuel, the project's most important components costing over $2 
billion.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-BAO 9 Jan p 2) Okinawa Bureaus 

   Relief Measures Drafted To Help Industries Hit by Imported Goods 
-- The Ministry of Economic Affairs has decided to provide temporary 
relief measures to Taiwan industries whose interests are seriously 
jeopardized by an influx of foreign goods.  These measures, which 
will be in effect for a period of three years, include increases in 
tariffs, introduction of tariffs and import quotas, entering into 
marketing agreements with exporting countries, and provisions for 
financial guarantees.  The draft "Measures for Handling Import 
Relief Cases" formulated by the ministry has been submitted to the 
Executive Yuan and is expected to be implemented as soon as a trade 
investigation commission has been established under the ministry. 
(Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-BAO 3 Jan p 1) Okinawa Bureau/ 

   Export Growth, Industrial Output Projections Reported -- Taiwan's 
export growth is expected to continue, but the real estate market 
will continue to slow down.  Minister of Economic Affairs Chiang 
Ping-kun said Taiwan's export growth and industrial output for 1994 
will total 8.2 percent and 4.52 percent respectively.  To conform 
with its plan to join GATT and fulfill its promise to the United 
States to lower customs tariffs, Taiwan will lower customs tariffs 
on several products, even though it may affect such relevant 
industries as the steel, automobile, and petrochemical industries. 
The progress of over 500 national construction projects is still 
slow, and nearly half of the projects have fallen behind schedule. 
In addition, to raise funds for the projects the Taiwan Government 
will appropriately cut the amount of normal spending.  (Taipei 
CHING-CHI JIH-BAO 3 Jan p 2) Okinawa Bureau/ 

   Export Exchange Earnings for December Reach Record High -- 
According to statistics by the Central Bank of China, Taiwan's 
export exchange earnings of $8.35 billion for December 1993 was a 
record for any single month.  It shows a notable backward flow of 
Taiwanese firms' foreign exchange funds at the end of the year.  The 
total exchange income and exchange expenditures in 1993 totaled $88 
billion and $74.1 billion respectively.  The surplus of $13.89 
billion was a growth of 9 percent over 1992.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH- 
BAO 11 Jan p 1) Okinawa Bureau/ 

   NORTH KOREA:  Light Industry To Focus on Production, Quality 
Control Goals -- Ri Ki-do, director of the Production Guidance 
Department under the Light Industry Committee, recently said that 
the committee is making comprehensive plans to sharply increase the 
production of textiles, daily necessities, and processed foods, as 
well as to improve the quality and variety of consumer goods in 
order to promote development of the light industry, which was 
designated as a top priority at the 21st Plenary Session of the 
Sixth Party Central Committee.  During its plenum in December, the 
party decided to focus on agriculture, light industry, and trade to 
meet the goals of the Third Seven-Year Plan (1987-1993) during the 
adjustment period in the next two to three years. 

   According to Ri, the General Bureau of Textile Industry under the 
Light Industry Committee is calling for modernization of textile 
factories and  increased production of high-quality cloth (made of 
vinylon) and knitwear. Ri also said that the General Bureau of the 
shoemaking industry is working on improving the quality of 
domestically made shoes. 

   Ri noted that since the 16th Plenary Session of the Sixth Party 
Central Committee, the clothing sector's production capacity has 
"improved significantly" thanks to the new equipment that has been 
installed and to the modernization of the Pyongyang United Textile 
Factory and other factories in Kusong, Sariwon, and Kaesong.  Ri 
added that shoe manufacturing has also improved and that a greater 
variety of shoes is now available to consumers.  He also remarked on 
general improvements in the processing of staple and non-staple food 
items and the production of daily necessities.  (Pyongyang MINJU 
CHOSON 16 Dec 93 p 3) 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Business Plans of Major Conglomerates for 
1994 Highlighted -- SUMMARY:  Recent press articles highlight some 
of the main business projects and investment targets in 1994 for 
major conglomerates.  The 30 largest groups plan to increase their 
investment in facilities and R and D by 45.8 percent over 1993 
levels.  They also intend to expand actively abroad, and may use 
their overseas R and D centers to obtain foreign technology and take 
it back to South Korea. 

   According to the 4 January MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS), the 30 
largest ROK conglomerates will invest 23.3 trillion won ($29.125 
billion) in facilities and 680 trillion won ($850 billion) in R and 
D in 1994.  Their total overall investment will be 45.8 percent 
higher than in 1993.  The groups plan to increase their R and D 
investment by 34 percent in order to expand existing technologies 
and respond to other countries' IPR (intellectual property rights) 
"protectionist barriers."  MKS reports that the groups also intend 
to invest actively abroad to expand their overseas production base. 
In a separate article in the same 4 January issue, MKS states that 
the need for "aggressive technology transfers" is growing, even in 
the area of patents, as advanced countries "avoid" transferring 
advanced technologies.  MKS explains that ROK firms will be able to 
use R and D centers established in the United States, Japan, and the 
EC as windows through which they can "grab" the global flow of 
technology and import foreign technology back home. 

   MKS also offers details of conglomerates' major investment goals 
and projects.  They include infrastructure projects and production- 
related projects located both domestically and overseas.  Some of 
the projects of the 10 largest conglomerates include: 

   Samsung:  domestically--six semiconductor production lines, an 
automobile plant, the new international airport at Yongjong Island, 
a canal between Seoul and Inchon, development of Nanji Island, the 
electric rail between Pundang-Yongin-Suwon, a new composite city at 
Yongin, developing space under Yoido Plaza;  overseas--a 
refrigerator factory in the Kazakh Republic, a joint-venture 
semiconductor factory in Portugal in cooperation with Texas 
Instruments, an electronics and VCR factory in China. 
Hyundai:  domestically--a production line exclusively for 16M 
DRAM (dynamic random access memory) chips, an automobile plant, an 
oil refinery, development of the Yongjong Island airport, power 
plant construction, container terminal projects for Pusan and 
Kwangyang, development of the Yulchon industrial complex;  overseas- 
-establishment of construction companies in China and Indonesia, an 
$8.6-million automobile plant in Malaysia, investments worth $27 
million in Vietnam, Thailand, Singapore, and India, expansion of a 
refrigerated storage facility in Tijuana, Mexico. 
   Lucky-Goldstar:  domestically--plastic fuel tanks, mass 
production of thin film technology liquid crystal displays (TFT 
LCD's), mass production of 16M DRAM's, nuclear power generation, 
power plant construction;  overseas--a plastics factory in Pakistan, 
a cosmetics factory and a VCR factory in China, a color television 
factory in Vietnam, a pump factory in Indonesia, marketing companies 
in Australia and Spain. 

   Daewoo:  domestically--the Kunsan automobile plant, a high-tech 
research institute, light-rail business;  overseas--automobile 
assembly plants in Libya and Iran, R and D centers in the United 
States, Japan, and Europe, cotton mills in Uzbekistan and Sudan. 

   Sunkyong:  domestically--a fluid catalytic cracking facility, 
renovation of production facilities, investment in ships and new 
shipbuilding, stage two of the Polmosang Tunnel, an open-air storage 
yard for containers in Yangsan;  overseas--developing oil fields 
overseas. 

   Ssangyong:  domestically--a shipping and distribution base, 
middle-grade oil cracking, crude oil refining, developing small-size 
commercial vehicles and passenger cars;  overseas--a joint-venture 
cement factory in Vietnam in cooperation with Korea Heavy Industries 
and Vietnam, developing overseas resources. 

   Kia:  domestically--Kia's second automobile plant at Asan Bay, an 
Asia Motors plant for large trucks and buses;  overseas--an 
automobile assembly plant in Indonesia. 

   Hanjin:  domestically--aircraft purchases, shipbuilding, high- 
speed rail, light rail, land reclamation in Yongdo;  overseas--a 
terminal in Tokyo for Hanjin Shipping's exclusive use. 

   Hanhwa:  domestically--facilities for middle-grade oil cracking 
and desulfurization, enlargement of PVC (polyvinyl chloride) 
facilities. 

   Lotte:  domestically--a Lotte Samkang factory in Chonan, the 
Pusan World Hotel;  overseas--expansion of the Lotteria in Shanghai. 
With regard to sales targets, the 5 January CHUGAN MAEGYONG 
reports that in 1994 most groups want to increase total sales 
between 10 and 20 percent, with seven groups aiming for increases of 
more than 30 percent.  The automobile sector wants to increase sales 
by 30 percent, while the electronics sector is looking for a 20- 
percent increase.  CHUGAN comments that the five main car makers 
have a combined sales target of 19.7 trillion won ($24.675 billion). 
This includes targets of 8.5 trillion won for Hyundai ($10.625 
billion), a 16.5-percent increase; 5.6 trillion won ($7 billion) for 
Kia, a 33-percent increase; 3.2 trillion won ($4 billion) for 
Daewoo, a 45-percent increase; 1.6 trillion won ($2 billion) for 
Asia Motors, a 50-percent increase; and 860 billion won ($1.075 
billion) for Ssangyong, an increase of more than 100 percent. 

   There are also plans to greatly increase investments in the 
electronics (semiconductors), heavy industry, and oil refining 
sectors, CHUGAN reports.  However, groups doing business in textiles 
plan to reduce their shares of investment in and sales from 
synthetic textiles.  CHUGAN breaks down some of each company's 
investments by business line:  Samsung will invest 500 billion won 
($625 million) to build a semiconductor production line, 150 billion 
won ($187.5 million) to expand a passenger car plant, and 65 billion 
won ($81.25 million) in its aircraft (fighter) business.  Hyundai 
will invest 1.12 trillion won ($1.4 billion) in its automobile 
business, and 1.1 trillion won ($1.375 billion) in its semiconductor 
business.  Lucky-Goldstar will invest 450 billion won ($562.5 
million) in its Goldstar company, 250 billion won ($312.5 million) 
in its Lucky company, and 100 billion won ($125 million) in its 
technical research institute.  Daewoo will concentrate most of its 
domestic investment in its Kunsan automobile plant.  Sunkyong Group 
will invest 800 billion won ($1 billion) in its Yukong subsidiary. 
Ssangyong Group plans to invest 600 billion won ($750 million) in 
oil refining, 500 billion won ($625 million) in automobile 
manufacturing, and 300 billion won ($375 million) in cement 
production.  Finally, CHUGAN notes that Hanjin Group will invest 550 
billion won ($687.5 million) to import a new type of aircraft. 

   The following table lists the sales and investment targets for 
the 10 biggest conglomerates, along with the increase (in percent) 
over 1993 levels.  The figures were compiled from articles in the 4 
January MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN and the 5 January CHUGAN MAEGYONG. 

BOT 
                           Investment in    Investment in 
              Sales        --Facilities---         R and D 

Name    1994    Change*    1994   Change*    1994   Change* 

Samsung N/A*    -          3,300  22.2       1,300  18.1 

Hyundai N/A*    -          3,300  141        1,200  76.5 

Lucky- 
Goldstar        N/A*              2,200      37.5   1,000       33.3 

Daewoo  35,500  31.3      1,730   49.7       1,122  36 

Sunkyong        20,430     15.6   1,530      31.8   170         21.4 

Ssangyong       13,700     16.1   1,500      150    100         42.8 

Kia      9,000  34.3       1,040  22.3       300    36.3 

Hanjin   7,300  10.6       1,280  8          70     7.6 

Lotte    6,800  17.2       650    62.5       80     33 

Hanhwa   6,800  17.2       N/A*   -          N/A 

Note*: N/A denotes data not available.  Change denotes percent 
increase over 1993 level.  Unit for sales and investment amounts is 
1 billion won. 

EOT 

   FEATURE:  S and T 1994 Budget, S and T Accomplishments for 1993 
Reported -- SUMMARY:  The ROK Government's 1994 S and T budget of 
nearly 2 trillion won ($2.5 billion) is the country's largest to 
date, representing 2.2 percent of the national budget and a 32.7- 
percent increase over last year, according to press reports. 
Figures on the distribution of funds among the ministries, and 
within the Ministry of Science and Techhnology (MOST), are provided 
along with one magazine's view of MOST's chief successes. 

   South Korea's 1994 science and technology budget--defined as 
"direct support" for S and T activities to agencies of the central 
government, including an R and D budget, S and T promotion budget, 
and administrative budget-- has been set at 1.9596 trillion won 
($2.45 billion), according to the 5 January CHUGAN MAEGYONG.  The 
amount is 32.7 percent higher than 1993's reported S and T budget of 
1.4767 trillion won ($1.846 billion), and compares to an increase of 
20 percent in the national budget overall.  Government S and T 
expenditures, which make up 20 percent of the total funds spent by 
South Korea on science and technology, account for 2.2 percent of 
the 1994 national budget, compared to 4.7 percent in the United 
States and 2.9 percent in Japan, the magazine reports. 

   The largest share of the new S and T budget, some 1.5132 trillion 
won ($1.892 billion), is allotted to R and D, representing a 30- 
percent increase over 1993.  Specific R and D categories reportedly 
will be funded as follows:  working expenses 305.6 billion won ($382 
million), up 53 percent from 1993; state-funded research expenses 
712.2 billion won ($890 million), up 20 percent; R and D subsidies 
252.1 billion won ($315 million), up 54 percent; and "testing and 
research expenses for national testing and research agencies" 243.3 
billion won ($304 million), up 17 percent.  According to the 5 
January CHUGAN MAEGYONG, the largest overall increase of 240 percent 
will go to the Ministry of Education, followed by the Environmental 
Agency with a 65.8-percent increase, and the Ministry of Trade, 
Industry, and Energy whose budget will grow by 49 percent.  The 
reported S and T budget for each ministry is as follows. 


     Ministry                     S and T Budget 
                                (billion won)  (million $) 

     Home Affairs                 5.656             7.03 
     Finance                      80.000            100.00 
     Defense                      352.332           440.42 
     Education                    180.705           225.88 
     Agriculture and Fisheries    13.298            16.62 
     Trade, Industry, and Energy  338.913           423.64 
     Construction                 34.953            43.69 
     Health and Social Affairs    47.188            58.99 
     Transportation               7.641             9.55 
     Communications               23.876            29.85 
     Science and Technology       610.217           762.77 
     Environmental Agency         15.861            19.83 
     Tax Administration           1.028             1.29 
     Rural Development Admin.     139.388           174.24 
     Forestry Admin.              19.645            24.56 
     Fisheries Admin.             37.555            46.94 
     Industrial Promotion Admin.  44.082            55.10 
     Patents Admin.               0.901             1.13 
     Railroad Admin.              1.510             1.89 
     Meteorology Admin.            31.805           39.76 

      S and T budgets within the Ministry of Science and Technology 
(MOST), funded by public and private sources, were reported in the 1 
January MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS) as follows. 

   Institute                   Budget                  Personnel 
                            (billion won) (million $) (PhD's) 

Korea Institute of Science     67.075       83.84     787  (247) 
   and Technology (KIST) 
System Engineering Research    28.632       35.79     357   (22) 
   Institute (SERI) 
Genetic Engineering Research   16.462       20.58     225   (73) 
   Institute (GERI) 
Research and Development        4.555        5.69      54    (1) 
   Information Center 
S and T Policy Management       7.609        9.51     114   (22) 
  Research Institute 
Korea Advanced Institute of    78.215       97.77     852  (311) 
   S and T (KAIST) 
Korea Rsch Inst of Standards   28.771       35.96     472   (99) 
   and Science (KRISS) 
National Astronomical           9.920       12.40      89   (12) 
   Observatory 
Basic Science Support          10.865       13.58      75    (9) 
   Center 
Korea Institute of Machinery   52.723       65.90     574   (95) 
   and Metals (KIMM) 
Korea Aerospace Research       23.674       29.59     127   (33) 
   Institute (KARl) 
Korea Institute of Nuclear     21.278       26.60     272   (53) 
   Safety 
Korea Atomic Energy Research  171.200      214.00    1,625 (211) 
   Institute (KAERI) 
Hospital for Nuclear           38.938       48.67     842   (38) 
   Medicine 
Nuclear Environment            72.341       90.43     320   (61) 
   Management Center 
Korea Institute of Energy      19.396       24.25     347   (83) 
   Research (KIER) 
Resources Research             29.722       37.15     457  (112) 
   Institute 
Korea Ocean Research and       27.459       34.32     347   (76) 
   Development Inst (KORDI) 
Korea Electrotechnology        25.437       31.80     325   (45) 
   Research Institute 
Korea Research Institute of    27.379       34.22     405  (110) 
   Chemical Tech (KRICT) 
Korea Science Foundation      103.887      129.86     120    (1) 

Kwangju Science and            23.970       29.96      -      - 
   Technology Institute 

Total                         889.511     1,111.87     8,786 (1,714) 



   MKS further reports that MOST reached a decision late last year 
to have its institutes "specialize," beginning this March, in 
particular fields or specific technologies.  For example, KIST will 
focus on 3-D image media technology, "human robot systems," and 
advanced medical treatments during 1994. 

   Meanwhile, the 29 December CHUGAN MAEGYONG published a list of 
MOST's major technological successes of 1993 as follows. 

   1. A "robot sculptor" that can sculpt likenesses of individual 
human faces in 20 minutes, by KIST; potential applications are in 
factory automation. 

   2. Microscopic drug capsules that are absorbed by the body over a 
long period of time, by KRICT.  Has uses in manufacturing 
gastrointestinal drugs, antibiotics, and anti-cancer drugs (see 
PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW Vol 2 No 26 29 Dec 93 pp 23-25). 

   3. A high-temperature superconducting quantum interference device 
(SQUID), by KRISS. 

   4. Technology for automated production of software, by SERI. 
Expected to save 20 billion won ($25 million) annually in imports by 
1996. 

   5. Non-polluting organic agricultural chemicals, by GERI.  Living 
microorganisms are enclosed in a biodegradable, high-polymer gel. 

   6. Exhaust valves for large diesel engines, by KIMM.  Will save 
10-15 billion won ($12.5-18.75 million) annually in imports. 

   7. Software codes for a comprehensive safety check of a nuclear 
power plant, by KAERI. 

   8. The "Our Star 2" satellite, by KAIST.  South Korea's first 
indigenous earth satellite. 

   9. A fused carbonate fuel cell, by KIST.  The 10cm x lOcm unit 
produces 100 watts of power. 

   10. A new substance (GERI-BP001) for reducing blood cholesterol 
made from aspergillus (a soil mold), by GERI. 

   11. Development of the chemical compound HFC-134a as a freon 
substitute, by KIST. 

   12. Precision laser welding equipment, by KAERI (see PACIFIC RIM 
ECONOMIC REVIEW Vol 2 No 24 1 Dec 93 p 31). 

   13. Manufacturing and control technology for an ion nitriding 
electric furnace, by KIMM.  Expected to save 600 million won 
($750,000) in imports annually. 

   14. A high-temperature (140 degrees K) superconductor formed in 
high pressure mercury vapor, developed jointly by the Research 
Institute of Industrial Science and Technology and Pohang Steel. 

   15. Livestock waste water processing equipment, by KIST. 

   16. Technology to separate, gasify, and burn combustible 
industrial wastes, by KIER. 

   17. Technology to produce EPA chemical compounds from marine 
micro-organisms, by KORDI. 

   18. Design and construction of an underwater robot that can 
operate at depths of 300 meters, by KIMM. 

   19. Development of "essential technology needed to manufacture a 
solid fuel rocket motor able to lift a scientific research payload 
weighing 50-70 kg to an altitude of 80-90 km," by KARl. 

   20. Rayon twice as strong as the existing material and 
manufactured without pollutants, by KIST. 

   21. Numerical-controlled gas cutting machinery, by KIMM. 
Expected to save 3 billion won ($3.75 million) annually in imports 
costs. 

   22. Technology to reduce chemical solvent wastes, by KRICT. 

   23. Manufacture of an ultra-high precision (nanometer scale) 
lathe, by KAIST. 

   24. New automotive steel that is stronger, more malleable, and 
easier to weld, by KIST. 

   FEATURE:  Record Sales, Profits Reported for Electronics in 1993 
-- SUMMARY:  South Korea's 1993 electronics sales, driven by 
semiconductor exports and domestic demand for appliances, brought 
record profits to the country's major producers, according to press 
reports.  Figures on 1994 investment and projected sales presume a 
continuation of the same rapid growth.  The high export volume was 
generated, in part, by the ROK's ability to reduce significantly 
dumping charges levied earlier by the U.S. Government. 

   South Korea's four top electronics manufacturers--Samsung 
Electronics, Goldstar Electron, Daewoo Electronics, and Hyundai 
Electronics--finished 1993 with record sales of 15.85 trillion won 
($198 billion) for a 25.2 percent increase over 1992, according to 
the 21 December MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS).  The amount constituted 
more than half of the country's total electronics-related sales, 
with semiconductor exports and domestic appliance sales accounting 
for most of the gain.  The following data was reported by MKS. 


                            1993 Electronics Sales 
                (in trillion won unless other indication given) 

         Sales (percent  Exports (percent  Net Profit (percent 
          increase)      increase)         increase) 

Samsung 8.1               ---             1.5 
         ($10.1 billion) ($6.7 billion)     ($1.875 billion) 
        (32.7)            (45.0)           (107) 
Goldstar                  4.4               ---                0.70 
        ($5.5  billion)   ($3.0 billion)   ($875  million) 
        (16.4)            (16.7)           (169) 
  Daewoo  2.05            ---              0.32 
        ($2.6  billion)   ($1.75 billion)  ($400  million) 
        (19.1)            (29.6)           (93) 
  Hyundai 1.3             ---              0.35 
        ($1.6  billion)   ($1.15 billion)  ($450  million) 
        (24.0)            (22.0)           (337) 

Total    15.85            ---             2.87 
         ($19.8 billion) ($12.6 billion)    ($3.6 billion) 
        (25.2)            (33.7)           (113) 

   Projected electronics sales by the same four manufacturers in 
1994 are reported in the 4 January MKS as follows. 

               1994 Electronics Sales (projected) 
         (in trillion won unless other indication given) 

          Total              Domestic 
Percent 
          Sales              Sales             Exports 
Increase 
                             3.3               6.7              23.0 
Samsung   10 
          ($12.5  billion)   ($4.125 billion)  ($8.375 billion) 
Goldstar  5                  2.2               2.8              13.6 
          ($6.25  billion)   ($2.75 billion)   ($3.5   billion) 
Daewoo    2.6                1.0               1.6              24.0 
          ($3.25  billion)   ($1.25 billion)   ($2.0   billion) 
Hyundai   2.05               0.57              1.48             58.0 
          ($2.5625 billion)  ($712.5 million)  ($1.85  billion) 

Total     19.65              7.07              12.58            23.9 
         ($24.5625 billion)($8.8375 billion) ($15.725 billion) 

   The 27 December MKS gives the following details on Samsung's 
projected 1994 electronics sales:  3.2 trillion won ($4 billion) in 
semiconductors; 4.2 trillion won ($5.25 billion) in household 
appliances, including $2.7 billion in exports; and 2.5 trillion won 
($3.125 billion) in information processing and communications 
equipment.  The same four companies' 1994 electronics-related 
investment plans are reported in the 4 January MKS as follows. 

                   1994 Electronics-Related Investment Plans 
                (in trillion won unless other indication given) 
          Plant and                          Total           Percent 
          Equipment         R and D          Investment 
Increase 

Samsung  1.5                0.60             2.1              40.0 
          ($1.875 billion)  ($750  million)  ($2.625 billion) 
Goldstar  0.45              0.40             0.85             49.1 
          ($562.5 million)  ($500  million)  ($1.0625 billion) 
Daewoo    0.17              0.18             0.35             34.6 
          ($212.5 million)  ($225  million)  ($437.5 million) 
Hyundai   0.70              0.38             1.08             46.0 
          ($875 million)    ($475  million)  ($1.35 billion) 


Total      2.82             1.56             4.38             41.2 
         ($3.525 billion)  ($1.95 billion)   ($5.475 billion) 



   The 4 January MKS reports that Samsung's major investments will 
be in DRAM's, "next-generation" semiconductors, and wireless 
communications.  Goldstar will invest in mass producing thin film 
transistor-liquid crystal displays (TFT-LCD's), expand its 
distribution facilities, and rationalize production; R and D will 
concentrate on multimedia and enviroiimentally friendly household 
appliances.  Hyundai will put 1 trillion won ($1.25 billion) in 16M 
DRAM production equipment, the paper states.  In its 22 December 
issue, MKS reports Daewoo has decided to move "full-scale" into 
semiconductors.  Unlike the three majors which have concentrated on 
DRAM's, Daewoo will focus on application-specific integrated 
circuits (ASIC's), particularly for use in automobiles and 
appliances. 

   The reported high increases in R and D and plant investment, 
largely semiconductor-related, coincide with a study by the Korea 
Semiconductor Industry Association (24 December MKS) which found 
that ROK chip makers are paying 14.2 percent of their sales in 
royalties, compared to 0.5 percent by rival manufacturers in Japan. 
The study attributes the difference to South Korea's "weak" 
technology base, and notes the gap is "acute" in non-memory 
products.  Only 20 percent of South Korea's semiconductor 
manufacturing equipment and 34.6 percent of the materials used to 
manufacture the chips are indigenous, the study reportedly found. 

   Figures for 1993 and 1994 semiconductor sales are reported in the 
16 December MKS as follows. 


                       1993 and 1994 Semiconductor Sales 
                (in trillion won unless other indication given) 
                    1993                              1994 
          Sales             Exports        Sales            Exports 

Samsung   2.5               ---           3.2 
          ($3.125 billion)  $2.7  billion  ($4 billion)     $3.2 
billion 
Goldstar  0.85              ---            1 trillion plus 
          ($1.06  billion)  $900  million  ($1.25 billion)  $1.2 
billion 
Hyundai   0.75              ---            1.24 
          ($936  million)   $860  million  ($1.55 billion)  $1.47 
billion 

-Total    4.1               ---           5.5 
       ($5.12 billion)     $4.46 billion ($6.87 billion)$5.87billion 


   South Korea's record semiconductor export figure of more than 
$4.46 billion, accounting for 87 percent of its total semiconductor 
sales, came 14 months after a Seoul newspaper had claimed that ROK 
"semiconductor exports are in danger of being completely suspended" 
(23 Oct 92 HANGUK ILBO) because of a provisional U.S. dumping 
charge.  Samsung Electronics, which the 16 December 1993 MKS reports 
made 500 billion won ($625 million) in profits on semiconductor 
sales in 1993--86 percent of which were exports --was alleged to be 
facing a loss in the U.S. market (23 Oct 92 HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN). 
While the ruling was being reconsidered in the United States, most 
Seoul papers ran news stories and editorials describing the 
"catastrophic" effects the dumping margin would have on the 
industry.  At the same time, various "strategies" to reverse the 
ruling were proposed by the newspapers or reported to be under 
consideration, such as "sending high-level officials" for 
discussions with U.S. State, Commerce, and USTR representatives; 
"requesting cooperation" from U.S. companies using South Korean 
semiconductors; and appealing directly to U.S. labor unions and 
consumer groups (23 Oct 92 TONGA ILBO).  A fourth recommendation, 
reported in the 27 October 1992 MKS, to shift resources out of 
semiconductor memory into ASIC's and other high value-added products 
where U.S. import concerns are "weaker" appears, based on recent 
press reports, to have been acted on (see PAFICIC RIM ECONOMIC 
REVIEW Vol 2 No 23 17 Nov 93 pp 26-27). 

   FEATURE:  Intelligence Agency Emphasizing Industrial Espionage -- 
SUMMARY:  South Korea's national intelligence agency is putting 
greater emphasis on the collection of foreign economic and 
technological intelligence, according to a report by its director 
cited in the ROK press.  The move, intended to strengthen South 
Korea's competitiveness in international markets and improve the 
agency's image domestically, reportedly involves hiring more 
specialists in industrial intelligence and increasing the number of 
such agents sent overseas. 

   South Korea's Agency for National Security Planning (NSP), the 
country's national intelligence agency, has made economic 
information gathering its "top priority" this year, the 19 January 
TONGA ILBO reports.  The newspaper cites an address by NSP chief Kim 
Tok to ROK President Kim Yong-sam reportedly stating the agency 
would emphasize collection of economic, industrial, and 
environmental data to help South Korean industries prepare for the 
"coming era of borderless competition." 

   Reporting the same address, YONHAP on 18 January quoted the 
director's statement that "information services for the private 
sector will be increased to make the NSP an intelligence agency in 
which the people have full trust."  President Kim reportedly 
responded by expressing his hope that the NSP would grow into a 
world-level information and intelligence agency." 

   Kim Tok's address follows an earlier report in the 6 May CHUNGANG 
ILBO that the NSP is putting more emphasis on collection of foreign 
technology.  The article noted that despite a hiring freeze, the 
agency intends to hire more S and T experts and "specialists in 
industrial intelligence."  Efforts reportedly were being made to 
attract "professionals" with advanced degrees able to collect and 
evaluate "economic and industrial intelligence."  The paper added 
the NSP also plans to "augment this portion of the personnel it 
sends overseas." 

   FEATURE:  Press View Developments in ROK-Vietnam Trade -- 
SUMMARY:  December marked the first-year anniversary of the 
establishment of diplomatic relations between South Korea and 
Vietnam.  Several articles published that month review recent 
developments in trade and investment between the two nations.  One 
article notes the signing of an arbitration agreement, which would 
help in resolving any trade disputes that may arise as ROK trade and 
investment in Vietnam continue to grow. 

   The 24 December HANGYORE SINMUN reports that South Korea became 
Vietnam's fourth largest trading partner and its third largest 
investor --based on total amount invested--in 1993.  As of 24 
December, ROK exports to Vietnam totaled $652 million, while imports 
totaled $81 million.  This placed Vietnam 11th among nations with 
which the ROK has a trade surplus.  HANGYORE lists the ROK's main 
exports to Vietnam as textile materials, non-metallic mineral 
products, steel, metallic products, chemical industrial goods, 
machinery, and electronics.  The main imports from Vietnam are raw 
materials, such as coal and natural gas, and primary goods, such as 
agricultural products. 

   With regard to investment, HANGYORE notes that the Overseas 
Investment Commercial Center of the Export-Import Bank of Korea 
handled 108 cases of investment in Vietnam over the past year.  This 
was equal to 10.4 percent of all the cases the center handled during 
that period.  While ROK investment in Vietnam has been concentrated 
mainly in light industry, HANGYORE says that there is a trend toward 
diversification into service industries.  As of June, 23 companies- 
-both conglomerates and small and medium businesses (SMB's)--had set 
up 30 branch offices in Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City.  According to 
HANGYORE, KOTRA (the Korea Trade Promotion Corporation) expects 
SMB's to move into export processing zones or set up industrial 
complexes in Vietnam.  It also believes that ROK enterprises will 
have a hand in developing Vietnam's natural resources, such as iron 
ore, natural gas, and copper.  Infrastructure projects may become 
good investment targets as well, according to the article.  Yet 
HANGYORE observes that not all ROK ventures in Vietnam fare well. 
There are cases of businesses failing because they invested without 
having enough advance information about local conditions, of 
friction because of cultural differences, and cases of labor- 
management disputes.  The paper passes along KOTRA's advice that 
firms secure their markets and resources for the long term, and 
increase the legal recognition of Korean products and technology. 

   According to the 22 December HANGUK ILBO (HI), Vietnamese 
authorities expect total trade between the ROK and Vietnam to reach 
$756 million in 1993.  This would be a 53-percent increase over 1992 
trade.  HI reports that as of 22 December, the ROK had received 
approval from Vietnam for 47 investment projects worth a total of 
$2.7 million.  About 40 ROK companies, including major conglomerates 
such as Daewoo, Samsung, Hyundai, and Lucky-Goldstar, have set up 
businesses in Vietnam. 

   In September 1993, KOTRA surveyed some ROK businesses that have 
been active in Vietnam, and HANGYORE SINMUN reports the results of 
the survey in its 24 December issue.  According to the newspaper, 
KOTRA sent surveys to 47 companies who had permission from Vietnam's 
State Committee for Cooperation and Investment (SCCI) to invest in 
Vietnam, and received 32 responses.  The responses showed that 25 of 
the firms had invested $5 million or less in their venture; set up 
business primarily in Ho Chi Minh City; and had concentrated on 
investing in textiles or daily necessities.  HANGYORE comments that 
this concentration of business interests could create problems--such 
as "excessive competition"--for ROK enterprises investing in 
Vietnam. 

   ROK firms have already encountered problems when doing business 
in Vietnam, reports the 3 December MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS). 
Although to date the Korean Commercial Arbitration Board (KCAB) has 
received only one formal complaint from a ROK firm concerning ROK- 
Vietnam trade, the number of business disputes in this area is 
actually higher.  MKS explains that this is because many cases where 
ROK firms have suffered losses in Vietnam are overlooked.  Moreover, 
MKS predicts that the chances of trade disputes will rise as ROK 
business involvement in that country increases.  Currently resolving 
disputes is difficult, particularly because Vietnam does not 
participate in a "New York agreement" --an international arbitration 
agreement.  However, resolving disputes may be easier in the future, 
thanks to an arbitration agreement signed between the Korean 
Commercial Arbitration Board (KCAB) and the Vietnam International 
Arbitration Center in December.  MKS notes that the agreement 
contains the following provisions:  the arbitration panel will be 
drawn from an impartial third country, ROK and Vietnamese 
arbitration bodies will cooperate in developing international 
arbitration, and parties will amicably share information useful to 
both sides. 

       Research Institutes Raise 1994 Growth Rate Estimates -- 
Following slight improvements in the economic climate recently, 
various research institutes have adjusted their estimates for 
economic growth in 1994.  The Korea Institute for Industrial 
Economics and Trade (KIET) raised its 1994 real growth rate estimate 
from 6.1 percent to 6.4 percent.  The Korea Development Institute 
(KDI), which had previously estimated the rate at between 6.5 and 
7.2 percent, has set a new estimate of 7.0 percent.  Other private 
institutes run by conglomerates have also adjusted their estimates 
upward.  The institutes explain that they view prospects for 1994 as 
brighter because much of the "uncertainty" over the real-name 
financial system has been eliminated, and because business 
confidence is being restored following President Kim's speech on 
internationalization.  They expect investment in facilities and 
infrastructure, in particular, to become "vigorous" as companies 
work to improve their competitivenesss.  However, the institutes 
point out that price increases may be a big stumbling block for the 
economy in 1994.  They expect price increases in 1994 to be between 
5 and 6 percent, which is higher than the New Economic Five-Year 
Plan's estimate of a 4.3-percent annual increase. 


          Real    Private     Fixed       Current           Consumer 
Source  Growth  Consumption Investment Account              Prices 
                                              Exports Imports 
Five-year 
plan       7.1      6.5       7.0        0       9.5    7.8    4.3 

Bank of 
Korea      6.3      5.6       6.2        5       7.9    7.8    6.1 

KDI*       7.0      5.7       6.6       14       9.1    7.7    5.6 

KIET*      6.4      6.0       6.8       10       9.1    7.8    5.8 

Samsung*   5.5      5.7       3.6        4       7.4    5.5    5.3 

Lucky- 
Goldstar*  6.8      5.4       6.6       23       8.5    6.6    5.8 

Daewoo*    6.3      5.5       4.9      3.8       7.0    6.0    6.0 

Notes:  Current account unit is $1 billion; all other units are 
percent.  An "*" indicates estimates were recently revised.  Private 
consumption--the five-year plan and Lucky-Goldstar figures indicate 
overall consumption. 

   (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 20 Dec 93 p 5) 



   Rail Car Orders Expected To Drop 34.5 Percent in 1994 -- Orders 
for electric rail cars manufactured in South Korea are expected to 
fall in 1994.  The three main ROK producers of these cars--Daewoo 
Heavy Industries, Ltd., Hyundai Precision and Industry Co., Ltd., 
and Hanjin Heavy Industries Co., Ltd.--are expected to receive 
domestic orders for 600 rail cars in 1994.  This is 34.5 percent 
less than the 916 cars ordered domestically in 1993.  This is also 
less than the production capacity of the three companies, which was 
raised following a significant increase in both domestic and 
overseas orders in 1993.  Both Daewoo and Hyundai can now produce 
300 cars annually, while Hanjin has a production capacity of 150 
cars.  The companies competed heatedly for domestic orders in 1993, 
often slashing prices to 50-70 percent of cost.  With fewer orders 
being placed, competition among the three is expected to increase, 
even for overseas orders.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 20 Dec 93 p 
9) 

   ROK To Switch to Metric System for Measuring Rice, Barley -- On 4 
January the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry, and Fisheries 
announced that beginning in 1994, rice and polished barley will be 
measured using the metric weights of kilograms and tons rather than 
the traditional Korean units of sok and kama.  This will be in 
keeping with the era of internationalization and liberalization 
following the Uruguay Round.  According to the ministry, one sok of 
rice will be equivalent to 144 kg, and one kama to 72 kg, while one 
sok of barley will be equivalent to 138 kg, and one kama to 69 kg. 
Thus 1993's rice production--32.98 million sok--equals 4.75 million 
tons, and the government's 1993 rice purchase--lO million sok- 
-equals 1.44 million tons.  Ministry officials note that rice is 
already sold in 10- and 20-kg bags, and that the kama unit was "no 
longer really practical."  (Seoul CHUNGANG ILBO 5 Jan 94 p 3) 

   New Center To Promote Design, Manufacture of ASIC's -- South 
Korea's "Electronic Parts Combined Technology Research Institute" is 
opening a new design center for application-specific integrated 
circuits (ASIC's).  The center will cooperate with private firms to 
determine what ASIC's are in demand.  It will then design the chips, 
develop them, and have them manufactured on domestic production 
lines, including experimental lines operated by Samsung, Goldstar, 
and Hyundai.  The new center "will contribute to the development of 
the domestic electronics industry through core electronics design 
technology, product development, and technological support for small 
and medium businesses (SMB's)."  Its goal is to help SMB's build 
their own ASIC's by supplying technology, equipment, personnel, and 
funds.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 28 Dec 93 p 8) 

   Ministries Funding Development of 256M DRAM -- The Economic 
Planning Board, Ministry of Science and Technology, Ministry of 
Trade, Industry and Energy, and Ministry of Communications are 
jointly supporting an "R and D Group for Basic Technology 
Development of Next-Generation Semiconductors" aimed at "developing 
basic technology associated with high-density semiconductors" at the 
256M DRAM level "or higher" by October 1997.  Some 195.4 billion won 
($244 million) will be spent on the project, including 91.4 billion 
won ($114 million) in state funds.  Huang Ki-ung, director of Seoul 
National University's Semiconductor Research Institute, will lead 
the group, which is co-located with the Semiconductor Research 
Association in Seoul's Yangjae-dong.  (Seoul TONGA ILBO 27 Dec 93 p 
23) 

   An earlier report in the 28 August HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN stated 
that the group would be composed of elements from industry, 
academia, and research institutes, and be guided by a Research 
Control Committee which would coordinate views and "allocate support 
burdens."  The Korea Advanced Institute of Science and Technology 
(KAIST) was to provide administrative support. 

   Daewoo To Establish Aviation Technology Research Center in Russia 
-- After a year of preparation, Daewoo Heavy Industry will establish 
an aviation technology research center near Moscow to activate 
cooperation in aviation.  The opening ceremony for the center will 
be held on 30 March.  This is the first time the aviation industry 
will establish a research center to carry out international 
cooperation in aviation technology.  Through the research center, 
Daewoo plans to improve the 28-passenger helicopters--the MI-8 and 
the MI-17--and work to develop the next-generation transport 
helicopter and five-ton class, multipurpose helicopter.  In 
particular, Daewoo plans to use Russia's aviation technology to 
obtain helicopter design technology, engine manufacturing 
technology, and maintenance technology.  The company plans to 
concentrate on working to produce finished helicopter-related 
products.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 8 Jan 94 p 15) Seoul Bureau/ 

   Euro-Asia Business Center To Be Established in Amsterdam -- In 
May the ROK will establish the Euro-Asia Business Center (EABC) in 
Amsterdam, in cooperation with the Dutch Government.  The EABC will 
serve as a bridgehead for the ROK to advance into the European 
market.  It is to consist of trading firms, companies investing in 
the Netherlands, public organizations, research centers, and travel 
agents.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 19 Jan 94 p 10) Seoul Bureau/ 

   Daewoo To Invest in Auto Joint Venture in Romania -- Daewoo Group 
plans to invest $156 million in a joint venture in Romania that will 
manufacture passenger cars for the European market.  Under the 
agreement with Oltcit SA, Daewoo will own 51 percent of the venture. 
The new production lines will manufacture up to 200,000 cars a year 
by 1998.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 7 Jan 94 p 11) Seoul Bureau/ 
   Kia To Assemble Cars in Pakistan -- Kia Motors recently signed a 
technical cooperation contract with Pakistan's Daur Motors to 
assemble Kia's Pride sub-compact and its one-ton truck models.  This 
will allow Kia to produce 20,000 cars a year in Pakistan through 
local assembly.  Kia will begin shipping parts for the vehicles in 
February.  The company also plans to build a new plant in the Kasim 
industrial complex.  When the plant is completed in 1997, Kia plans 
to increase production to 50,000 vehicles a year.  (Seoul MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN 7 Jan 94 p 11) Seoul Bureau/ 

   Hyundai Motors To Manufacture Cars in Egypt -- Hyundai Motors has 
contracted to provide technology and parts for Excel production to 
an Egyptian company.  This company is now building a production 
plant which will produce 10,000 cars a year for Hyundai beginning in 
1996.  Hyundai plans to increase the plant's annual production 
capacity to 50,000 vehicles by the end of 1998.  (Seoul MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN 13 Jan 94 p 11) Seoul Bureau/ 

   Samsung To Build TV Parts Plant in Mexico -- Samsung has decided 
to invest $40 million to build a television parts plant in Tijuana, 
Mexico by 1997.  Construction will start in April.  When completed, 
the plant will produce television tuners, speakers, and other major 
television components.  The plant will supply these parts to Samsung 
Electronics' plant in Mexico, and export them to television 
manufacturing plants in the NAFTA area.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 
20 Jan 94 p 11) Seoul Bureau/ 

   Halla Group To Export Cement Plant to Papua New Guinea -- HalIa 
Group has received a $142-million order for a cement plant from the 
Papua New Guinea HalIa Cement Company.  The plant will have an 
annual production capacity of 600,000 tons.  HalIa will begin 
construction of the plant in the first half of 1994, and is 
scheduled to complete it in 35 months.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 
19 Jan 94 p 11) Seoul Bureau/ 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA:  INDONESIA -- Minister Comments on Unemployment 
Rate - Manpower Minister Abdul Latief recently commented on 
Indonesia's 38-percent unemployment rate, quoting economists and 
labor experts who believe that the current situation will have 
"serious ramifications" on the future of the country.  These experts 
said that Indonesia runs the risk of having millions of unskilled 
workers, declining international competitiveness, and a rising crime 
rate.  They also stated that economic stagnation would ensue if the 
market for low-cost labor shifts to other countries. 

   Latief noted that the 38-percent figure includes the 29 million 
people who are underemployed.  Likewise, Mari Pangestu, chief 
economist of the Center for Strategic and International Studies, 
pointed out that the official unemployment figure of 2-3 percent is 
"meaningless" because the government derives its unemployment 
figures from the number of people registered as having no jobs and 
seeking employment.  However, few register because Indonesia has no 
social security system.  Pangestu noted that the estimated 2.3-2.5 
million people who enter the job market each year only add to the 
current problems.  (Jakarta SUARA KARYA 13 Dec 93 p 3) 

   Economist Estimates 5.7-Percent Growth for 1994 -- At a recent 
business and financial seminar, Riyanto Sastroatmodjo, an economist 
at the Indonesian Institute of Economic Research, estimated 
Indonesia's 1994 macro-economic growth at about 5.7 percent, down 
from 1993's 6.3-percent figure.  He attributed the decline to a 
downward trend in investments and non-oil/gas exports.  He also said 
that the country's non-oil/gas exports, which reached 26.6 percent 
in 1992 and 10.4 percent in 1993, will most likely reach only 9.3 
percent in 1994-95.  He added that stiff competition from NAFTA, the 
single European market, and overall slow growth will further 
aggravate the situation.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 17 Dec 93 p 4) 

   Habibie Seeking Consortium To Produce 'People's Car' -- The 
Agency for Strategic Industries (BPIS), headed by Research and 
Technology Minister B.J. Habibie, is asking national automobile 
companies to form a consortium to produce a "people's car."  Habibie 
said the idea of producing a "people's car" was approved by 
President Suharto following an agreement last November between BPIS 
and the British Rover Group, a division of British Aerospace.  The 
Rover Group will not only provide technical assistance and 
technology transfer, it will also ship its 1-liter, K- series, 
Rover-I automobile engines to BPIS, according to Habibie.  The 
minister said that all other components for the car will be produced 
locally.  He added that once a "satisfactory" production level has 
been reached, Rover will extend its license to BPIS, thus allowing 
Indonesia to produce automobile engines and to achieve 100-percent 
local content. 

   BPIS is currently designing the "people's car" and expects 
production to start in 1997 or 1998.  The car is to be competitively 
priced, not only for domestic consumption, but also for export in 
the future.  BPIS will probably hold a 30-percent share in the 
consortium, with the remainder going to the national private 
companies.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 7 Dec 93 p 1) 

   Companies Interested in Setting Up Telecommunication Network -- 
Minister of Tourism, Post, and Telecommunication Joop Ave stated 
recently that his ministry has received a request from the Salim 
Group, Prayogo Pangestu, Bimantara, and Timmy Habibie to establish a 
20-million line telecommunication network between 1994 and 1999, 
with a total investment of $10 billion.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 
11 Dec 93 p 1) 

   ADB Approves Loan for Eastern Islands -- The Manila-based Asian 
Development Bank (ADB) has approved a $85-million loan to develop 
urban areas in the eastern part of the country.  The 25-year loan, 
with a grace period of five years, will support urban infrastructure 
development in West Nusa Tenggara, East Nusa Tenggara, East Timor, 
Maluku, and Irian Jaya, which account for nearly one-third of the 
country's land area.  (Jakarta KOMPAS 23 Dec 93 p 5) 

   MALAYSIA:  High-Technology Cooperation With Indonesia Planned -- 
Malaysia is working on a high-technology cooperation program with 
Indonesia involving the aerospace and car industries of both 
countries.  Prime Minister Mahathir envisions a bilateral 
cooperation program which would lead Malaysia into manufacturing 
light aircraft, and Indonesia into specializing in larger aircraft 
manufacturing and producing auto components for Malaysia's Proton 
Saga. 

   Mahathir pointed out that there would be a sufficiently large 
market among the ASEAN countries for the aircraft produced by the 
two countries.  He also said that he will discuss in detail the 
manufacturing of Proton Saga components in Indonesia to meet 
Indonesian contents requirements and to reduce import duties. 

   Mahathir had previously announced that Malaysia will start 
producing  three light aircraft in 1994--the Eagle XTS, the basic 
trainer MD3-160, and the Dornier Seas tar CD2.  The Indonesian 
aerospace industry, on the other hand, has had 20 years of 
experience in designing and manufacturing light aircraft.  At a 
recent news conference, Malaysia's Defense Minister Najib Tun Razak 
said Indonesia had agreed in principle to buy 20 MD3-160s and to 
import 1,500 Proton Sagas.  In return, Malaysia would buy an 
undisclosed number of Indonesia's CN-235, a medium-range transport 
carrier with military application capability.  (Kuala Lumpur UTUSAN 
MALAYSIA 23 Dec 93 p 2) 

   PHILIPPINES:  Brownouts in Manila To Continue in 1994 -- 
Brownouts in Manila and other parts of the nation may still occur 
during the coming hot season, according to Representative Dante 
Tinga, chairman of the House Committee on energy.  He said the 
National Power Corporation (Napocor) only has a small supply to take 
care of the needs of industrial and residential areas.  Tinga noted 
that the nation has reserves of approximately 200 mw, while the need 
for electric power may be as high as 500 mw.  At present, brownouts 
in Manila are rare because of the two power barges Napocor recently 
installed in Batangas and Rizal.  However, the mounting operation 
costs of these power barges and the high price of electricity make 
foreign investors "less than eager" to do business in the 
Philippines.  (Manila BALITA 29 Dec 93 p 5) 

   THAILAND:  Government Approves Fijiancial Liberalization for 
Offshore Banking -- The Council of Economic Ministers recently 
approved several measures allowing offshore banking institutions 
under the Bangkok International Banking Facility (BIBF) to establish 
two upcountry branches and to conduct a broader scope of operations, 
including baht lending, foreign exchange transactions, and 
investment banking. 

   Each BIBF bank branch will be permitted to offer baht loans of up 
to 1 billion baht ($40 million) during the early stage, giving local 
Thai financial institutions time to adjust to the growing 
competition. 

   Last year, the Finance Ministry awarded 33 foreign banks and 15 
Thai commercial banks licences to conduct offshore banking as a way 
to liberalize the financial sector and to bolster Thailand as a 
regional financial center, but it restricted BIBF banks to 
Eurodollar transactions only.  The new measure enables BIBF banks to 
take deposits in foreign currencies, and borrow in baht and foreign 
currencies from local and foreign institutions.  BIBF banks will 
also be allowed to deposit baht and foreign currencies at local and 
foreign financial institutions, but their baht deposits must be 
equivalent to their baht lending, not to exceed 1 billion baht per 
branch.  (Bangkok THE NATION 11 Jan 94 p B1) Bangkok Bureaus 

   New Measures To Promote Greater Capital Outflow -- The Council of 
Economic Ministers has approved new measures to promote greater 
capital outflow by allowing each traveller to take out of the 
country up to $20,000 in cash, compared to $10,000 in the past.  The 
$20,000 ceiling on travellers' checks or drafts has been abolished. 

   The relaxation of foreign exchange controls will also allow 
businesses to transfer up to $10 million overseas for investment 
without prior approval, up from $5 million.  In addition, Thai 
companies can now make loans up to $10 million to their overseas 
subsidiaries.  (Bangkok THE NATION 11 Jan 94 pp Al, A2) Bangkok 
Bureau/ 

   Lower Tariffs Approved for Nonferrous Metal Products, Devices -- 
The Council of Economic Ministers has approved lower tariffs for 220 
non-ferrous metal products, measuring devices, and research 
equipment.  The Finance Ministry said the rates would come under the 
standard structure of six tariffs:  0, 1, 5, 10, 20, and 30 percent. 
The tariffs on 220 non-ferrous metal products that are not locally 
produced will be immediately cut to 5 percent for primary products, 
10 percent for intermediate products, and 20-30 percent for finished 
products. 

   For 55 other products promoted by the Board of Investment or 
those that are locally produced and still need protection, the rates 
will be reduced to the mid-point between the existing levels and 
rates to apply in 1995.  They will be further reduced in 1997.  In 
addition, tariffs on 22 research equipment items and 44 measuring 
devices that cannot be produced locally are immediately reduced. 
The ministry said the changes would cause the government to lose $92 
million in tariff revenue.  (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 11 Jan 93 p 17) 
Bangkok Bureau/ 

   VIETNAM:  Foreign Investment Projects Licensed in 1993 Listed -- 


Sector                 Projects                Investment Capital 
                                               (in million $) 

Industries             129                     885.4 

Oil, gas               3                       147 

Agriculture, forestry  24                      60.6 

Fishery                2                       0.4 

Post, telegraph, 
transportation         4                       253.2 

Tourism, hotels        31                      577.7 

Services               24                      148 

Banking, finance       4                       45.1 

Construction           3                        22.5 
(residential) 

Others                 8                        28.5 

   (Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE VIETNAM 9-15 Dec p 2) 

Investor Countries in 1993 Reported 

Country                Projects                Investment Capital 
                                               (in million $) 
Hong Kong              27                      562.6 

Taiwan                 38                      355.8 

South Korea            33                      323.7 

Singapore              25                      196.4 

France                 14                      172.4 

Australia              12                      134.6 

Malaysia               10                      121.2 

Thailand               13                      67.8 

Japan                  14                      38.3 

CIS                     5                      11.6 

   The list above does not include 41 projects of unnamed countries, 
with a total investment capital of $184 million.  (Hanoi THOI BAO 
KINH TE VIETNAM 9-15 Dec 93 p 2) 



   Auto Assembly Venture With Daewoo Licensed -- South Korea's 
Daewoo and the Union of Machinery Enterprise 7983 (under the Defense 
Ministry's Economic, Technological General Department) have formed a 
30-year joint venture to assemble vans, trucks, and buses.  The 
project was licensed by the State Committee for Cooperation and 
Investment (SCCI) in December and is the fourth auto assembly joint 
venture in the country. 

   Total investment capital in the new venture amounts to $32.2 
million and prescribed capital is $10 million, of which the 
Vietnamese side is  contributing 35 percent.  Future profits will be 
split 65:35 between the two partners.  (Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE 
VIETNAM 23-29 Dec 93 p 3) 

   Workers at Foreign-Invested Firms Reportedly Underpaid -- Seventy 
percent of workers at foreign-invested firms in Ho Chi Minh City 
reportedly recive wages lower than the minimum required by the 
Vietnamese Government.  Some 638 enterprises nationwide currently 
take direct investment from foreign countries, and although they 
provide "stable employment" for about 45,000 workers, they "do not 
strictly follow" official labor regulations.  (Hanoi THOI BAO KINH 
TE VIETNAM 9-15 Dec p 5) 

   Foreign Firms Plan To Manufacture, Assemble Cars in Vietnam -- 
Volkswagen and the Thyssen Steel Company have submitted to the SRV 
Heavy Industry Ministry a plan to manufacture automobiles and auto 
parts in Vietnam.  Once the project is approved, Volkswagen will 
produce 2,000 cars per year on an SKD (semi knock-down) basis and 
eventually switch to a CKD (complete knock-down) basis.  Other 
companies such as Renault and BMW have also expressed interest in 
building assembly plants in Vietnam.  A Mitsubishi project was 
recently approved by the Vietnamese authorities.  Mitsubishi will be 
the second foreign company, after Mekong, to assemble automobiles in 
Vietnam.  (Hanoi LAO DONG 7 Dec 93 p 2) 

   Nguyen Trung Truc, general director of Mercedes-Benz in Vietnam, 
has announced that his company will build a maintenance facility to 
service its cars.  Whenever the Vietnamese market is able to absorb 
500-1,000 vehicles a year, Mercedes will build an assembly plant in 
Vietnam.  Truc said that the Mercedes models produced in Vietnam 
would cost less than elsewhere because of lower expenses for labor 
and service.  The vehicles will be made "to suit the country's 
environment and climate," but the quality will be the "same as in 
Germany."  (Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE VIET NAM  9-15 Dec 93 p 13) 

   Increase in 1993 Foreign Investments Reported -- In 1993, the 
State Committee for Cooperation and Investment (SCCI) licensed 282 
investment projects with a total prescribed capital of $2.863 
billion, up 40 percent over the previous year.  Since the 
introduction of the Law on Foreign Investment in 1987, Vietnam has 
granted licenses to 836 projects with a total investment of $7.5 
billion.  The biggest investors are: Taiwan with 117 projects and a 
total capital of $1.53 billion; Hong Kong, 172 projects and $1.30 
billion; and France, 50 projects and nearly $614 million.  (Hanoi 
VNA 1425 GMT 11 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   Ship Repair Joint Venture Established -- Ba Son Shipyard and 
Singapore's Keppel Group formed a ship repair, building, and 
technological services joint venture on 13 January.  The new 
venture, called Bason-Keppel Company Ltd., has an investment capital 
of $6.6 million and a legal capital of $4 million, of which Vietnam 
is contributing 40 percent.  (Hanoi VNA 1436 GMT 14 Jan 94) Bangkok 
Bureau/ 

   Foreign Investment in Dong Nai Province Reported -- Dong Nai 
Province currently has 53 licensed projects worth $520 million.  The 
province's foreign partners are mainly from France, Australia, 
Taiwan, Hong Kong, and South Korea.  Dong Nai granted 35 licenses in 
1993 with a total investment capital of $378 million.  It ranks 
fourth in terms of joint ventures with foreign companies, trailing 
Ho Chi Minh City, Hanoi, and Haiphong.  (Hanoi vNA 0609 GMT 18 Jan 
94) Bangkok Bureau/ 

   Taiwanese, French Firms To Help Build Refinery -- Taiwan Oil 
Company, together with France's Total Company, will help Vietnam 
build a $1.2-billion oil refinery.  Vietnam, Total, and Taiwan Oil 
will each contribute 30 percent, and the Taiwanese China Investment 
Development Corporation will contribute 10 percent.  (Hanoi Voice of 
Vietnam 2300 GMT 13 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau/ 

   Increase in Ho Chi Minh City Private Sector Output Reported -- 
Private sector industrial establishments in Ho Chi Minh City had a 
gross output value of $607 million in 1993, up 20.4 percent over 
1992, and accounting for 31.3 percent of the city's total industrial 
output.  Last year, about 1,435 private enterprises were licensed to 
operate in the city, raising the number of private businesses and 
companies to 2,208, with a prescribed capital of $154 million.  Some 
989 trading and service companies were in operation in 1993, up from 
34 in 1991, and outnumbering industrial production enterprises. 
(Hanoi VNA 1431 GMT 16 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau/ 

   Hanoi Industrial Sector Marks 22.7-Percent Increase -- In 1993, 
Hanoi's industrial sector registered a turnover of $144 million, a 
22.7-percent increase over the previous year, with city-owned 
industries alone generating a turnover of $51 million or a 31- 
percent increase.  Among those that reported a "high increase" are 
manufacturers  of leather shoes and electrical appliances, and 
producers of rubber, plastic, textile, and garments.  (Hanoi 
Television Network 1215 GMT 9 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau/ 

   Bank of Commerce and Industry Begins New Service -- As of 1 
January, savings account holders in the Bank of Commerce and 
Industry can withdraw money from any branch of the bank.  In 
addition to a credit slip, depositors will receive a bank statement, 
and they will be able to make withdrawals from any branch of the 
bank in Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City.  The minimum amount required for 
opening a savings account is $100, and the maximum one-time 
withdrawal is $1,000.  (Hanoi VNA 0647 GMT 7 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau/ 

   Shipping Firm Signs Contracts With Japan, ROK -- The Hanoi 
Maritime Transport Company (Hamatco), under the Hanoi Transport and 
-Public Works Service, signed several sea transport contracts with 
Japan and South Korea in 1993, totaling $1.85 million.  In order to 
become more competitive, the company plans to purchase new ships in 
the in the future.  (Hanoi VNA 0549 GMT 12 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau/ 

   Construction Begins on Joint Venture Hotel -- Construction of a 
450-room, $74-million five-star hotel in Ho Chi Minh City has 
recently begun.  France's Peal International Company will have a 70- 
percent share in the joint venture and the Tourism Company of Ho Chi 
Minh City, the remainder.  (Hanoi VNA 1328 GMT 12 Jan 94) Bangkok 
Bureau/ 

   'Cost-and-Freight' Crude Oil Export Noted -- A Japanese tanker 
with about 58,000 tons of crude oil left the White Tiger Oil Field 
off of southern Vietnam for Japan recently, marking the start of 
Vietnamese crude oil export on a "cost-and-freight" basis.  The 
Vietnam Falcon Shipping Company has chartered the 61,000-ton 
Chizukawa for six months to transport about 500,000 tons of crude 
oil for export.  (Hanoi VNA 1333 GMT 12 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau/ 

   Power Supply for Southern Provinces Increases -- The Ministry of 
Energy recently announced that power supply for 20 southern 
provinces and cities will gradually increase in 1994.  The increased 
supply will come from the operation of a new gas turbine generator 
in Ba Ria-Vung Tau with a total capacity of 100 mw.  The supply will 
further increase with the operation of generators at the Thac Mo and 
Vinh Son hydroelectricity stations which are under construction. 
Bui Van Luu, director of Power Company No. 2, said the planned power 
supply for southern provinces and cities in 1994 is about 4.6 
billion kwh, a fourfold increase over 1976, with an average daily 
supply of 15 million kwh, up 20 percent over the 1992-93 dry season. 
The supply is expected to reach 7.2 billion kwh in 1995 and 12.5 
billion kwh in the year 2000.  The power networks of all the 
districts of the 20 southern provinces and cities will be hooked to 
the national power grid in 1994.  (Hanoi VNA 0631 GMT 8 Jan 94) 
Bangkok Bureau/ 

   Three Foreign Investment Projects Approved -- The State Committee 
for Cooperation and Investment (SCCI) has granted licenses to three 
foreign projects with a total prescribed capital of $300 million. 
The first project is an automatic textile complex in Dong Nai 
Province with a capital of $242 million invested by Malaysia's 
Hualon Corporation.  The second is a venture between Vietnam and 
Singapore to produce metal boxes in Ho Chi Minh City, capitalized at 
$54 million.  The third is a project with Switzerland's Sika Company 
to establish a 100-percent foreign-invested company in Ho Chi Minh 
CitY to produce construction material, with a capital of more than 
$3.5 million.  (Hanoi VNA 1444 GMT 4 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau/ 
EAG/26JAN94/ECONF/TECHTF/EAST ASIA GROUP./SM 27/1710Z JAN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43221 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000005394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   30 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-013--JAPAN 
<H3> <TI>      JAPAN TO LAUNCH H-II ROCKET ON 1 FEBRUARY AS SCHEDULED </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Summary:      The Japanese press reports that the National Space 
Development Agency of Japan [NASDA] will keep its 1 February launch 
date for the H-II rocket despite difficulties experienced during a 
23 December fueling rehearsal.  The launch will be a major event 
attracting nearly 1,000 government and company representatives, and 
members of the press. 

   NASDA announced on 18 January that it will launch the H-II rocket 
on 1 February, according to the 19 January MINAMI NIHON SHIMBUN. 
NASDA held an unscheduled fueling rehearsal on 14 January after 
problems were discovered during the scheduled rehearsal on 23 
December.  During the December rehearsal problems arose in eight 
places, including a leak in the helium pressure valves on the LE-7 
main engine which resulted in insufficient pressure, according to 
the 18 January MINAMI NIHON SHIMBUN.  During the 14 January 
rehearsal the moveable nozzles on the the solid rocket boosters 
developed problems, but NASDA "determined that they were not major" 
and decided to keep the 1 February launch date. 

   NASDA may feel under pressure to proceed with the launch of the 
H-II, which cost 2.7 trillion yen ($2.45 billion) to develop.  The 
H-II launch has already been rescheduled twice, delaying the launch 
about two years because of problems in developing the LE-7 main 
engine.  In 1991 the LE-7 engine exploded during a pressure test and 
killed a technician.  In 1992 another LE-7 caught on fire during a 
combustion test, according to the 25 January NIKKEI SANGYO. 
Furthermore, the launch of "Japan's first indigenously developed 
large rocket" is being touted as "placing Japan on par with the 
United States and Europe in space technology," and, according to the 
23 January YOMIURI SHIMBUN, will attract "nearly 1,000 members of 
the press, and NASDA and company representatives to Tanegashima." 
The H-II rocket will be launched from the Yoshinobu launch pad at 
the Tanegashima Space Center at 7 am on 1 February, according to the 
19 January MINAMI NIHON SHIMBUN.  It will carry a 3.27-metric ton 
payload consisting of the 865 kg OREX vehicle, and the 2.4-ton VEP. 
The 24 January NIKKEI BUSINESS reports the objectives for the launch 
are to 1) launch the rocket, 2) place the VEP in a transfer orbit, 
and 3) have the OREX reenter. NASDA reportedly will consider the 
launch a success if objectives one and two are accomplished. 

   The VEP, which is a dummy of experimental technology satellite 6 
(ETS-6), is scheduled to separate 28 minutes after launch and enter 
an elliptical stationary transfer orbit with an apogee of 36,200 
kilometers and a perigee of about 450 kilometers.  Because its 
apogee-motor fuel tanks will be loaded with water rather than fuel 
it will remain in this transfer orbit.  The VEP's batteries will 
give it a life of 100 hours and it will transmit H-II vibration and 
orbit-positioning accuracy data to the ground during that time, 
according to the 5 January SANKEI SHIMBUN. 

   The OREX will separate 14 minutes after launch and orbit the 
earth once at 450 kilometers, according to the SANKEI SHIMBUN. 
About 1 hour and 40 minutes after launch the OREX will fire its 
retro rockets and reenter the atmosphere, according to the 27 
October 93 NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  Two hours after launch OREX will 
splash down in the Pacific near Christmas Island, according to the 5 
January SANKEI SHIMBUN.  The 5 November MINAMI NIHON SHIMBUN reports 
the OREX will not be recovered after splashdown because of the costs 
that would be involved. 

   (AUTHOR:COOK.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF JAPAN 
BRANCH AT (703) 733-6534) 

EAG/28JAN94/TECHTF/ASIA DIVISION/SDJ 28/2102Z JAN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-43222 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000005494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   30 January 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-28Jan94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      Kozyrev's Remarks on Russian "Military Presence" Spark Furor </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                              Reports that Foreign Minister Andrey Kozyrev called for 
maintaining Russia's military presence in the states of the 
former Soviet Union have sparked vehement protests from the 
Baltic states.  Although he and other foreign ministry officials 
later claimed that his remarks had been taken out of context and 
that Russia's policy on withdrawing troops from the Baltics 
remains unchanged, they nonetheless defended Russia's right to 
protect Russian interests and criticized negative Western 
reactions to the reports.  Boosted by strong support for Russia's 
"new" foreign policy course from domestic media and pressed by 
critics in the Duma, who have attacked him for neglecting Russian 
interests, Kozyrev will very likely continue his course of more 
aggressively championing those interests despite Western 
concerns. 
                        END SUMMARY 
   In a speech to a 18-19 January gathering of Russia's ambassadors 
to the CIS and Baltic states, Foreign Minister Kozyrev reportedly 
called for maintaining a Russian military presence in former 
Soviet republics and stressed that Russia must protect its 
interests and the rights of ethnic Russians in the near abroad. 
The text of Kozyrev's speech has not been observed to have been 
published, but ITAR-TASS reported that Kozyrev told the 
ambassadors that "Russia should not withdraw from those regions 
which have been the sphere of Russian interests for centuries." 
Kozyrev reportedly added, "We should not fear these words about a 
military presence" (18 January).  The ITAR-TASS report also 
indicated that Kozyrev labelled the CIS and Baltic states a 
region of "priority vital interests for Russia" where there are 
also "major threats to [these] interests."  Kozyrev was also 
quoted as contending that as soon as Russian troops leave the 
region, a "security vacuum" will emerge, and it will "inevitably" 
be filled by forces "often not friendly and, in many cases, 
directly hostile" to Russian interests. 
   Baltic Protests 
   The Baltic states immediately protested Kozyrev's remarks, 
charging that Moscow had departed from its previous official 
position supporting a complete withdrawal of troops.  The prime 
ministers of the three Baltic states signed a statement on 19 
January, stating that this "new" policy is "contrary" to Russia's 
international obligations and complicates the troop withdrawal 
talks (Riga radio, 19 January).  In a press release, the Estonian 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs (MFA) characterized Russia as a "big 
bully terrorizing smaller, weaker neighbors" and charged that 
from Kozyrev's statements it was "clear" that Russia views Baltic 
independence as a "temporary annoyance" ( Estonian MFA press 
release, 18 January).  Estonia's representative to the CSCE 
requested that the CSCE security forum make an official inquiry 
(Tallinn radio, 19 January). 
   Russian Clarifications 
   Apparently stung by what Kozyrev termed the "hysterics" and 
"panicky" reaction from abroad (Interfax, 19 January), he and 
other ministry officials responded with a series of 
recriminations, denials, and clarifications: 
   -- Kozyrev, appearing on Russian television on 19 January, 
charged that "Latvia... and some of the mass media in the other 
Baltic states" had launched a "completely artificial" campaign 
that "deliberately distorted" his words with the "obvious aim" of 
"yet again gaining the sympathy" of the West.  He said that 
rather than raising "this absolutely unfounded screaming," Latvia 
should concentrate on drawing up agreements on the conditions for 
a troop withdrawal, adding that Russia would then be ready to 
continue the withdrawals.  Clearly miffed at what he termed the 
"hurried," "inappropriate," and "unbalanced" reaction of the U.S. 
State Department, Kozyrev also complained that "our partnership 
merits having the State Department spokesman get [the facts] 
right" before criticizing Russia's foreign minister. 
   -- Kozyrev's foreign policy adviser Galina Sidorova claimed that 
ITAR-TASS had distorted Kozyrev's remarks.  She insisted that the 
foreign minister had not advocated the continued presence of 
Russian troops in the Baltics (Moscow radio, 19 January). 
   -- MFA press chief Grigoriy Karasin also claimed that the ruckus 
resulted from an "inaccurate choice of quotes" which "several 
politicians" had tried to use as "an argument of insinuations" 
(Interfax, 19 January).  Karasin stressed that there is "no 
question" of any change in Russia's approach toward the Baltic 
states.  He explained that although Kozyrev had started 
discussing the former Soviet republics, including both the CIS 
and the Baltics, when he stated that Russia should maintain a 
military presence, he was referring only to those states in the 
CIS that have bilateral agreements with Moscow.  In later 
remarks, Karasin said that the "hullabaloo" over Kozyrev's 
comments generated "incomprehension and indignation" in Moscow 
and he called for an evaluation of the full text of Kozyrev's 
speech.  Complaining that unnamed persons either still retain an 
"enemy image" of Russia or are trying to restore it, Karasin 
huffed that rather than criticizing a Russian minister the West 
"should concentrate its attention" on how to "properly safeguard" 
the rights of Russians in Latvia and Estonia (ITAR-TASS, 20 
January). 
   Baltic Anxieties Persist 
   Apparently unmollified despite Russian explanations, Latvian and 
Estonian officials continued to criticise Kozyrev's remarks: 
   -- Estonian MFA official Raul Malk said that the Russian view 
that it had "stragetic interests" in its "near abroad" should 
cause anxiety in the international community.  He added that such 
a stance contradicts the US.-Russian summit declaration that no 
dividing lines should be drawn in Europe, noting that calling 
some states the "near abroad" in itself draws dividing lines 
(Tallinn ETA news release, 20 January). 
   -- After receiving the full text of Kozyrev's comments that the 
Russian MFA apparently supplied him, Latvian Foreign Minister 
Georgs Andrejevs, stressing that Kozyrev's comments were 
"ambiguous" and allow for "various interpretations," said that 
Latvia stands by its negative assessment (Tallinn BNS, 20 
January). 
   -- Latvian President Guntis Ulmanis, who reportedly received a 
call from U.S. President Bill Clinton (ITAR-TASS, 21 January), 
said that the call had "dispell[ed]" many "suspicions" about the 
talks between the U.S. and Russia, adding that the U.S. 
President's words "allow Latvia to calm down somewhat."  He 
emphasized, however, that Latvia "should always be prepared" for 
an "agressive" Russian policy. 
   Russian Media Reaction 
   With the exception of the reformist and usually pro-Yeltsin 
Izvestiya, the Russian media's reaction to Kozyrev's remarks was 
largely supportive.  In some cases, the media applauded outright 
both his speech and his complaints about the international 
reaction. (See Note 1)  Despite some continued disagreement about 
what Kozyrev said--Rossiyskiye Vesti, for example, maintained 
that Kozyrev did include the Baltics in his statement about 
keeping a military presence in the near abroad, thus 
contradicting MFA denials--most commentators, using remarkably 
similar arguments, gave short shrift to what they viewed as a 
biased Western response to justified remarks about legitimate 
Russian interests. 
   (Note 1)  Sovetskaya Rossiya, whose commentators have criticized 
Kozyrev for a pro-Western orientation, was not observed to have 
commented on the foreign minister's remarks. 
   -- A 21 January article in the government-owned Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta alluded to double standards, asking why, after the "world 
community" regarded "with understanding" U.S. actions in Panama 
and Grenada and the "punishment" the United States meted out to 
Libya for terrorist acts against Americans in Berlin, Russia 
should be "forbidden" to be "firm and resolute if the life and 
safety of its compatriots are at stake?"  The article stressed 
that the MFA's "new course," focused on the countries of the 
former Soviet Union and on "its own compatriots," reflects the 
interests of Russians "first and foremost," adding that "whether 
some people like it or not, a great power has to protect its own 
interests."  Charging that "some people are quite willing to play 
the tired old record of 'imperial pretensions,'" against Russia, 
the article warned that "if [Moscow and Washington] want our 
peoples to remain friendly and our states partners," it is 
"necessary to spike the propaganda guns" and for the West to 
adopt a "serious attitude" toward Russia. 
   -- A 21 Moscow radio commentary by Vladislav Kozyakov chided the 
U.S. spokesman for expressing his "displeasure" at Kozyrev's 
comments with "surprising" "haste."  Asking why there should be 
this "hasty desire" to "put in doubt" Russia's political course, 
Kozyakov stressed that such a critical response, "even at the 
high level of cooperation between Moscow and Washington," serves 
as a reminder that the American side still "sometimes displays 
signs of the past policy of double standards."  Echoing 
Rossiyskaya Gazeta, the article noted that the United States had 
resorted to military intervention in Panama, Grenada, and other 
"zones of its national interests," and contended that for the 
United States and other countries to maintain "partnership" with 
Russia, an "understanding of Russia's vital interests" in states 
of the former Soviet Union is "essential." 
   -- The Defense Ministry's newspaper Krasnaya Zvezda in a 20 
January article titled "Neighboring Foreign Countries Were, Are, 
and Remain a Zone of Russia's Vital Interests," strongly, if 
somewhat ironically,  supported Kozyrev for "unambiguous[ly] and 
definitive[ly]" stating that the CIS and Baltic countries are 
regions of Russia's "paramount interests."  After declaring that 
Russia cannot "close [its] eyes" to the "shameless and at times 
humiliating pressure on our fellow countrymen" in neighboring 
states, which the article called acts of "criminal disrespect," 
the article warned that "attempts by anyone anywhere to assume 
the role of interpreter and organizer" of Russian affairs in such 
countries will be viewed as "unfriendly acts."  The article ended 
by noting that Russia is "making it plain" that states that want 
to live "in love and fond accord" with Russia should take account 
of its "geopolitical interests." 
   -- In a 19 January article, the reformist Kommersant-Daily 
maintained that Kozyrev's speech--and the whole tenor of the 
conference--constituted an "urgent" foreign policy revision in 
response to the December elections.  Claiming that the thesis 
that the Liberal Democratic Party's electoral success resulted 
from a backlash on economic issues, and not nationalism was 
partly a "delusion," the article claimed that the USSR's 
disintegration is still "painfully perceived" by many Russians--a 
fact understood by Kozyrev who was now making "adjustments." 
Commenting on the "masses of Russian refugees" in 1993, the 
article also noted with apparent approval Kozyrev's statement 
that the protection of ethnic Russians in the near abroad was now 
a strategic priority--a sharp contrast, the article pointed out, 
to the provisions of the Concept on Foreign Policy adopted by the 
Russian Security Council in March 1993 which ignored the subject. 
   Izvestiya Dissents 
   In contrast to most of the media, Izvestiya, which in the past 
has supported Kozyrev on many issues, (See Note 2) took issue 
with both his statements and the MFA's subsequent actions.  In a 
a 20 January report, Maksim Yusin castigated Kozyrev and the MFA 
for responding with "remarkably limp" denials to ITAR-TASS' 
initial "annoying blunder," adding that this response had led to 
"far from favorable" foreign commentary.  Even stronger criticism 
appeared in a 22 January article titled "Lithuania Takes Fright 
and Changes Foreign Policy Orientation; But This Is Not the Way 
To Help the Russian Minority."  The article distinguished between 
an idealistic "early Kozyrev" and a "late Kozyrev" whose "new 
tough-talking approach" is, it contended, only apt to increase 
the Baltic states hostility toward their Russian minorities and 
drive the Baltics into NATO.  The article noted that "it is the 
task of diplomats not to cause frictions between their country 
and its neighbors, but to make them friends," as the "early 
Kozyrev" had done. 
   (Note 2)  For example, Izvestiya supported Kozyrev after his 14 
December 1992 "shock" treatment speech to the CSCE in Stockholm. 
See the Trends of 23 December, 1992, page 10. 
   Outlook 
   Kozyrev has been under pressure from critics such as Liberal 
Democratic Party leader Vladimir Zhirinovskiy and Vladimir Lukin, 
the new head of the State Duma's International Affairs Committee 
and a longtime rival, who have championed protection of Russian 
national interests while criticizing what they have portrayed as 
Kozyrev's inattention to those interests.  Now that these two are 
perched in positions in the new State Duma, they may turn up the 
heat on Kozyrev.  In apparent response to the critics, Kozyrev 
has become progressively more assertive on Russian interests over 
the past year.  He may backtrack or tone down statements--in 
Krygyzia, for example, he apologized for what he termed "fascist 
statements" that he had made in Moscow recently, while continuing 
to emphasize that Russia cannot "remain indifferent to violations 
of Russians' rights (Interfax, 25 January).  Nevertheless, 
Kozyrev is unlikely to substantially retreat from his tough 
stance on the rights of ethnic Russians, despite international 
concerns. 
   (AUTHOR:  BELLINGER.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION, (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/CB 29/0020z Jan 

</TEXT>

</DOC>



